(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ python main.py
“Perhaps there's more going on here than the eye deceives...”
“Not only this but he's recently shaved and bleached his hair which may be due to the start of thinning/recession?”
“Both his maternal grandfather and father himself have absolutely no hair, they're completely bald yet he has somehow maintained a NW0?”
“Anyway, after reading about this I did some research and I've come to the conclusion that he is to be balding or at least battling it.”
“First of all how does an 18 year old kid come to know about such a drug unless he's experiencing hair problems himself?”
“He commented on his hair loss asking why he doesn't just simply use finasteride at the age of 18?”
“This rumour started when he spoke out about Prince William's hair loss situation a few years back.”
“Originally Posted by Kclennings Originally Posted byFirst of all I spotted something on here the other day about Bieber being on finasteride?”


"Maybe more than eye deception happened here..."
"Not only that, he has recently shaved and bleached his hair, which may be due to thinning / fading?"
"Neither his grandfather nor his father had hair, they were completely bald, but he still kept a nw0?"
"Anyway, after reading this article, I did some research and came to the conclusion that he wanted to be bald, or at least fight against it."
"First of all, how does an 18-year-old know about this drug unless he has hair problems himself?"
Talking about his hair loss, he asked, "why didn't he use finasteride directly when he was 18?"
"The rumor began a few years ago when he talked publicly about Prince William's hair loss."
"Originally released by kclennings, originally by first, I found something here a few days ago about Bieber taking finasteride?"



Number  1
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Please visit the source responsible for the item in question to report any concerns you may have regarding content or accuracy.”
“The news articles, Tweets, and blog posts do not represent IMDb's opinions nor can we guarantee that the reporting therein is completely factual.”
“This content is published for the entertainment of our users only.”
“We’re told it’s all fabricated “nonsense.” Star blares in a headline, “Kate Hates Meg’s Half-Baked Muffin Plan.” According to the […]IMDb.com, Inc. takes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, Tweets, or blog posts.”
“Gossip Cop can help set the record straight.”
“That’s the latest claim from one of this week’s tabloids.”
“Did Kate Middleton really prevent Meghan Markle from delivering a batch of homemade muffins to Queen Elizabeth?”


"Please visit the person in charge of the relevant project and report any concerns about content or accuracy."
"News articles, tweets and blog posts don't represent IMDB's opinions, and we can't guarantee that the reports in them are completely true."
"This content is published just to entertain our users."
"We're told it's all made up" bullshit. ". "Kate hates Meg's half baked muffin plan," the star exclaimed in the title IMDb.com , Inc. assumes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, tweets or blog posts. "
"Gossip police can help clarify the facts."
"This is the latest statement in a tabloid this week."
"Does Kate Middleton really stop Megan markel from sending a batch of homemade muffins to Queen Elizabeth?"



Number  2
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Related Gallery...”
“Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:Taylor Swift and Boyfriend Joe Alwyn Step Out for Lunch Date in LondonTaylor Swift Sings 'Gorgeous' to Boyfriend Joe Alwyn During 'Reputation' Tour's First ShowTaylor Swift Holds Hands With Joe Alwyn While Heading Home From Jingle Ball -- See the Sweet Pic!”
“Swift decided to forgo her once-beloved Independence Day party for the second year in a row, instead celebrating America's 242nd birthday by splashing around in the ocean with her British beau.”
“The 28-year-old Reputation artist still managed to show her patriotic side in a red, white, and blue stripped two-piece bikini while swimming and snorkeling with the 27-year-old actor.”
“The pair enjoyed the temperate climate and calm waters at a luxury resort in Turks and Caicos, where they made the most of their romantic vacation.”
“They even got a little cozy in the surf as Swift rode on Alwyn's back through the idyllic blue waters.”
“SBMF / BACKGRIDThe pair's cozy ocean romp was a rare public outing for the couple.”
“Despite being romantically linked since last May, they've only been spotted out and about together a handful of times.”
“While the lovebirds enjoyed the quiet, romantic holiday in relative privacy, fans of the pop icon were left wondering if this marked the end of Swift's Fourth of July party tradition.”
“For years now, the singer and her squad of besties -- which included super models, singers, actress and social media stars -- all gathered at Swift's Rhode Island estate for FOMO-inducing festivities that included barbecues, fireworks, patriotic inflatable bouncy houses and more.”


Related libraries
"Embedded code restart" content: Taylor swift and her boyfriend Joe Alvin's lunch date in London. Taylor Swift sang "gorgeous" for her boyfriend Joe Alvin in the first performance of the "reputation" tour, and Taylor Swift held hands with Joe Alvin when she came home from the jingle ball - look at this sweet picture
Swift decided to give up her favorite Independence Day party for the second year in a row and instead play in the sea with her British boyfriend to celebrate America's 242 th birthday
While swimming and snorkeling with the 27 year old actress, the 28 year old artist still wears a red, white and blue two-piece bikini, showing her patriotic side
The two enjoy a mild climate and calm water at a luxury resort in the Turks and Caicos Islands, where they make the most of their romantic holiday
"When swift rode across the idyllic blue water on Alvin's back, they even got a little comfort in the waves."
"Sbmf / backgrid is a rare public outing for the couple to play in the ocean."
"Although they've been in love since last May, they've only been together a few times."
"While couples are enjoying a quiet and romantic holiday in relative privacy, fans of the pop idol wonder if this marks the end of Swift's party tradition on July 4."
Over the years, the singer and a group of her friends, including supermodels, singers, actresses and social media stars, have gathered at Swift's Rhode Island estate for fomo celebrations, including barbecues, fireworks and patriotic inflatable bungalows



Number  3
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:Jennifer Lopez Playfully Corrects Alex Rodriguez as He Tells Story of Their First DateAlex Rodriguez Addresses Jennifer Lopez Engagement Rumors After Gifting Her With a RingJennifer Lopez Opens Up About the Close Relationship Between Her Twins and Alex Rodriguez's GirlsRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“The 43-year-old former Yankees player took to Instagram on Monday to share a cute video of the couple having an intimate evening together on a boat in Positano, Italy.”
“In the clip, Rodriguez is giving the camera Blue Steel vibes as he nods along to Lopez's rendition of Journey's 1981 hit, "Don't Stop Believin'."”
“Clad in a white collared shirt, Rodriguez looks thrilled to be spending some time the 49-year-old triple-threat star, who opted for a floral printed dress for the nighttime ride.”
“"What did you guys think of my performance?!”
“#dontstopbelieving," the dad of two captioned the clip.”
“It looks like the pair spent all day on the water together!”
“Earlier on his Instagram Story, Rodriguez shared videos and pics of their vacation.”
“In one snap, he called the "El Anillo" singer -- who wore a white swimsuit cover up over a white bikini -- "Queen of the Titanic."”


"Embedded code restart" content: Jennifer Lopez Alex Rodriguez mischievously corrects this when telling the story of their first date. Alex Rodriguez tells her about the engagement story after giving her a ring. Jennifer Lopez tells about her twins and Alex Rodriguez's girl gallery The intimate relationship between them.... "
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"The 43 year old former Yankee shared a lovely video on instagram on Monday about the couple's intimate night on the boat in portiano, Italy
"In this video, Rodriguez gives the camera a blue steel shock. He nods to Lopez's 1981 hit song" don't stop belivin. "
"Wearing a white-collar shirt, Rodriguez looks excited to spend time with the 49 year old threefold star, who chose a printed dress for his night ride
"What do you think of my performance?"
"Don't believe it," the father of two wrote in the clip
"Looks like they've been on the water all day!"
"Earlier, Rodriguez shared videos and photos of their holiday on instagram."
For a moment, he called the "El anillo" singer in a white swimsuit and white bikini "Titanic Queen"



Number  4
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
““He doesn’t see a need to put a ring on it — it wouldn’t make him any happier!”Before they started dating in 2017, A-Rod and J.Lo tried their hand at marriage.”
“Alex Rodriguez and Jennifer Lopez may look like one of the cutest celebrity couples out there, but RadarOnline.com has exclusively learned the former MLB star may be getting cold feet about marrying the singer!”
““Alex and Jen are still very much together,” a source told Straight Shuter, “but wedding talk has almost totally disappeared!”“At the moment, the couple is happy to live together, but they have no plans to get married any time soon,” added the insider.”
“As Radar readers know, Rodriguez, 42, and Lopez, 48, have gushed about their passionate relationship and blended family various times on social media.”
“They’ve even told reporters that their kids get along very well and love spending time together.”
“While rumors of an upcoming wedding have been circling the pair for months, it seems fans will have to wait a while longer before seeing J.Lo walk down the aisle again.”
““It’s actually A-Rod who’s the one that has poured cold water on the ‘I do’s,” continued the source.”
“The retired baseball player was with ex-wife Cynthia Scurtis for six years, while the singer wed Ojani Noa and Cris Judd before settling in with Marc Anthony for ten years.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"He doesn't see the need to wear a ring - it won't make him happier!"! "A-Rod and J.Lo tried to get married before they started dating in 2017."
Alex Rodriguez and Jennifer Lopez look like one of the cutest celebrity couples, but RadarOnline.com The website exclusively learned that the former Major League star may feel cold about marrying the singer! "
"Alex and Jane are still together," a source told straight through Shute, "but the wedding talk is almost gone! "At the moment, the couple are happy to live together, but they have no plans to get married," the source added
As readers of radar magazine know, Rodriguez, 42, and Lopez, 48, have talked on social media about their passionate relationship and family integration
"They even told reporters that their children get along well and like to spend time together."
"Although rumors about the upcoming wedding have been surrounding the two for several months, fans seem to have to wait for a while before they can see Luo Guancong walk on the red carpet again."
"It was actually A-Rod who threw cold water on" I do, "the source continued
The retired baseball player spent six years with his ex-wife Cynthia scutti, while the singer married Ojani Noah and Chris Judd and then lived with Mark Anthony for 10 years
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”



Number  5
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“!” The new mom to True Thompson then shared a video of herself gifting MJ a bottle of gluten-free Tito’s Vodka, really kicking off the party.”
“Image zoom MJ | Credit: InstagramKhloe Kardashian, 34, also honored the family’s matriarch with a cute selfie captioned, “Happy Birthday my sweet MJ!”
“...that I still remember their home number by heart lol My grandma has a finsta so everyone leave nice comments wishing her a happy birthday Kim added...”
“Image zoom Kendall Jenner and Stormi I saw her be the provider of her family and run her own clothing store my whole life she s battled cancer and beat it twice and she always gives me the realest best advice She s probably the only person on this planet...”
“My grandma is the strongest person I know,” Kim captioned the Instagram post.”
““Happy 84th Birthday to my main idol, my grandma MJ!”
“Kim Kardashian, who was also at the party with her daughter North West, shared a throwback photo of herself as a child with MJ.”
“Of course, MJ did, however, receive a lot of love on her special day.”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“Image zoom Kris Jenner woth Stormi | Credit: InstagramWant all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”


"!" then, real Thompson's new mother shared a video, she gave MJ a bottle of gluten free Tito vodka, really opened the party. "
Photo zoom MJ | photo source: instagram Khloe Kardashian, 34, also commemorates the family's female parents with a lovely self portrait titled "happy birthday, my dear MJ!"
"I still remember their phone number. Haha, my grandmother has a finsta, so everyone left a nice comment and wished her a happy birthday," Kim added
"Image zooming Kendall Jenner and stolmy, I see that she is her family and runs her own clothing store. In my life, she fought against cancer and defeated it twice. She always gives me the most authentic and best advice. She may be the only person on the planet..."
"My grandmother is the strongest person I know," Kim wrote in an instagram post
"Happy 84th birthday to my idol, my grandmother MJ!"
"Kim Kardashian also attended the party with her daughter, North West, and shared a retro photo of her childhood with MJ."
"Of course, MJ did get a lot of love on her special day."
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
Image zooming Chris Jenner worth stommie credit: instagramwant all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blog? "



Number  6
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“MOST READ IN FABULOUS MYSTIC MEG February 10: Love gets deeper as you continue to learn about each other DATING DETOX All the good men over 35 are taken...”
“As far as we know, the Strictly Come Dancing semi-finalist hasn't been asked to sing (or dance) on the big day...”
“We had to stop seeing each other.”
“Speaking about her brief romance with the prince, Caroline said: "‘Once the story got out, that was it.”
“The 38-year-old dated Prince Harry in 2009, while she was a host on Gladiators.”
“Caroline Flack - NFI10 Caroline is now engaged - but was previously linked to Harry Credit: Rex FeaturesCaroline's been busy in her own love life of late, getting engaged to Apprentice star Andrew Brady after just three months of dating.”
“We can imagine the two women being bezzie mates - but sadly, as far as we know, Camilla isn't on the guestlist.”
“Like Meghan, Camilla is an eager charity worker, having worked for the Halo Trust - the mine-clearance charity whose work was promoted by Princess Diana - and has described the actress as "amazing and beautiful".”
“She managed to stay pretty tight-lipped about it on the reality show last year, claiming "a lady never tells" when quizzed during a game of Truth or Dare.”
“...him in Tonteria nightclub in Chelsea...”


"Most people read the mythical mystery of MEG February 10: love gets deeper and deeper as you continue to learn about each other dating detoxification all good men over 35 take..."
"As far as we know, strict dance semifinalists have not yet been asked to sing (or dance) on big days..."
"We can't meet again."
Referring to her brief relationship with the prince, Caroline said, "once the story gets around, that's it."
"The 38 year old girl dated Prince Harry in 2009 when she was the host of the Gladiator."
"Caroline fleck - Caroline is engaged now - but she was previously associated with Harry credit: Rex features that Caroline, who has been busy with her love life recently, is engaged to apprentice star Andrew Brady after just three months of dating."
"We can imagine that these two women are Betsy's partners - but unfortunately, as far as we know, Camilla is not on the guest list."
"Like Megan, Camilla is an enthusiastic philanthropist who worked for the halo trust, a mine clearing charity promoted by Princess Diana, and described the actress as" amazing and beautiful. "
She was tight lipped on last year's reality show, claiming that in a real or bold game she was asked "a lady never says"
“… He's at the tonteria club in Chelsea... "



Number  7
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“'For the desperate princes, it's a race against time to get their women to call a truce,' a palace insider revealed.”
“GLOBE's sensational report reveals Harry and older brother William are at their 'wits end' and can't believe their partner's aren't getting along!”
“GLOBE's royal insider adds Harry has fallen for Meghan's 'Hollywood status', and Meghan is playing a role to keep her man happy.”
“'But, she's worried he's fallen for Meghan for all the wrong reasons.'”
“'Kate adores Harry and wants him to have the family he's always dreamed of,' says a palace insider.”
“With Harry's big day approaching, Kate is terrified he is making the wrong decision!”
“'Kate was shocked to see some of Meghan's sex scenes from her TV series Suits, and was just as horrified as the Queen when Meghan wore a daring top for her engagement photos,' the source tells.”
“GLOBE claims the royal feud exploded when Harry and Meghan announced their engagement, leaving the royal women to become neighbours.”
“'They put on a friendly front when they have to appear at events together, but the truth is they'll never be BFFs.'”
“...a royal insider spills.”


"It's a race against time for desperate princes to have their women declare a truce," a palace insider said
According to the sensational report in the globe, Harry and his brother William are mentally retarded. I can't believe their partners don't get along well
Royal insiders at the globe added that Harry fell in love with Megan's "Hollywood status" and that Megan's role was to make her man happy
"But she was worried that he would fall in love with Megan for the wrong reason."
"Kate adores Harry and wants him to have his dream family," said one palace insider
"Harry's big day is coming. Kate is afraid that he has made a wrong decision!"
"Kate was shocked to see some of Megan's sex scenes in the TV series suit, and she was just as shocked as the queen when Megan took her engagement photo in a bold top," the source said
After Harry and Megan announced their engagement, Royal feuds broke out and royal women became neighbors, the globe said
"When they have to be present together, they put on a friendly gesture, but the fact is that they will never be good friends."
"A royal insider"



Number  8
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Tell us, HollywoodLifers — do you think Kim and Kanye’s baby’s birth will end up being filmed for TV?”
“Kim, on the other hand, is not having any of it.”
“Kim Kardashian, 37, has already admitted that having a surrogate carry her and Kanye West‘s, 40, third child is “so much harder” than personally being pregnant.”
“And it seems Kanye isn’t making things any easier for the reality star.”
“In fact, a new report from InTouch Weekly claims the couple has been fighting constantly in the weeks leading up to their daughter’s arrival, and it’s driving Kim nuts.”
“Their main source of tension?”
“The mag claims Kim wants to film their child’s birth for Keeping Up With The Kardashians, while Kanye is totally against it.”
“Click here to see adorable pics of the Kardashian kids.”
““They’re at loggerheads about the birth being filmed for Keeping Up With The Kardashians,” an insider for the publication told the mag.”
““Kanye’s made it clear that cameras are banned from the delivery room.” On top of that, Kanye reportedly doesn’t even want Kris Jenner, 62, to be there either — apparently he wants to keep things super private and intimate!”


"Tell us, Hollywood actresses - do you think the birth of Kim and Kanye's baby will eventually be made into a TV show?"
"Kim, on the other hand, didn't have any."
"Kim Kardashian, 37, has admitted that getting a surrogate mother to have her third child with Kanye West, 40, is" much more difficult "than getting pregnant herself
"It seems Kanye didn't make it easier for reality TV stars."
"In fact, a new report in touch weekly said the couple had been fighting for weeks before their daughter arrived, which drove Kim crazy."
"What is the main source of their nervousness?"
"The magazine claimed that in order to keep up with the kardashians, King wanted to film the birth of their child, while Kanye was totally against it."
"Click here to see lovely photos of Kardashian's children."
"In order to keep up with the kardashians, they had an argument during the filming of the birth," an insider told the magazine
"Kanye made it clear that cameras are not allowed in the delivery room." In addition, it is reported that Kanye doesn't even want Kris Jenner, 62, in the delivery room - obviously, he wants things to be very private and intimate! "



Number  9
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...to settle down and just isn t in the mindset to get married or have kids...”
“It almost seemed different this time because he was way more affectionate and public with her than he normally is but his friends knew it wouldn t last From PEN 23 Oscar Nominees Reveal The Untold Stories Behind Their Films That s because the source says He s not ready...”
““Leo thought Nina was a super cool girl,” says the source.”
“Their yearlong relationship seemed more serious than some of DiCaprio’s other supermodel romances, but another source close to him say he’s just not ready to take the next step.”
“They remain friends.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“It is amicable.”
““Nina and Leo have parted ways.”
““They broke up a couple of days ago” according to a source close to the couple.”
“The actor and his girlfriend, model Nina Agdal, have called it quits, PEOPLE confirmed on Thursday.”
“Why Leonardo DiCaprio and Nina Agdal Split: 'He's Not Ready to Settle Down'Leonardo DiCaprio isn’t ready to say goodbye to the bachelor life.”


“… Settle down, just don't want to get married and have children... "
"This time it looks almost different, because he is more affectionate and open to her than usual, but his friends know it won't last until the 23rd Oscar nomination unveils the hidden story behind their film, because the source says he's not ready yet..."
"Leo thinks Nina is a super cool girl," the source said
"Their year long relationship seems to be more serious than DiCaprio's other supermodel relationships, but another source close to him said he was just not ready to take the next step."
"They are still friends." Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"It's friendly."
"Nina and Leo are going their separate ways."
"They broke up a few days ago," according to a source close to them
On Thursday, it was confirmed that the actor and his girlfriend, model Nina Agdal, had announced their separation
"Why did Leonardo DiCaprio break up with Nina Agdal:" he's not ready to settle down. "Leonardo DiCaprio is not ready to say goodbye to single life



Number  10
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Share your thoughts and responses in the comments section below!”
“Is Lamar still hung up on Khloe or no?”
“Details!”
“Although Lamar Odom, 38, and Khloe Kardashian‘s, 33, romance has been over for quite a while now, we’re hearing that someone in the reality star’s life isn’t convinced the former NBA star has moved on!”
“According to our insiders, the pregnant Keeping Up with the Kardashians star’s boyfriend Tristan Thompson, 26, is frustrated with Lamar’s behavior.”
““Tristan Thompson is annoyed Lamar Odom seems to be still hung up on Khloe,” a source tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““Tristan wishes Lamar would stop talking about Khloe because they have been over for a long time.”The source went on to add that it isn’t just Tristan that’s steamed over Lamar apparently refusing to move on.”
“Khloe is also struggling to deal with her ex’s behavior.”
““Even Khloe feels like it is time for Lamar to move on and leave what they had in the past,” the source said.”
““Khloe gets uncomfortable every time Lamar does an interview and comments on Khloe’s life.” See more photos of Tristan and Khloe together right here!”


"Share your thoughts and responses in the comments section below!"
"Is Lamar still on Khloe?"
"Details!"
"Although the relationship between Odom, 38, and Kardashian, 33, has been over for a long time, we've heard that some people in the life of the reality TV star don't believe that the former NBA star has left!"
"According to our insiders, Tristan Thompson, the 26 year old boyfriend of the pregnant Kardashian star, was disappointed by Lamar's behavior."
"Tristan Thompson is very angry and Lamar Odom seems to be talking about it," a source told reporters
"Tristan wants Lamar to stop talking about Chloe because they have come to an end for a long time." The source added that it was not just Tristan who was angry with Lamar that he apparently refused to move on
"Khloe is also trying to deal with his ex girlfriend's behavior."
"Even Khloe felt it was time to let Lamar go," the source said
"Every time Lamar interviews and comments on Khloe's life, Khloe feels uncomfortable." Here you can see more photos of Tristan and Khloe together! "



Number  11
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“They alleged, "He lost 35 pounds (15-kilos) in a brief amount of time."”
“Chatting to Globe magazine, one insider claimed: "Johnny looks like walking death."”
“Remember the days when Pirates of Caribbean actor Johnny Depp was Hollywood's most-desired hunk?”
“Well, that ship has well and truly sailed.”
“Now fans are concerned there's something seriously wrong with the 54-year-old.”
“Over the weekend, photos emerged of Johnny posing with fans at the Four Seasons hotel in St Petersburg, Russia.”
“And he looked VERY different.”
“Looking at the snaps, Amber Heard's ex-husband cuts a pale and gaunt figure.”
“Fans were also quick to point out just how much weight he appears to have lost, with many speculating it could be a result of potential illness or stress.”
“Johnny Depp: Then and now← Slide →← Slide →"Is he good health wise?"”


"He lost 35 pounds (15 kilograms) in a short time," they claimed
"Johnny looks like a walking corpse," one person familiar with the matter said in a chat with Globe Magazine
"Remember the days when Johnny Depp, the actor of Pirates of the Caribbean, was the most popular handsome guy in Hollywood?"
"Well, that boat is really going well."
"Now the fans are worried that the 54 year old has serious problems
"Last weekend, there were pictures of Johnny taking pictures with fans at the four seasons hotel in St. Petersburg, Russia."
"He looks very different."
"Looking at the picture, Amber's ex husband looks pale and haggard."
"Fans were quick to point out how much weight he had lost, and a lot of people speculated that it might be caused by potential illness or stress."
"Johnny Depp: was and is he in good health"



Number  12
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Take a look at why we think the real estate guru will overcome his latest health setback.”
“T."As fans show their support online, we can't help but remember the other obstacles Tarek has overcome in recent years.”
“I appreciate all the support.”
“I will stay positive and I will fight to get healthy again.”
“It is going to take a lot of positivity and strength to go through this a second time.”
“The HGTV star continued, "I will be truthful and say I'm very down because of this.”
“"I honestly can't even believe this is happening, I feel like it's a bad dream that I will wake up from."”
“As of today I can barely walk..." Tarek shared online.”
“Last time I hurt my back it took me a year and a half to recover.”
“Truthfully those meds really affected my mental and physical state and changed who I was.”


"See why we think the real estate guru will overcome his recent health setback."
"T." as fans express their support online, we can't help thinking of other obstacles that Tariq has overcome in recent years
"Thank you for your support."
"I'll stay positive and I'll try to get fit."
"It takes a lot of enthusiasm and strength to experience this for the second time."
The HGTV star went on: "I'll tell the truth because I'm depressed about that."
"I can't believe it's going to happen. I think it's a nightmare and I'll wake up from it."
"From today on, I can hardly walk..." Tariq shared on the Internet
"Last time I hurt my back, it took me a year and a half to recover."
"To be honest, these drugs really affected my mental and physical state, changed my self."



Number  13
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Kim showed off her new figure at a Balmain opening in LA last week, wearing a long skirt and a tiny crop top, which further accentuated her shrinking frame.”
“What’s more, she is said to be considering getting Botox, fillers and laser treatments which could end up costing her around $500,000.”
“‘Surgery is always her answer and she has recently undergone a number of figure-sculpting ops, including a boob lift, lipo, upper-arm “fat freezing”, knee tightening and a butt boost,’ the source claims.”
“It’s not just an insane diet that has changed her appearance however, as Kim is said to have undergone surgery to transform her body in recent months.”
“...consisting of sashimi raw fish and brocolli...”
“Kim s obsessed with dropping more weight and won t eat more than 700 calories a day The reality star supposedly lives off of a meagre diet of egg whites and blueberries for breakfast green vegetables for lunch and dinners...”
“‘After those pictures of her bikini body came out, she wanted to crawl under a rock,’ a source told the publication.”
“According to Heat magazine, she has never been more motivated to reach her goal size.”
“The 36-year-old is thought to been motivated to change her shape after unedited photos appeared of her bum while she was on holiday in Mexico last April.”
“Instead of going the regular route of a balanced diet and exercise, Kim is said to be ‘obsessed’ with achieving her goal weight by any means necessary.”


Kim showed off her new figure at an opening ceremony in Balmain, Los Angeles, last week, wearing a long skirt and a little jacket, further highlighting her shrinking figure
"In addition, she is said to be considering Botox injections, fillings and laser treatment, which could eventually cost her about $500000."
"Surgery is always her answer, and she has recently undergone a series of plastic surgeries, including breast augmentation, fat, frozen upper arm fat, knee tightening and hip raising," the source said
"It's not just a crazy diet that has changed her appearance, however, Kim is said to have undergone surgery in recent months."
“… It's made of sashimi and cauliflower... "
"Kim is obsessed with losing weight. He can't eat more than 700 calories a day. Reality TV stars are said to eat protein and blueberries for breakfast and green vegetables for lunch and dinner..."
"After those bikini photos came out, she wanted to climb under the rock," a source told the Wall Street Journal
According to heat magazine, she has never been more motivated to achieve her goals
"After an unedited picture of her butt appeared last April when she was on holiday in Mexico, the 36 year old was considered motivated to change her figure."
"Kim is said not to follow the routine of a balanced diet and exercise, but to be" obsessed "with achieving her target weight by any means necessary."



Number  14
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The pair, founded Pearl Street Films in 2012 and have followed Ghostbusters director Paul Fieg and Michael B Jordan in championing social inclusion within the film industry.”
“The reports first emerged on Thursday and claimed Damon was moving to Australia along with his four daughters and wife, Luciana Barroso.”
“The Daily Telegraph newspaper in Sydney had reported Damon was buying a home in Byron Bay near actor Chris Hemsworth.”
“The two recently appeared in Thor: Ragnarok together.”
“Damon spokeswoman Jennifer Allen said Damon has been to Australia a lot recently.”
“But Damon has not bought a home there nor is he relocating there, she said.”
“The New York Post’s Page Six gossip site, citing an unnamed source, said the Good Will Hunting and Jason Bourne star told friends and colleagues he wanted to leave the country because he disagrees with Mr Trump’s policies.”
“When asked about Damon’s rumoured motivation, Ms Allen wrote in an email, “he’s not moving out of the US”.”
“Damon has publicly supported Democrats, including Mr Trump’s rival in the 2016 presidential election, Hillary Clinton.”
“Damon has previously shown his lack of support for the President.”


"The two founded Pearl Street films in 2012 and have followed the footsteps of Paul FIEG and Michael B Jordan, directors of ghost, to advocate social inclusion in the film industry."
"The reports first appeared on Thursday and claimed Damon would move to Australia with his four daughters and wife, Luciana Barroso."
"The daily telegraph in Sydney reported that Damon bought a house near Byron Bay actor Chris Hemsworth."
"The two recently appeared together in Raytheon: ragnaro."
"Damon's spokesman, Jennifer Allen, said Damon has been going to Australia a lot recently."
"But Damon didn't buy a house there or move," she said
The playful star and Jason Bourne told friends and colleagues that he wanted to leave the United States because he didn't agree with Trump's policy, the gossip website on page 6 of the New York Post quoted an unnamed source as saying
Asked about Damon's motives, Allen wrote in an email: "he won't move out of the United States."
"Damon openly supports the Democratic Party, including Trump's opponent in the 2016 presidential election, Hillary Clinton."
"Damon has previously shown that he lacks support for the president."



Number  15
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed from Getty Images...”
“But after the split with Angelina, he was encouraged to look outside of the Los Angeles fame bubble.”
“...agreed...”
“He is also saying she s the sexiest woman he s ever laid eyes on Brad doesn t want to rub it in Angelina s face Brad and Angelina made a pact when they split that they wouldn t step out with other people until their divorce terms were formally...”
“He is mesmerised by her intellect, her cool philosophy on life and of course their shared love of arts and design.”
“Their chemistry is hot.” After a year of “loneliness,” Brad was ready for Neri: “Brad is besotted with Neri and cannot wait to shout their love from the rooftops.”
“It is very much a meeting of minds first — it is not just physical attraction.”
“This has led to him falling for Neri.”
“For years, he has been content to look within Hollywood for his next girlfriend.”
“And it will probably be a while until Brad even sees the kids, much less introduces them to daddy’s new unicorn lover.”


"Embed from Getty Images..."
"But after breaking up with Angelina, he was encouraged to jump out of the bubble of fame in Losangeles."
“… Agree... "
"He also said she was the sexiest woman he had ever seen and Brad didn't want to smear Angelina's face. When Brad and Angelina broke up, they agreed that they would not associate with other people until the divorce agreement came into effect.... "
"He was fascinated by her intelligence, her calm philosophy of life and their shared love of art and design."
"The chemistry between them is intense." After a year of solitude, Brad is ready to meet Neri: "Brad is fascinated by Neri and can't wait to shout their love on the roof."
"It's an exchange of ideas first, not just physical attraction."
"It made him fall in love with Neri."
"For years, he has been content to find his next girlfriend in Hollywood."
"Brad may have to wait a while to see the kids, let alone introduce them to Dad's new Unicorn lover."



Number  16
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The bulk of which comes from her many endorsement deals with companies like Smart Water, Emirates airline and Aveeno Skincare.”
“Just last year, Aniston was ranked the second-highest paid actress on Forbes' annual list, earning $25.5 million.”
“We're breaking down Aniston and Theroux's multimillion dollar empire below:Together, the A-list pair is estimated to be worth upwards of $240 million, with Jennifer racking up a net worth of $220 million and Justin falling at a more modest $20 million.”
“So how will the breakup impact the health of their individual assets and overall worth?”
“Publicly at least, Jen and Justin have yet to file divorce documents.”
“In a joint statement released Thursday, the now-exes revealed they split at the conclusion of 2017 following a "mutual" decision to "lovingly" call it quits.”
“Jennifer Aniston and Justin Theroux have separated after less than three years of marriage, leaving many to wonder what's at stake financially as the chips fall where they may.”


"Most of it comes from many endorsement agreements she signed with smart water, Emirates and Aveeno skincare."
"Just last year, Aniston ranked second on the Forbes annual list, earning $25.5 million."
"We're destroying the multi million dollar empire of Aniston and seru. Together, it's estimated that the A-class stars are worth more than 240 million dollars, Jennifer's net worth is 220 million dollars, and Justin's worth is down to 20 million dollars
"So how will the breakup affect the health and overall value of their personal assets?"
"At least in public, Jane and Justin haven't filed their divorce papers."
"In a joint statement released on Thursday, the two current ex boyfriends revealed that they broke up at the end of 2017 after the two sides" jointly "decided to announce their breakup" amicably. "
"Jennifer Aniston and Justin seru separated after less than three years of marriage, which makes many people wonder what their financial situation will be like as the chips go down."



Number  17
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She was very taken with that idea."”
“After three seasons of Suits, she called me to say the marriage was over.”
“...decision...”
“Childhood pal Ninaki Priddy opened up about Prince Harry's fiancée, claiming her desire to be famous outweighed her commitment to her marriage to film producer Trevor Engelson.”
“Meghan married her ex back in 2011 on a Jamaican beach.”
“They split two years later after she landed her role in Suits, which filmed in Toronto.”
“Previously it was thought the pair grew apart after Meghan spent months filming in Canada and her beau was based in LA.”
“Ninaki says otherwise.”
“(Image: Getty Images North America)(Image: REX/Shutterstock)"The way she handled it, Trevor definitely had the rug pulled out from under him.”
“He was hurt," she said, explaining that while Trevor was heartbroken, Meghan was less affected," she told Mail Online.”


"She's crazy about the idea."
"After three seasons of suits, she called me and said the marriage was over."
“… Decide... "
Ninaki Priddy, a childhood friend, talked publicly about Prince Harry's fiancee, claiming that her desire for fame exceeded her promise to marry film producer Trevor engelson
"Megan married her ex in Jamaica beach in 2011."
Two years later, she filmed a suit in Toronto and they broke up
"It used to be thought that Megan had been making movies in Canada for months, and her boyfriend was in Los Angeles, and the two split up."
"Ninaki didn't say that."
"(photo source: Getty Images North America) (photo source: Rex / shutterstock)" Trevor's way of handling this must have been to pull the carpet out of his body. "
"He was hurt," she said, explaining that although Trevor was sad, Megan was less affected, "she told email online."



Number  18
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s time for her to move on.””
“It’s no exaggeration to say that Ben broke her heart and left her in a terrible place emotionally, [but] it’s been almost three years since they called it quits.”
“He has reportedly been ‘begging’ her to take him back, but we’ve got an EXCLUSIVE scoop on if he’s really looking to reunite!”
“Ben Affleck, 45, and Jennifer Garner, 45, broke the hearts of fans everywhere when they split in 2015.”
“Despite some hoping they’d work it out, the two filed for divorce in April 2017.”
“Supposedly Ben wasn t ready to let go as Us Weekly reports that since they filed the papers he s begged her to come back several times but she has no interest Though Ben has moved on to date Saturday Night Live producer Lindsay Shookus 37 he was reportedly at...”
“...one point telling friends he wanted his ex back...”
“Despite two years of trying to fix things – Jennifer “put her heart and soul into fixing the relationship and so desperately wanted to turn things around for the children’s sake, as well as theirs,” a fiend told Us – it was all in vain.”
“Supposedly, there was a hopeful moment in 2017.”
“After Jennifer reportedly helped Ben during his stint in rehab for alcohol abuse, a source claims he said, “He didn’t want to live without her.”


"It's time for her to go."
"It's no exaggeration to say that Ben broke her heart and put her in a terrible emotional situation, (but) it's almost three years since they announced their breakup."
"It is reported that he has been 'begging' her to take him back, but we have an exclusive report on whether he really wants to reunite!"
"When Ben Affleck, 45, and Jennifer Garner, 45, broke up in 2015, it broke the hearts of fans everywhere."
"Although some people hoped to solve the problem, they filed for divorce in April 2017."
"According to us weekly, Ben was not ready to let go because they submitted documents and he begged her to come back several times, but she was not interested. Although Ben had already started dating Lindsay shokus, producer of live on Saturday night, it was reported that he was..."
“… One thing is to tell a friend that he wants his ex back... "
"Although it took two years to try to solve the problem - Jennifer" devoted herself to solving the relationship, for the sake of the children, and for them, she wanted to turn the situation around very much, "a demon told us - it was all in vain."
"It should be said that 2017 has a moment of hope."
According to reports, Jennifer helped Ben when he was sent to rehab for drinking too much. It is said that he said, "he doesn't want to be without her."



Number  19
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“?”
“Jenner, meanwhile, is already the mother of six kids.”
“With an actual human being!”
“At age 62!”
“Jenner has been dating Corey Gamble for years now and has made no secret how excited she gets every time one of her kids welcomes a new little boy or girl into the world.”
“So we guess it shouldn't be a complete surprise that she has decided to become a parent herself once again.”
“"Kris simply saw the joy on Kylie and Khloe's faces when they were pregnant," an insider says, labeling Jenner as "jealous" and "curious" about whether she'd be able to procreate at her advanced age.”
“But medicine has come a long way over the past decade or so, and it allegedly didn't take long for Kris to have an answer to this question:Yup, she sure can!”
“Jenner is toward the end of her first trimester, according to sources we are not at liberty to name just yet.”
“She's due to give birth in mid-September.”


“?”
"Meanwhile, Jenna is a mother of six."
"And a real man!"
"62 years old!"
"Jenna has been dating Corey Gambo for many years, and every time a child welcomes a new little boy or girl to the world, she's very excited, there's no denying that."
"So we guess it shouldn't be entirely surprising that she decided to be a parent again."
"Chris just saw the joy on Kelly's and Chloe's face when they were pregnant," said one person familiar with the matter, calling Jenna "jealous" and "curious" about whether she would be able to give birth at an advanced age
"But medicine has made great progress in the past decade or so. It is said that Chris soon found the answer and asked: Yes, of course she can!"
"Jenna's first three months of pregnancy are coming to an end, and according to the source, we can't be named yet."
"She's giving birth in mid September."



Number  20
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“*Update: The TMZ piece now lists anger and substance abuse (in addition to the parenting issues) among the alleged grounds:”
“I request that you please respect my need for gifs during this difficult time, and respond only in such a manner.”
“… I don’t know how to feel about anything anymore.”
“I …RIP Brangelina.”
“Their lovely family brought us all a little bit of joy.”
“Whatever the actual reason, I’m sad for them and even more sad for their brood.”
“Personally, I think those rumors are swirling because a) Cotillard is Pitt’s most recent costar, and b) people have always wanted Brad and Gwynnie to get back together.”
“That “alleged ‘third party'” business may be due to recent tabloid fodder about Brad supposedly being involved with — depending upon which trashy source you read — Marion Cotillard or Gwyneth Paltrow.”
“We’re told there was no alleged ‘third person’ … her decision to file was solely over Brad’s interaction with their children.”
“...methods...”


"* update: TMZ's article now lists the reasons for accusations of anger and drug abuse (except parenting):"
"I ask you to respect my need for gifts in this difficult time and to respond in this way."
“…… I don't know what to think anymore. "
"I Rip Brangelina. "
"Their lovely family has brought us all a little happiness."
"Whatever the reason, I feel sorry for them, even more for their children."
"As far as I'm concerned, I think these rumors are circulating because a) godia is Pete's latest partner and b) people have always wanted Brad and gwyne to get back together."
"The so-called 'third party' business may be due to recent tabloid reports that Brad may have been involved in the activities of Marion godia or Gwyneth Paltrow, depending on which source of rubbish you read."
"We are told that there is no so-called 'third party' She decided to sue because of Brad's interaction with the children
“… Method... "



Number  21
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s a beautiful thing.””
“It’s a dream come true.”The couple was engaged in 2012, split a year later, only to reunite in Australia's Byron Bay over the recent summer holidays.”
“The engagement ring is back on, they’ve moved in together (well, kind of), and now word on the street is that Miley Cyrus and Liam Hemsworth are expecting a baby!”
“In January, just weeks after it was revealed that Miley and Liam were back together after their engagement breakdown in 2013, American magazine Life & Style reported that a friend claimed Miley was going off her birth control pill.”
“At the time, Hollywoodlife.com claimed that “Miley has babies on the brain”.”
“At the time, the reports were dismissed as idle gossip, but now, as more details come to light, it appears the claims are being taken more seriously.”
“Tum-thing to hide, Miley?”
“The usually scantily clad singer has been photographed several times in recent days wearing much frumpier clothes.On most occasions, she has been careful to hide her stomach behind bags or loose-fitting jackets.”
“Australia’s own NW magazine has declared the 23-year-old singer is pregnant with a baby boy and is due in August.”
““[Liam] is over the moon.”


"It's a beautiful thing."
"It's a dream come true." The couple got engaged in 2012 and broke up a year later, but were reunited in Byron Bay, Australia, during the most recent summer vacation
"The engagement ring is on again, they've moved in together (well, sort of), and now there's news on the street that Miley Cyrus and Liam Hemsworth are having a baby!"
"In January this year, just a few weeks after the news that Millie and Liam got back together after their engagement broke down in 2013, life and fashion magazine reported that a friend claimed that Millie was discontinuing contraceptives."
"At that time, Hollywood Life claimed that" Miley has children in her head "
"At the time, these reports were dismissed as gossip, but now, with more details exposed, they seem to be taken more seriously."
"Is there anything to hide, Miley?"
The singer, who is usually poorly dressed, has been photographed several times in recent days wearing sloppy clothes. In most cases, she would carefully hide her stomach behind a bag or loose jacket. "
"Australia's own NW magazine has announced that the 23-year-old singer is pregnant with a boy and is expected to be born in August."
"[Liam] is on the moon."



Number  22
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““They have cameras covering every nook and cranny along with metal detectors and a panic room.””
“35 and Jay 47 are spending a staggering 25 000 a day on safety measures alone...”
“Jay Z had Obama s team take a look at the blueprints for their Malibu renta l and tell him exactly what they would ve changed if Barack and Michelle were staying there says a source who estimates that Bey...”
“Beyoncé and Jay-Z asked longtime pal former President Barack Obama’s secret service detail to help protect their family after welcoming twins Rumi and Sir last month.”
“They’ve got 99 problems, but security ain’t one!”


"Their cameras cover every corner and crevice, as well as metal detectors and an emergency room."
"Jay, 35 and 47, spent a staggering $25000 a day on security alone..."
"Jay z asked Obama's team to take a look at the blueprint for their Malibu apartment and tell him what changes they would make if Barack and Michelle stayed there," a source said, estimating bey
"Beyonce and Jez asked their old friend, former President Barack Obama's secret service, to help protect their family after they welcomed the twins, rummy and jazz, last month."
"They have 99 problems, but safety is not a problem!"



**Something goes wrong**
“— ye (@kanyewest) April 25, 2018The rapper also took potshots at Obama during the tweeting flurry, stating that nothing changed in Chicago during his presidency.”
“I don't agree 100% with anyone but myself.”
“...of social media appreciation between Trump and the President...”
“6 Kanye and Trump pose together at Trump Tower the day after the 2016 US election Credit AP Associated Press 6 Kanye has never hidden his love for the US President and even embraced him at Trump Tower Credit AFP or licensors Their most recent display of affection follows years...”
“The President replied saying the rapper was "very cool".”
“Calling Trump "my brother," he claimed they both have "dragon energy".”
“Kris working hard today pic.twitter.com/dBwLcd2Ijo — fake georgia (@lemonadenormani) April 25, 2018Kanye proved his bromance with Donald Trump is still going strong yesterday in a series of tweets.”
“...i love this song pic.twitter.com/BVMCYInuH0 — mani (@marasmeIody) April 25, 2018Khloe, Kylie and Kourtney all unfollowed Kanye.”
“...all unfollowed kanye!”
“6 The rapper has broken a year-long absence from Twitter in spectacular fashion Credit: Splash News6 Kylie Jenner has also snubbed the musician Credit: Getty Images - Gettyjaden smith, rihanna, harry styles, justin bieber, the weeknd, kendrick lamar etc.”


"- Ye (@ kanyewest) on April 25, 2018, the rapper also launched a fierce attack on Obama on twitter, claiming that there was no change in Chicago during his presidency."
"I don't totally agree with anyone but myself."
“…… Social media appreciation between trump and the President... "
"6 Kanye and trump took a picture in trump building the day after the 2016 US election. Credit associated press 6 Kanye never concealed his love for the president of the United States, and even hugged him in trump building credit union or license issuer. Their family show in recent years..."
The president said rapper "cool"
He called trump "my brother" and claimed that they all had "Dragon Energy"
"Chris is working hard today pic.twitter.com/dBwLcd2Ijo -Fake Georgia (@ lemonadenormani) on April 25, 2018, Kanye proved on a series of tweets that his relationship with Donald Trump is still good
“… I like this song pic.twitter.com/BVMCYInuH0 -Mani (@ marasmeiody) on April 25, 2018, Khloe, Kylie and Kourtney did not pay attention to Kanye. "
“… No one's following Kanye! "
"6 the rapper broke the spectacular fashion credit that she had been absent from twitter for a year: splash news6 and Kelly Jenner ignored the musician's credit: Getty Jaden Smith, Rihanna, Harry stiles, Justin Bieber, weekly, Kendrick Lamar and so on."



Number  24
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“What’s your fave thing he did this week?”
“Harry looked hotter than ever while performing “Sign of the Times,” “Carolina” and “Ever Since New York” for the crowd, and he totally proved he can own that stage, even without his One Direction band mates.”
“With new music, appearances and more, Harry was everywhere.”
“Here’s why we picked him!”
“Harry Styles, 23, is having what’s sure to be one of the best weeks of his life…and HollywoodLife.com is naming him our Star of the Week because of it.”
“The first reason, of course, is because of the release of his very first solo album, Harry Styles.”
“Just a month and a half after he announced he’d be putting out solo music, Harry dropped his debut record, and it immediately soared to the top of the charts.”
“Fans are going completely crazy over the album’s ten songs, and we couldn’t be prouder of the 23-year-old!”
“Aside from putting out a record, Harry also started doing solo public appearances to promote the music.”
“Fans started lining up for his Today Show concert almost TWO full days in advance, and the crowd went on for SIX New York City blocks when he took the stage on May 9.”


"What do you like best about what he did this week?"
"Harry looks hotter than ever when he performs" the symbol of the times "," Carolina "and" since New York. "He has proved that he can own the stage, even without his one-way band partner."
"With new music, new images and so on, Harry is everywhere."
"That's why we chose him!"
"Harry stiles, 23, is having the best week of his life And Hollywood Life Network, so he was named this week's star
"The first reason, of course, is the release of his first solo album, Harry stiles."
"Just a month and a half after he announced that he would release solo music, Harry gave up his first record, which immediately soared to the top of the charts."
"Fans are crazy about the ten songs on this album. We are very proud of this 23-year-old fan!"
"In addition to releasing records, Harry also began to appear in public alone to promote music."
Fans lined up for his "today's show" almost two days in advance. By the time he appeared on May 9, the audience had already lined up for six blocks



Number  25
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““She’s so happy and proud.””
““Jessica said she would not have missed the opening for anything and she’s always believed in her dad,” an insider told Page Six.”
“Ranging in price from $500 to $5000, the collection of 50 digitally enhanced portraits also includes never-before-seen images of Ashlee’s son Bronx, 7, and Jessica’s daughter Maxwell, 4, and son Ace, 2, with 10% of proceeds benefitting Adopt the Arts Foundation.”
“While sipping from flutes of Freixenet cava, Simpson’s friends and family – including both his daughters and their husbands Evan Ross (wed to Ashlee) and Eric Johnson (married to Jessica) – fêted the 58-year-old with a gallery opening Sunday at the Bruce Lurie Gallery in Culver City, Calif.”
“The songstress sisters acted as muses – and models — in dad Joe Simpson’s first art show titled “Dreams Work,” which showcases the former music manager’s collection of original photographs.”
“Click to email this to a friend (Opens in new window)Click to share on Twitter (Opens in new window)Click to share on Facebook (Opens in new window)Jessica Simpson and Ashlee Simpson have been immortalized in the fine arts.”


"She's so happy, so proud."
"Jessica says she won't miss any of the opening ceremonies, and she has always believed in her father," one person familiar with the matter told page 6
"The 50 digitally enhanced portraits range in price from $500 to $5000. They also include unseen photos of Ashley's 7-year-old son Bronx, Jessica's 4-year-old daughter Maxwell and her 2-year-old son ace. 10% of the revenue comes from the art foundation."
Simpson's friends and family, including his daughter and husband Evan Ross (married to Ashley) and Eric Johnson (married to Jessica), held an art exhibition for the 58 year old at Bruce Lurie Gallery in Culver, California, which opened on Sunday
"At Dad Joe Simpson's first art exhibition called DreamWorks, the female singers and sisters played the role of Muses and models. This exhibition shows the original photo collection of the former music manager."
"Click to send this email to a friend (open in a new window) Click to share on twitter (open in a new window) Click to share on Facebook (open in a new window) Jessica Simpson and Ashley Simpson have become famous in the art world."



Number  26
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The hit revival of her show was immediately cancelled, and a reboot minus the controversial comedian will replace it.”
“...racist Twitter rant in May...”
“She wants to give her side of the story in a casual setting and reassure people she s not the pariah she s made out to be As Radar readers are well aware Barr faced a swift comeuppance after her...”
“Now a source tells Radar exclusively Barr is asking Seinfeld to consider having her as guest on his show Comedians In Cars Getting Coffee.”
“CK”
“Try refreshing your browser or Roseanne Barr begs Jerry Seinfeld for career comeback help Back to video Seinfeld has famously stood by a few fellow funnymen who ve found themselves on the blacklist like co star Michael Richards and Louis...”
“...tap here to see other videos from our team.”
““He’s respected for being generous, honest and kind.”We apologize, but this video has failed to load.”
““Jerry’s word carries a lot of weight in Hollywood,” an insider told Radar.”
“...current mess...”


Her rebroadcast of the hit show was immediately cancelled and reopened with a controversial comedian missing to replace it
“… Racists tweeted in May
"She wants to tell her story in a casual context, and assure people that she is not the pariah she said, because radar readers know that Barr is facing rapid retribution after her..."
"Now a source told us that Barr asked Seinfeld to consider having her as a guest on his show comedian drinking coffee in the car."
"CK company"
"Try refreshing your browser, or Rosanna Barr asks for the return of Jerry Seinfeld's career. Back in the video, Seinfeld has been standing next to several interesting guys who find themselves blacklisted like co stars Michael Richards and Louis..."
“… Click here to see other videos of our team. "
"He is respected for his generosity, honesty and kindness." We apologize, but this video failed to load
"Jerry's words have a lot of weight in Hollywood," one industry source told radar
“… The current chaos... "



**Something goes wrong**
“We are all so lucky to have you in our lives…””
“Your kindness and generosity is never taken for granted.”
“HL learned she loves seeing A-Rod with his girls & her twins — but does she want kids NOW?”
“Although Alex Rodriguez, 42, and Jennifer Lopez, 48, each have two kids of their own, J.Lo has apparently been thinking about having one more baby as a couple.”
“This past Father’s Day especially got her thinking about the future, as Alex’s sweet relationship with his daughters made a major impact on her.”
“Jennifer herself has 10-year-old twins Emme and Max, while Alex is the proud father of daughters Ella, 10, and Natasha, 13.”
“And not only does Jennifer love Alex as a partner, she adores seeing him with the kids.”
““Jen and Alex are the real thing.”
“They have found a love for each other that is very strong and very amazing for them both,” a source close to Jennifer shared with HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““During Father’s Day she saw a certain side of Alex that impressed her, and seeing all along the father that Alex is has her thinking about maybe trying for one more with Alex.” How sweet is that?”


"We are all lucky to have you in our lives..."
"Your kindness and generosity have never been taken for granted."
"HL knows she likes to see A-Rod with his daughters and her twins, but does she want to have children now?"
"Although Alex Rodriguez, 42, and Jennifer Lopez, 48, each have two children, J
"The father's day just passed made her think about the future, because Alex's sweet relationship with her daughters had a great impact on her."
Jennifer herself has 10-year-old twins Amy and Max, while Alex is the proud father of her daughters Ella and Natasha, who are 10 and 13 years old respectively
"Not only does Jennifer like Alex as a partner, she also likes to see him with the kids."
"Jane and Alex are real."
"They found a very strong love for each other, which is amazing for both of them," a source close to Jennifer told reporters
"On father's day, she saw the side of Alex that impressed her. Seeing that Alex had always been a father, she thought maybe she could try again with Alex." How sweet is that? "



**Something goes wrong**
“A photo posted by Ellen (@theellenshow) on Jan 19, 2017 at 11:05am PST”
“Insiders indicate that Ellen loves to control and micro-manage every aspect of Portia’s life.”
“The daytime talk show host gushed about how beautiful Portia is after her People’s Choice Awards this past week.”
“Ellen and Portia have been struggling to keep their marriage alive these last few months.”
“And now Ellen is apparently trying to squash divorce buzz, despite ongoing media reports about their troubled marriage.”
“Ellen gushed about Portia to reporters backstage at the People’s Choice Awards.”
“In an interview with ET Online, Ellen joked, “It’s such an accident because she normally doesn’t look beautiful like that.” Was Ellen’s joke a backhanded compliment?”
“Did Portia take her comments the wrong way?”
“That’s what fans want to know.”
“Previous reports indicate that Ellen DeGeneres and Portia de Rossi have been dealing with marital issues for months now.”


"Ellen (@ theEllenShow) photos posted at 11:05 am on January 19, 2017"
"Insiders say Allen likes to control and micromanage every aspect of Portia's life."
"The daytime talk show host talked about Portia's beauty after winning the people's Choice Award last week."
"Ellen and Portia have been trying to keep their marriage together for months."
"Now, despite constant media coverage of their marital problems, Allen is obviously trying to quell the rumors of divorce."
"Behind the people's Choice Awards ceremony, Alan talked to reporters about Portia."
In an interview with ET online, Allen joked: "it's a surprise because she doesn't usually look as beautiful." Is Ellen's joke a rhetorical compliment
"Did Portia misunderstand her words?"
"That's what fans want to know."
"Previous reports have shown that Ellen DeGeneres and Portia de Rossi have been dealing with their marriage for months."



**Something goes wrong**
“February 2019 The Duke and Duchess of Sussex visit the Kasbah of the Udayas near the Moroccan capital Rabat AFP via Getty Prince Harry and Meghan Markle in pictures March 2019 Prince Harry and Meghan speak on stage during WE Day UK 2019 at The SSE Arena in London Getty...”
“Getty Prince Harry and Meghan Markle in pictures November 2018 Prince William Duke of Cambridge and Catherine Duchess of Cambridge Prince Harry Duke of Sussex and Meghan Duchess of Sussex at a service marking the centenary of WW1 armistice at Westminster Abbey Getty Prince Harry and Meghan Markle in pictures...”
“Prince Harry Meghan Markle Catherine Duchess of Cambridge and Prince William at the first annual Royal Foundation Forum in London...”
“The reception celebrated youth achievements marking Scotlands Year of Young People 2018 an initiative that aims to inspire Scotland through its young people celebrating their achievements strengthening their voice on social issues and creating new opportunities for them to shine AFP Prince Harry and Meghan Markle in pictures February 2018”
“Meghan Markle walk through the corridors of the Palace of Holyroodhouse on their way to a reception for young people in Edinburgh...”
“...day showcasing the rich culture and heritage of Wales AFP via Getty Prince Harry and Meghan Markle in pictures January 2018 The couple watching a dance performance by Jukebox Collective during their to Cardiff Castle AFP via Getty Prince Harry and Meghan Markle in pictures February 2018 Prince Harry and...”
“The Reprezent training programme was established in Peckham in 2008 in response to the alarming rise in knife crime to help young people develop and socialise through radio Getty Prince Harry and Meghan Markle in pictures January 2018 Meghan Markle greets well wishers on arrival at Cardiff Castle for a...”
“Reprezent 107 3FM in Pop Brixton...”
“Duke of Cambridge Prince Philip Duke of Edinburgh Catherine Duchess of Cambridge Meghan Markle and Prince Harry attend Christmas Day Church service at Church of St Mary Magdalene in King s Lynn Getty Prince Harry and Meghan Markle in pictures January 2018 Prince Harry and Meghan during a visit to...”
“Markle pose for a photograph in the Sunken Garden at Kensington Palace following the announcement of their engagement AFP Getty Prince Harry and Meghan Markle in pictures November 2017 Meghan Markle shows off her engagement ring AFP via Getty Prince Harry and Meghan Markle in pictures December 2017 Prince William...”
“October 2018 The Duke and Duchess of Sussex meet with lifeguards at South Melbourne Beach...”
“Dubbo Regional Airport in Dubbo AFP via Getty Prince Harry and Meghan Markle in pictures October 2018 Harry and his wife Meghan watch aboriginal dances at Victoria Park in Dubbo AFP via Getty Prince Harry and Meghan Markle in pictures...”
“...in Edinburgh...”
“...during their to Cardiff Castle AFP via Getty Prince Harry and Meghan Markle in pictures February 2018 Prince Harry and Meghan Markle walk through the corridors of the Palace of Holyroodhouse on their way to a reception for young people...”
“...greets well wishers on arrival at Cardiff Castle for a day showcasing the rich culture and heritage of Wales AFP via Getty Prince Harry and Meghan Markle in pictures January 2018 The couple watching a dance performance by Jukebox Collective...”
“The Reprezent training programme was established in Peckham in 2008 in response to the alarming rise in knife crime to help young people develop and socialise through radio Getty Prince Harry and Meghan Markle in pictures January 2018 Meghan Markle...”
“Church service at Church of St Mary Magdalene in King s Lynn Getty Prince Harry and Meghan Markle in pictures January 2018 Prince Harry and Meghan during a visit to Reprezent 107 3FM in Pop Brixton...”
“Markle shows off her engagement ring AFP via Getty Prince Harry and Meghan Markle in pictures December 2017 Prince William Duke of Cambridge Prince Philip Duke of Edinburgh Catherine Duchess of Cambridge Meghan Markle and Prince Harry attend Christmas Day...”
“Meghan Markle in pictures November 2017 Prince Harry and Meghan Markle pose for a photograph in the Sunken Garden at Kensington Palace following the announcement of their engagement AFP Getty Prince Harry and Meghan Markle in pictures November 2017 Meghan...”
“It was created by the Duke of Sussex and aims to use the power of sport to inspire recovery support rehabilitation and generate a wider understanding of all those who serve their country Invictus Games Foundation Getty Prince Harry and...”


"In February 2019, the Duke and Duchess of Sussex visited Kasbah in udayas near Rabat, the capital of Morocco. AFP, via Getty, Prince Harry and Megan markel, in March 2019, Prince Harry and Megan speak on the stage of we day UK 2019 at the SSE arena in Getty, London... "
"Prince Gerty Harry and Megan markel in November 2018 Prince William, Duke of Cambridge and Catherine, Duchess of Cambridge Prince Harry, Duke of Sussex and Duchess of Megan markel in Westminster Abbey to commemorate the 100th anniversary of the armistice of the first World War..."
"Prince Harry Megan Marcel Catherine, Duchess of Cambridge, and Prince William at the first annual forum of the Royal foundation in London..."
"The reception celebrates the youth achievements of the 2018 Scottish youth year, which aims to inspire Scotland by celebrating their achievements, strengthen their voice in social issues, create new opportunities for them, and let them shine in the photos of Prince Harry and Megan markel of AFP in February 2018."
"Megan markel is on her way to a youth reception in Edinburgh, through the hallway of holly house palace..."
“… Display of Welsh rich culture and Heritage Day - AFP - through pictures of Prince Getty Harry and Megan markel - January 2018 - the couple watched a collective dance performance of the jukebox on their way to Cardiff Castle - AFP - through pictures of Prince Getty Harry and Megan markel - February 2018 - Prince Harry and... "
"The reprezent training program was set up in Peckham in 2008 to cope with the alarming growth of knife crime, help young people develop and socialize through Prince gattihari radio and Megan markel photo radio, and Megan markel paid tribute to the benefactors when she arrived at Cardiff Castle in January 2018
"Reprezent 107 3FM in pop Brixton..."
"Prince Philip, Duke of Cambridge, Catherine, Duke of Edinburgh, Duchess of Cambridge Megan markel and Prince Harry attend the christmas church service in King Lynn Getty's St Mary Magdalene church. Prince Harry and Megan markel are on a visit in January 2018..."
"Mark is taking a picture in the sunken garden of Kensington Palace. After they announced their engagement, the picture shows Getty Harry and Megan mackle. In November 2017, Megan mackle shows her engagement ring through the picture of Getty Harry and Megan mackle. Prince William in December 2017..."
"In October 2018, the Duke and Duchess of Sussex met with lifeguards on the South Beach of Melbourne..."
"Photo taken by Prince Harry and Megan markel at Dublin Regional Airport in October 2018, Harry and his wife Megan watched aboriginal dance in Dublin Victoria Park through photos taken by Prince Harry and Megan markel..."
“… In Edinburgh... "
“…… In February 2018, Prince Harry and Megan markel are on their way to Cardiff Castle, crossing the hallway of holly rhodhaus palace to the youth reception... "
“…… Welcome to Cardiff Castle for a day to show the rich culture and heritage of Wales through the pictures of Getty Prince Harry and Megan markel. AFP in January 2018, the couple watched the dance performance of jukebox collective.... "
"The reprezent training program was set up in Peckham in 2008 to deal with the alarming growth of knife crime and help young people through Prince GATY Harry radio and Megan markel photo radio in January 2018 Megan markel..."
"Prince Harry and Megan Markle in Lynn Getty's photo of church service at King Mary Magdalene Church in January 2018 when Prince Harry and Megan visited reprezent 107 3FM in popbrixton..."
"Marcel shows her engagement ring through Getty Harry and Megan markel in December 2017 Prince William, Prince Philip, Duke of Edinburgh Catherine, Duchess of Cambridge Megan markel and Prince Harry attend Christmas..."
"In November 2017, after Megan markel announced their engagement, Prince Harry and Megan markel took photos in the sunken garden of Kensington Palace. In November 2017, Megan... "
"It was founded by the Duke of Sussex to use the power of sports to motivate rehabilitation, support rehabilitation, and let all those who serve for the national inviolable game foundation know more about Prince Getty Harry and..."



**Something goes wrong**
“MORE : Brad Pitt’s mum ‘so happy’ he’s back in touch with Jennifer Aniston as pair have ‘secret meeting’”
“If you've got a celebrity story, video or pictures get in touch with the Metro.co.uk entertainment team by emailing us celebtips@metro.co.uk, calling 020 3615 2145 or by visiting our Submit Stuff page - we'd love to hear from you.”
“It comes as he apparently also enjoyed a ‘secret meeting’ with ex-wife Jennifer Aniston, following her split with Justin Theroux.”
“There’s so much to unpack here.”
“Anyway, according to Entertainment Tonight, Brad has been dating women ‘not in the public eye’ as he tried to keep his private life just that.”
“A source explained to the website He s very private about who he s seeing but he does continue to casually date Angelina and Brad announced their shock separation in 2016 Picture Matt Sayles Invision AP File The insider told Entertainment Tonight the father of six Shiloh 11 Maddox 16”
“Vivienne nine Zahara 13 Pax 14 and Knox nine has made changes in his life since he and Ange parted ways...”
“AdvertisementAdvertisement‘When they first split he spent a lot of time at home and was often very down about what was going on.”
“He was a homebody for many months, but in the last month or two, he’s been going out more,’ they said.”
“‘He enjoys going out to eat with close friends.’Sounds like a blast.”


"More: Brad Pitt's mother is" very happy "that he has contacted Jennifer Aniston again because of their" secret meeting. "
"If you have celebrity stories, videos or pictures, please email us with Metro entertainment team at: celebtips@metro.co.uk , please call 020 3615 2145 or visit our submission page - we are glad to hear from you. "
"After he broke up with his ex-wife, Jennifer Aniston, he obviously liked to meet her in secret."
"There's too much to open here."
"Anyway, according to entertainment tonight, Brad has been dating women, but" out of the public eye "because he has been trying to keep his private life
"A source explained to the website that he was very secretive about the people he met, but he did continue to date casually. Angelina and Brad announced a shocking picture of their separation in 2016. Matt sels, an associated press source, told entertainment that Shiloh 11 Maddox 16, the father of six children tonight
"Vivienne nine Zahara 13 Pax 14 and Knox nine changed his life after he and ange parted ways..."
"When they broke up for the first time, he stayed at home for a long time and was often frustrated by what happened."
"He's been at home for months, but in the last month or two, he's gone out more often," they said
"He likes to eat out with close friends." It sounds exciting



**Something goes wrong**
“Their Son, Jack Pratt, Was Born Premature in 2012The couple welcomed their first and only child, Jack Pratt, in August 2012.”
“3.”
“I feel really lucky.”Pratt and Faris have continued to act alongside one another, co-starring in What’s Your Number?”
“The Scary Movie actress told People magazine that it was a small ceremony and that her new husband was “A great guy.”
“2017-05-11T20:00:03.000ZFaris divorced Indra in 2008, and she and Pratt were married the following year in Bali, Indonesia.”
“Subscribe to Harper's Bazaar: bit.ly/SUBSCRIBEtoBAZAAR facebook.com/HarpersBazaar twitter.com/harpersbazaarus America's first fashion magazine, Harper's Bazaar has showcased the visions of legendary editors, photographers and stylists since 1867.”
“The day that she told me she was leaving her husband, I knew that I was going to marry her.”Chris Pratt and Anna Faris’ Cutest MomentsCould Chris Pratt and Anna Faris be any cuter?”
“But we were, I think, developing feelings for each other at the time, you know?”
“So we were friends, and I was there for her… We never crossed the line.”
“We were friends first, but she left her husband at the end of the movie, and we started dating when we were back in L.A.”


"Their son, Jack Pratt, was born prematurely in 2012. The couple had their first and only child, Jack Platt, in August 2012
“3.”
"I feel really lucky." Pratt and Faris continue to work side by side, CO starring in "what's your number?"
The horror movie actress told people it was a little ceremony and that her new husband was "a great man."
"2017-05-11t20:00:03.000z Faris divorced Indra in 2008, and the following year she married Pratt in Bali, Indonesia."
"Subscribe to Harper Fair: bit.ly/ Berto Bazar facebook.com/HarpersBazaartwitter As the first American fashion magazine, Harper's bazaar has demonstrated the vision of legendary editors, photographers and stylists since 1867
"The day she told me she was leaving her husband, I knew I was going to marry her." Will Chris Platt and Anna Faris be more lovely when they are loveliest? "
"But, I think, we were developing feelings for each other, you know?"
"So we're friends, and I'm by her side We've never crossed the line. "
"We were friends first, but she left her husband at the end of the movie, and we started dating when we got back to Los Angeles."



**Something goes wrong**
““The fact that Angelina has transcended the way the world objectified her and is making serious films, she deserves all the positive things that are happening.””
““She’s taken all that energy and turned that into being a substantive human being,” the Before Sunrise star noted.”
“I loved her for it.”Hawke praised the Unbroken director for her work as a humanitarian.”
“She was about as punk rock as a movie star could be.”
“They wanted her to burn out.”
“People wanted her to be Marilyn Monroe.”
““It’s pretty awesome what she’s doing.”
““I worked with her at a very interesting moment in her life,” Hawke, 44, recalled.”
“A year later, the Lara Croft: Tomb Raider actress would meet the love of her life Pitt, with whom she would eventually share six children.”
“In 2003 (when Taking Lives was filmed), Jolie had recently filed for divorce from Billy Bob Thornton and was raising her eldest son Maddox, then 2, on her own.”


"In fact, Angelina has gone beyond the way the world materializes her and is making serious movies. She deserves all the positive things that are happening."
"She absorbed all the energy and turned it into a real person," said the pre sunrise star
Hawke praised the perfect director for his humanitarian work
"She's punk rock like a movie star."
"They want to exhaust her."
"People want her to be Marilyn Monroe."
"What she did was wonderful."
"When I worked with her, it was a very interesting moment in her life," recalls Hawke, 44
A year later, the actress in Tomb Raider: Laura Croft will meet her lifelong love Pete, who will eventually have six children
"In 2003, Julie recently filed for divorce from Billy Bob Thornton and raised her eldest son, Maddox, who was then two years old



**Something goes wrong**
“The half-hour, behind-the-scenes companion will focus on Joanna’s process to create the designs in each Fixer Upper episode.”
“As previously announced, Joanna and Chip will star in new spinoff series Fixer Upper: Behind the Design, slated to premiere in May.”
“The new season also will feature special guests, including former First Lady Laura Bush and ex-football player Tim Tebow.”
“The 19-episode Season 5 will feature more families who look to the Gaineses for help evaluating and transforming a fixer -upper into the home of their dreams.”
“Fixer Upper follows Chip and Joanna as they fix up homes in their hometown of Waco, TX.”
“Stars Joanna and Chip Gaines confirmed last month on their home-design business website Magnolia that the remodeling series, which drew more than 27.5 million viewers during its previous run, would end after the upcoming season.”
“HGTV has slotted 9 PM Tuesday, November 21, for the fifth and final season of its hit series Fixer Upper.”


"The half-hour behind the scenes accompaniment will focus on Joanna's creative design process in each episode of fixer."
"As announced earlier, Joanna and chip will star in the new derivative series fixer- Upper:Behind-the-Design It's due to premiere in May
"There will be special guests in the new season, including former first lady Laura Bush and former footballer Tim Talbot."
"In the fifth season of episode 19, more families are looking forward to Gaines' help in evaluating and transforming a shoe upper to become their dream home."
"Fixer upper is following chip and Joanna to repair their home in Waco, Texas."
"Stars Joanna and chip Gaines confirmed last month on their home design business website Magnolia that the remake series, which attracted more than 27.5 million viewers last season, will end in the coming season."
"HGTV will air the fifth and final season of the hit series fix upper at 9pm on Tuesday, November 21."



Number  34
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Share your reactions in the comments section below!”
“Are you hoping Selena and her mother reconcile soon?”
“However, she added: “Selena can live her life however she wants as long as she is happy, safe and healthy.”HollywoodLifers, what do YOU think?”
“As we previously reported, Mandy told Gossip Cop that she’s “not happy” that Selena is once again dating the “Love Yourself” crooner.”
“Selena made that crystal clear, and told Mandy in no uncertain terms that unless she can accept Justin, Selena has nothing to say to her—so the ball’s firmly in Mandy’s court.” That’s pretty serious language!”
““They fell out over Selena allowing Justin back into her life again, and as far as Selena is concerned, her relationship with Justin is not up for debate, so either her mom needs to accept it, or butt out.”
“...order...”
“Selena is definitely ready to build bridges with her mom again but she s waiting for her to make the first move The source went on to add that it all comes down to Sel s mother accepting that the singer is giving Justin another shot which is a tall...”
““Selena and Mandy have always been super tight, and over the years they’ve had a number of blow-ups, but they’ve always managed to resolve everything after some time apart.”
“Head here for more pics of Selena with her mother!”


"Share your reaction in the comments section below!"
"Do you want Serena and her mother to make up soon?"
However, she added: "as long as she is happy, safe and healthy, Selena can live as she likes."
"As we reported earlier, Mandy told gossip police that she was" not happy "that Serena was dating her" love yourself "singer again
"Serena made it very clear and told Mandy unequivocally that unless she could accept Justin, Serena had nothing to say to her, so the ball was firmly on Mandy's court." This is very serious wording! "
"They quarrel because Selena lets Justin return to his life. As far as Selena is concerned, her relationship with Justin is not worth arguing, so either her mother needs to accept it or shut up."
“… Command
"Serena is definitely ready to bridge with her mother again, but she is waiting for her to take the first step. The source added that it all comes down to Serena's mother accepting another shot from the singer to Justin, which is a high..."
"Serena and Mandy have always been very close, and they have had a lot of revelations over the years, but after a period of separation, they can always solve everything."
"Come here and take more pictures of Selena and her mother!"



Number  35
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““My little one is very, very generous and very sensitive,” Holmes said, according to People.”
“Numerous reports describe Suri as an intelligent, kind-hearted girl, with Holmes herself opening up about her daughter’s philanthropic heart in a 2015 interview with Today.”
““She’s slowly warming up to the idea of a reunion,” an insider told the Star.”
“But Holmes also was torn because she wants to do what’s best for Suri.”
“...controversial self styled religious organization the Star reported...”
“He s dying to be a part of her life Holmes isn t a fan of a reunion given that she agreed to stay quiet about Cruise and Scientology if he agreed to stay away from their daughter and not try to brainwash her into becoming a part of the...”
“He’s had to watch from afar as Suri grew into a lovely young lady, and he regrets that he’s missed out on so much.”
““But Tom’s tired of being bossed around by them.”
““Tom is a loyal Scientologist, so when church leaders told him he couldn’t see Suri, he didn’t question it,” an insider told the Star.”
“According to Hollywood Life, citing a report by Star magazine, Cruise ached over the fact that he had been an absent father and not seen his daughter in more than five years, because his Church of Scientology bosses told him he couldn’t see her.”


"My child is very, very generous, very sensitive," Holmes said, according to people
"Many reports describe Suri as a smart and kind-hearted girl, and Sherlock Holmes himself disclosed her daughter's charity in an interview with today magazine in 2015."
"She's slowly becoming interested in the idea of reunion," a person familiar with the matter told the star
"But Holmes was torn, too, because she wanted to do the best for Suri."
“…… Star, a controversial self styled religious organization
"He longed to be a part of her life. Holmes didn't like reunion because she agreed to keep silent with cruise and Scientology. If he agreed to stay away from their daughter, he didn't want to brainwash her to become It's part of the story. "
"He had to watch Suri grow into a lovely young woman from a distance. He regretted missing so much."
"But Tom is fed up with them."
"Tom is a loyal Scientologist, so when church leaders told him he couldn't see Suri, he didn't question it," a source told sky
"According to a report in Star Magazine quoted by Hollywood life daily, cruise felt sad that he was an absent father and had not seen his daughter for more than five years, because his Scientology boss told him that he could not see his daughter."



Number  36
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Again, the report was false.”
“The "War Machine" star and the "Horrible Bosses" actress reportedly "decided to make their reconciliation official by exchanging vows during a romantic and super-secret getaway to Paris."”
“According to Radar Online, the "Cake" star wanted to get back with Justin Theroux after failing to reconcile with Brad Pitt.”
“"Jen wants Justin to reconsider the split, even it's only for a trial period," an unidentified source told the publication.”
“"Jen’s done a lot of meditating and says she forgives Justin for messing her around so badly.”
“She's keen to move on and forge a good relationship with him, instead of arguing over money or slinging mud back and forth among their mutual friends," the alleged insider continued.”
“"Right now if he'd give her another chance she'd take him back in a heartbeat."”
“Gossip Cop has debunked the report.”
“According to the publication, Aniston and Pitt haven't seen each other for ages, so the report claiming that the "Friends" alum was trying to "rekindle" their romance is "patently false."”
“In addition, it is unlikely for Aniston to get back to Theroux regardless of the status of her love life because she is already moving on.”


"The report is still false."
According to reports, the star of "war machine" and the actress of "boss of terror" have "decided to exchange vows during a romantic and super secret trip to Paris in order to achieve reconciliation."
According to radar online, the cake star hopes to make up with Justin Theroux after failing to reconcile with Brad Pitt
"Jennifer wants Justin to reconsider breaking up, even if it's just a trial period," an unidentified source told the magazine
"Jane meditated a lot and said she forgives Justin for making such a mess of her."
"She's keen to continue to build a good relationship with him instead of arguing over money or throwing mud back and forth between their mutual friends," the alleged insider continued
"Now if he gives her another chance, she will bring him back immediately."
"The gossip police exposed the report."
According to the publication, Aniston and Pitt haven't seen each other for a long time, so the report that the alumni of "friends" tried to "rekindle" their relationship is "obviously false"
"In addition, Aniston is unlikely to return to the terrace regardless of her love life, because she is already moving on."



Number  37
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“"Bryan and Sandra live together, and he helps with Sandra's kids like they are his own."”
“"They enjoy the simple and quiet times together," the source adds, noting that they've taken a big step in their relationship.”
“Although she's an A-list star, Bullock prefers her relationship remain private, which is exactly her beau's style.”
“"They are very content with how things are going in their relationship."”
“"They have been really busy but always make time to see each other," the insider adds.”
“Even though Bullock is busy filming Ocean's Eight, she and Randall have made their relationship a priority.”
“News exclusively.”
“The couple, who have been dating for about a year and a half, are "doing perfectly," a source tells E!”
“Sandra Bullock and Bryan Randall are in a great place.”


"Brian lives with Sandra and he helps Sandra's children as if they were his own."
"They have a simple and quiet time together," the source added, adding that their relationship has taken a big step forward
"Although bullock is a first-line star, she prefers to keep her relationship private, which is her boyfriend's style."
"They are very satisfied with the development of their relationship."
"They are really busy, but they always take the time to see each other," the person familiar with the matter added
"Although bullock is busy shooting ocean eight, she and Randall put their relationship in the first place."
"Exclusive news."
A source told e
"Sandra Bullock and Brian Randall are in a good position



Number  38
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Palm Springs International Film Festival is proud to present the entire cast of Hidden Figures with the 2017 Ensemble Performance Award."”
“"Fueled by the performances of Taraji P. Henson, Octavia Spencer and Janelle Monáe, the ensemble cast also features outstanding performances from Kevin Costner, Kirsten Dunst, Jim Parsons, Mahershala Ali, Glen Powell and many others.”
“...three African American women engineers physicists mathematicians who in their work for NASA in the early 1960s were integral in calculating the flight trajectories for Project Mercury and Apollo 11 said Festival Chairman Harold Maztner...”
“2016 Shared with History has its share of incredible untold stories and this is one of the most compelling the More History has its share of incredible untold stories and this is one of the most compelling the tale of...”


"Palm Springs International Film Festival is honored to present the 2017 ensemble performance award to all the actors of hidden people."
"Driven by the performances of taraji P. Henson, Octavia Spencer and Janel Monet, the cast also includes performances by Kevin Costner, Kirsten Dunst, Jim Parsons, mahsara Ali, Glen Powell and many others."
"Three African American female engineers, physicists and mathematicians, who worked for NASA in the early 1960s, were indispensable in calculating the flight path of mercury project and Apollo 11," said Harold mazner, President of the festival
"2016 has shared incredible and unknown stories with history, which is the most convincing year. History has shared more incredible and unknown stories, which is the most convincing year..."



Number  39
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“For the latest celebrity news and interviews, subscribe to our new podcast "In Case You Missed Us" below!”
“For access to all our exclusive celebrity videos and interviews – Subscribe on YouTube!”
“Seven months after welcoming daughter Chicago, the couple are planning to have a fourth child, multiple sources reveal exclusively in the new issue of Us Weekly.”
““[They] have one last embryo left,” one insider says, adding that the sex is male.”
“The Keeping Up With the Kardashians star, 37, and the Grammy winner, 41, plan to have the embryo implanted in a gestational carrier “soon,” a second insider tells Us.”
“This will not be the first time Kardashian and West, who wed in May 2014, turn to surrogacy.”
“They hired a gestational carrier for Chicago after the social media mogul suffered high-risk pregnancies with daughter North, 5, and son Saint, 2, due to preeclampsia and placenta accreta.”
““Doctors said that it wasn’t safe for my — or the baby’s — health to carry on my own,” Kardashian wrote on her website in January, just three days after Chicago was born.”
““After exploring many options, Kanye and I decided to use a gestational carrier.”
“Although I have used the term surrogate in the past, a gestational carrier is actually the technical term for a woman who carries a baby that she has no biological relationship to.”


For the latest celebrity news and interviews, subscribe to our new podcast "in case you miss us" below
"To access all of our exclusive celebrity videos and interviews, subscribe on YouTube!"
Several sources revealed exclusively in the new issue of American weekly that seven months after welcoming their daughter to Chicago, the couple planned to have a fourth child
Only the last embryo is left, "a person familiar with the matter said, adding that the gender is male
Another person familiar with the matter told us that the 37 year old Kardashian star and 41 year old Grammy winner planned to implant embryos into pregnancy vectors "soon."
"This will not be the first time Kardashian and West, who got married in May 2014, have asked for surrogacy."
"They hired a pregnant woman for Chicago after the social media mogul had a high-risk pregnancy with his 5-year-old daughter north and 2-year-old son Saint due to preeclampsia and placenta accreta."
"Doctors say it's not safe for me or my child's health to be on my own," Kardashian wrote on her website in January, just three days after she was born in Chicago
"After exploring many options, Kanye and I decided to use pregnancy carriers."
"Although I've used the term surrogacy in the past, a carrier during pregnancy is actually a technical term for a woman with a child that has no biological relationship with her."



Number  40
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“They added that they would continue their “cherished friendship” and that they were “best friends”.”
“Aniston and Theroux announced their split in February, saying in a statement that their decision “was mutual and lovingly made at the end of last year”.”
“Aniston calling the Friends actress amazing...”
“Friends Jennifer Aniston has previously described Selena Gomez as a little cherub Michael Buckner Getty Images for InStyle Speaking in 2015 Aniston said of her friend She s just like a little cherub that I feel like I wanna take care of Gomez 25 also spoke about her friendship with...”
“But Jen has clearly been offended, which really affected Selena.”Standard Online have contacted representatives for Aniston and Gomez for comment.”
“Split: Jennifer Aniston and Justin Theroux announced the end of their marriage in early 2018 / Splash News“She has been close to Selena for a few years and has taken her under her wing.”
“A source told the publication: “Jennifer called her to ask why she had been hanging out with Justin, because she felt betrayed.”
“New reports by The Sun claim that Aniston phoned the Come & Get It singer to ask some questions about the “bond” after the two were seen hanging out in Los Angeles recently.”
“Aniston and Theroux called time on their marriage earlier this year and rumours have recently swirled regarding his friendship with Gomez, who is good friends with the actress.”
“J ennifer Aniston has reportedly “confronted” Selena Gomez after rumours that the singer is growing close to her ex Justin Theroux started circulating.”


They added that they would continue their "cherished friendship" and that they were "best friends"
Aniston and syrux broke up in February, saying in a statement that their decision "was made jointly at the end of last year."
"Aniston says the actresses in friends are great..."
"My friend, Jennifer Aniston, used to describe Serena Gomez as a little angel before. Michael Buckner Getty Images, speaking at InStyle in 2015, said that when Aniston talked about her friends, she was like a little angel. I think I want to take care of Gomez. At 25, she also talked about her friendship..."
"But Jen was obviously offended, which really affected Serena." Standard online has contacted representatives of Aniston and Gomez for comments
"Break up: Jennifer Aniston and Justin Cyrus announced the end of their marriage in early 2018 / splash news" she and Serena have been dating for several years and have been putting her under their wings. "
"Jennifer called to ask why she was with Justin because she felt betrayed," a source told the media
According to a new report in the sun, Aniston called the come & get it singer after she was seen together in Los Angeles recently to ask questions about the relationship
Aniston and Cyrus announced their marriage earlier this year, and there have been rumors about his friendship with Gomez, the actress's best friend
According to reports, after rumors began to circulate that Serena Gomez was getting closer to her ex girlfriend Justin Cyrus, j.annifer Aniston "confronted" Serena Gomez "



Number  41
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...she continued while adding, "That’s what parents do!"”
“The tabloid reported that the 47-year age gap between them does not seem to cause any issue as the duo plans on getting married in an intimate ceremony at Caitlyn's home in Malibu.”
“So it is with television personality Caitlyn Jenner.”
“It seems Caitlyn is not holding back in showering her girlfriend, Sophia Hutchins with love and gifts.”
“According to Radar Online, she is reportedly secretly spending $50,000 a week on Sophia.”
“Even though it hasn't been a year since they started dating, Caitlyn is making sure that Sophia has everything she wants.”
““Caitlyn is spending an absolute fortune on Sophia,” a source told the website.”
““She’s constantly treating her to drinks and dinners at the nicest restaurants in town and buys her jewelry and handbags all the time!” the source continued.”
“At the same time, it has been reported that Caitlyn has given Sophia her own credit card along with a weekly allowance.”
““Sophia is using Caitlyn’s cash to deck out her wardrobe with designer clothes and get her hair and nails done every week," the source revealed.”


“…… She continued, adding, "it's parents who do it."
"The tabloid reports that the 47 year old age gap between them does not seem to cause any problems, as the two plan to have an intimate wedding at Caitlin's Malibu home."
"It's the same with Caitlin Jenner, the TV celebrity."
"It seems that Caitlin didn't flinch from offering love and gifts to her girlfriend Sophia Hutchins."
"According to radar online, she secretly spends $50000 a week on Sophia."
"Even though they started dating less than a year ago, Caitlin made sure Sophia had everything she wanted."
"Caitlin spent a lot of money on Sophia," a source told the site
"She often invites her to drink and eat in the best restaurants in the city, and often buys her jewelry and handbags!"! "The source continued
"Meanwhile, Caitlin is reported to have given Sofia her own credit card and weekly allowance."
"Sofia is using Caitlin's cash to buy designer clothes for her wardrobe and get her hair and nails done every week," the source said



Number  42
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Alex also has children, two daughters from his marriage to psychology graduate Cynthia Scurtis, whom he married in 2002 before they divorced in 2008.”
“In 2004 J-Lo married singer Marc Anthony, and the singer gave birth to twins Emme Maribel and Maximillian David in 2008 before they divorced six years later.”
“But she also has a long history on the romance scene, with a fourth wedding on the horizon - this time to Alex Rodriguez.”
“3 Jennifer Lopez has announced that she’s engaged to her baseball legend boyfriend Alex Rodriguez Credit: Getty - ContributorIs Jennifer Lopez engaged to Alex Rodriguez?”
“In March 2019 it was revealed that Jennifer Lopez had got engaged to her baseball legend boyfriend Alex Rodriguez during a romantic beach getaway.”
“The three-times married singer, 49, announced the news by posting a pic of her massive diamond sparkler on Instagram with a number of heart emojis.”
“Before the announcement, in July 2018 Jen sparked rumours she was engaged to Alex after sporting a Cartier ring on her wedding finger.”
“The pair also sent the rumour mill in full motion when they were spotted buying jewellery on Valentine's Day 2018.”
“3 The pair has been dating since 2017 Credit: AP.ASSOCIATED PRESSWhen did she start dating the baseball star?”
“Jennifer first started dating A-Rod in March 2017 after first meeting him in 2005 at a baseball game she had attended with her then-husband Marc Anthony.”


"Alex also has children. He has two daughters in his marriage to psychology graduate Cynthia Scudetti. He got married in 2002 and divorced in 2008."
In 2004, J-Lo married singer Marc Anthony and gave birth to twins Emme Maribel and Maximilian David in 2008. They divorced six years later
"But she also has a long history on the stage of love, and is about to have her fourth wedding - this time with Alex Rodriguez."
"3. Jennifer Lopez announces her engagement to baseball legend Alex Rodriguez credit: are Getty - funders Jennifer Lopez and Alex Rodriguez engaged?"
"In March 2019, it was reported that Jennifer Lopez was engaged to baseball legend Alex Rodriguez on a romantic beach holiday."
The 49 year old singer, who has been married three times, announced the news by posting a huge, glittering picture of diamonds with many heart-shaped expressions on instagram
"Before the announcement, in July 2018, Jennifer wore a Cartier ring on her wedding finger, sparking rumors of her engagement to Alex."
"When the two were found buying jewelry on Valentine's day in 2018, rumors were also flying."
"3 two dating since 2017 credit: AP when did she start dating baseball stars?"
"Jennifer first dated A-Rod in March 2017, when she first met him at a baseball game with her then husband, Marc Anthony, in 2005."



Number  43
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...to focus on her career and having fun...”
“Liam is also said by friends to be envious of his brother Chris having three kids with his wife Elsa Pataky but while he s feeling more and more broody Miley is not ready to commit to children and wants...”
“...worked and only led to more fights...”
“They do love each other but at this point it s starting to become clear this relationship simply can t go the distance Miley and Liam are have tried couple s therapy according to the magazine but it hasn t...”
““She’s sobered up but she’s still immature and isn’t ready to commit to spending the rest of her life with one person.”
“: “When they got back together, Liam thought things would be different, but Miley hasn’t changed at all.”
“A source told US magazine OK!”
“GettyAfter another rough spell for the couple, and Miley recently admitting she doesn’t “envision” getting married anytime soon, it appears the power couple are about to call off their engagement for a second time.”


“… Focus on her career and fun... "
"Friends also said that Liam envies his brother Chris and his wife Elsa Pataki for having three children, but when he feels more and more sentimental, Miley is not ready to have children and wants to..."
“…… Success will only lead to more fights... "
"They do love each other, but now it's clear that this relationship can't last at all. Miley and Liam have tried the couple therapy in the magazine, but they haven't yet..."
"She's sober, but immature, and not ready to commit to spending the rest of her life alone."
"When they get back together, Liam thinks things will be different, but Miley hasn't changed at all."
"A source told us, all right!"
After another tough time for the couple, Miley recently admitted that she did not "envision" getting married in the short term. It seems that the powerful couple will cancel their engagement for the second time



Number  44
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““I hope my lawyer agrees.””
““I think Star magazine calling me a ‘cheater’ qualifies as defamation of character,” he wrote.”
“In 2010, he took to Twitter to slam the magazine for claiming he was cheating on his then-wife, Demi Moore.”
“Also Read: Salma Hayek Says Donald Trump Planted a Tabloid Story About Her After She Turned Him DownThis isn’t the first time Kutcher has had a problem with Star magazine and the publication suggesting he is a cheater.”
“...world he tweeted...”
“...pic twitter com tvKdGoqRnx ashton kutcher aplusk July 9 2017 A few hours later the former That 70s Show star shared another tweet encouraging fans to fight battles that will change the world If we re going to fight battles they might as well be the ones to change the...”
“Sorry aunt Jodie these magazines lack integrity.”
““Sorry aunt Jodie these magazines lack integrity.”See Video: Jennifer Aniston Trashes Tabloid Treatment of Women: 'We Get Boxed In'You should have heard how upset Mila was that I spent the day with our cousin.”
“However, the story didn’t phase the actor too much, and he fired back with the perfect response:“You should have heard how upset Mila was that I spent the day with our cousin,” he wrote on Twitter Sunday.”
“Who’s the girl?” It featured images of the actor with a mysterious brunette stepping onto a private jet.”


"I hope my lawyer agrees."
"I think it's a libel to star magazine to call me a 'liar'," he wrote
"In 2010, he attacked the magazine on twitter, claiming that he had cheated his then wife, Demi Moore."
"Read also: Salma Hayek says that Donald Trump made up a tabloid about her after she rejected Kutcher. This is not the first time that Kutcher has had a problem with star magazine and publications suggesting that he is a liar. "
“… He tweeted about the world... "
“… Pic twitter com tvkdgoqrnx Ashton Kutcher aplusk a few hours after July 9, 2017, the former 1970s show stars shared another tweet to encourage fans to fight, which will change the world. If we are going to fight, they may also be the people who change the world... "
"I'm sorry, Aunt Judy, these magazines lack integrity."
"I'm sorry, Aunt Judy, these magazines lack integrity." Watch the video: Jennifer Aniston criticizes the tabloid's attitude towards women: "we're imprisoned." you should know how sad Mila is when I spend a day with my cousin
"However, the story didn't attract much attention from the actors, and he responded perfectly by saying," you should know how sad Mira is after a day with our cousin, "he tweeted on Sunday
"Who is that girl? "There is a picture of an actor and a mysterious brunette boarding a private plane."



**Something goes wrong**
“So that was a real conversation."”
“...about leaving me after TMZ”
“As Kanye recalled There was a moment where I felt like after TMZ maybe a week after that I felt like the energy levels were low and I called different family members and was asking you know Was Kim thinking...”
“In May, West sparked widespread backlash when he said slavery was a choice, a statement he also told the NYT was taken out of context.”
“In a new interview with The New York Times, the rapper revealed that he had a "real conversation" about the possibility of a divorce over controversial remarks he made during an unfiltered appearance on TMZ Live.”
“As recently as a month and a half ago, Kanye West had serious doubts about the future of his marriage to Kim Kardashian.”


"So it's a real conversation."
"About leaving me after TMZ"
"As Kanye recalled, there was a time when I felt that after TMZ, maybe a week later, I felt that my energy level was very low. I called different family members and asked if you knew what Kim was thinking..."
"In May this year, West said that slavery was an option, which triggered a broad backlash. He also told the New York Times that this was a clear verdict."
In a new interview with the New York Times, the rapper revealed that he had published a "real conversation" about the possibility of divorce on the unfiltered live TMZ show
"Just a month and a half ago, Kanye West had serious doubts about the future of her marriage to Kim Kardashian."



Number  46
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In 2016, she was a judge on the German version of Dance, Dance, Dance and appeared on tattoo show Pain & Fame.”
“Sophia Thomalla was first linked to The Voice coach and Bush frontman Gavin Rossdale on 30 March 2017.”
“She is also the new love in Gavin Rossdale's life - but what else is there to know about the international model...3 Sophia Thomolla is a German model, actress and TV presenter Credit: B66Who is Sophia Thomalla and were is she from?”
“Sophia Thomalla is a German model, actress and TV presenter born in Berlin on 6 October 1989.”
“She grew up in Berlin and Cologne.”
“She studied acting and singing at the Constantin School in Bochum between 2007 and 2009.”
“As a model Sophia has starred in campaigns including a lingerie clad appearance to promote Axe deodorant.”
“In 2009 she tried her luck on Germany’s Next Top Model.”
“Unfortunately it wasn't meant to be, and left the show after one episode.”
“3 Sophia is dating rocker Gavin Rossdale Credit: Splash NewsWhen did Sophia Thomalla start dating Gaving Rossdale?”


"In 2016, she judged the German version of dance, dance, dance and appeared on the tattoo show pain & fame."
"Sofia tormara made her first contact with dubbing coach and Bush leader Gavin Rossdale on March 30, 2017."
"She's also the new girl in Gavin Rossdale's life - but what else to know about this international model Sofia tomora is a German model, actress and TV host. Letter of credit: b66 who is Sofia tomora and whose is she
Sophia tormara, a German model, actor and TV host, was born in Berlin on October 6, 1989
"She grew up in Berlin and Cologne."
"From 2007 to 2009, she studied acting and singing at Constantine school in Bohong."
"As a model, Sophia has played a leading role in promotional activities, including an underwear appearance to promote axe deodorant."
"In 2009, she took a chance on the next top model in Germany."
"Unfortunately, that's not the intention. I left the show after one episode."
"3. Sophia is dating rock singer Gavin Rossdale. Credit: splash news when did Sophia tormara start dating Gavin Rossdale?"



**Something goes wrong**
“Diva’s Crazy Rider Requests RevealedMariah Carey Outrageous Diva Behavior On ‘The House’ Set Revealed, Why Cast Hated Her[Featured Image by Pascal Le Segretain/Getty Images]”
“Mariah Carey, Bryan Tanaka Back Together?”
“But Gossip Cop, a site that has become known for debunking celebrity rumors, says that those claims are undoubtedly false.”
““She lured him back in by increasing his weekly stipend and promising to help him boost his career,” an alleged source told OK!”
“Magazine, as reported by Gossip Cop.”
“The tabloid also alleges that Mariah and Bryan made a deal over what his stipend would be.”
““It’s crazy, but keeping up the public perception that she’s desirable is more important to her than money.”OK!”
“Magazine also claimed that friends are worried that Mariah might be wasting her fortune on Tanaka.”
“But Gossip Cop says that they reached out to Mariah’s rep, who said that the rumors published by OK!”
“...are fake news.”


"Diva's crazy Knight request reveals Mariah Carey's outrageous Diva behavior in the house. Why does the crew hate her?"
"Maria Kelly, Brian Tanaka back together?"
"But the gossip police website, which is famous for debunking celebrity rumors, says these statements are undoubtedly wrong."
"She lured him back to work by increasing his weekly allowance and promising to help him improve his career," an alleged source told OK
"A magazine of gossip police reports."
"The tabloid also claimed that Maria and Brian had reached an agreement on his salary."
"It's crazy, but it's more important than money to keep the public in love with her." All right
"The magazine also claimed that friends were worried that Maria might waste her wealth in the fields."
But gossip police said they contacted Maria's representative, who said the rumor was released OK
“…… It's all fake news. "



Number  48
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know your thoughts below!”
“HollywoodLifers, do you think Robert Pattinson and Katy Perry should make their relationship official?”
“Katy Perry, 33, may have kissed a girl, but now she’s allegedly kissing Robert Pattinson, 31, and we think she likes it!”
“Following their romantic dinner date at Taix French Restaurant on Jan. 26, Katy is ready to make things official.”
““Katy and Rob have been great friends for a long time and they have both considered at different times to become a couple, but timing was never on their sides.”
“They both had their own dating lives to work with, which would never allow them to get together.”
“And now they talk and flirt all the time and Katy would dive into a relationship with Rob in seconds, but she feels she is in Rob’s friend zone.”
“And she is right because Rob is scared to pull the trigger because he doesn t want to get into a full relationship with the possibility to make things complicated and maybe end up losing a life long friend if they were to break up a source close to Katy...”
“...tells HollywoodLife com EXCLUSIVELY”
“We totally understand Robert wanting to take things slow.”


"Let's know what you think below!"
"Hollywood stars, do you think Robert Pattinson and Katie Perry should formalize their relationship?"
"Katie Perry, 33, may have kissed a girl, but now she's said to be kissing Robert Pattinson, 31, and we think she likes it!"
After their romantic dinner at tex French restaurant on January 26, Katie is going to make it public
"Katie and rob have been good friends for a long time. They have considered to be a couple at different times, but the time is never on their side."
"They all have their own Dating lives to work with, which will never get them together."
"Now they've been chatting and flirting, and Katie will soon have a relationship with rob, but she feels like she's Rob's friend."
"She is right, because rob is afraid to pull the trigger, because he does not want to enter a complete relationship, which may complicate things and eventually lose a lifelong friend, if the source of their breakup is close to Katie..."
“… Exclusive to hollywoodlife
"We fully understand that Robert wants to take his time."



**Something goes wrong**
“Follow Randee Dawn on Twitter.”
“Richie, driver Redena McManus and a 3-year-old boy, Christopher McManus, all died during or shortly after the collision, while the bus driver and passengers were uninjured, according to police reports.”
“He was just 14 when his older brother Richie died on Nov. 13, 1990.”
“And, as Shelton noted in a tweet Monday, "It changed my life forever."”
“Lost my brother 27 years ago today.”
“I was only 14 at the time but it changed my life forever... Made me realize that life is precious and there's no time like RIGHT NOW to go for it... We still miss you Richie!!”
“— Blake Shelton (@blakeshelton) November 13, 2017Richie was 24 when he died in a car accident in the Sheltons' home state of Oklahoma.”
“Two years ago, Shelton sent out a message for the 25th anniversary of his loss:Wow... 25 years ago today we lost my brother Richie Shelton.”
“He's still my hero going strong.”
“Wish everyone could've known him.”


"Follow randee dawn on twitter."
Ritchie, driver redna McManus and a 3-year-old boy Christopher McManus all died during or shortly after the crash, while neither the driver nor the passengers were injured, police reported
On November 13, 1990, when his brother Richie died, he was only 14 years old
"And, as Sheldon tweeted on Monday," it changed my life forever. "
"27 years ago today, I lost my brother."
"I was only 14 at the time, but it changed my life forever... Let me realize that life is precious, there is no time to pursue it like now... We still miss you, rich! "
"Black Shelton (@ blakeshelton) on November 13, 2017, rich died in a car accident in Shelton's home state of Oklahoma, when he was 24 years old."
"Two years ago, Sheldon sent a letter for his 25th birthday: Wow... 25 years ago today, we lost my brother, rich Sheldon. "
"He's still my hero. Be strong."
"I hope everyone knows him."



**Something goes wrong**
“!”
“His reps aren’t commenting on the issue either.”
“We’ve got EXCLUSIVE details on why Chris is enjoying the feud and anticipating more disses.”
“The rap war between Pusha T and Drake just got super ugly as the 41-year-old claimed in a new diss track that Drizzy is a deadbeat dad to a secret son with former porn star Sophie Brussaux.”
“Chris Brown is right there with all of us hoping Drake’s got a clap back track coming, but in the meantime he’s pulled up some popcorn and is having a blast watching their drama.”
““Chris is on Team Pusha and believes him when he says that Drake may be ignoring his own baby.”
“Chris is loving all the drama between Pusha and Drake.”
“He is glad that for once, he is not in the middle of this feud,” a source close to the 29-year-old singer tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““Chris can’t stop laughing at Pusha’s track, from the black face pic to calling Drake a deadbeat, Chris thinks it is all hilarious.”
“Chris feels bad for the baby and thinks Drake is being irresponsible.”


“!”
"His representatives did not comment on the issue either."
"We've got an exclusive account of why Chris likes this fight and is looking forward to more."
"The rap fight between Pusat and Drake has become super ugly because Drake, 41, claims in a new disc track that Tracy is the father of a secret son of former porn star Sophie brusoe."
"Chris Brown is there, and we all want Drake to have a surprise, but at the same time, he has some popcorn and is watching their drama explode."
"Chris is a pusha player and believes in Drake when he says he may have overlooked his children."
"Chris loves all the drama between pusha and Drake."
A source close to the 29 year old singer told reporters: "he is very happy that this time, he was not involved in the dispute." Exclusive to Hollywood life
"Chris kept laughing at pusha's track, from black face photos to calling Drake a nerd. Chris thought it was funny."
"Chris felt sorry for the kids and thought Drake was irresponsible."



Number  51
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“(To see more of their cute moments from throughout the years, click here).”
“That August, the couple tied the knot with an intimate ceremony in their L.A. home.”
“The happy couple later showed off their engagement bling on the Daytime Emmys red carpet that same year.”
“...her talk show DeGeneres announced her plans to wed de Rossi the reveal followed the news that the California Supreme Court had struck down a law banning same sex marriage...”
“I felt weak at the knees and I was overwhelmed with how I felt but then it took me about 10 months to get the courage up to actually do anything about it FROM PEN Jada Pinkett Smith Talks Celebrating 20 Years with Will Smith In a 2008 episode of...”
“...t believe it but she turned around and it was like an arrow was shot through my heart...”
“We did talk a little bit and then over those three years we saw each other at parties or at various things but the one time that was the most significant was during a photoshoot actually She continued I just walked over to say hello to her and I couldn...”
““We actually met socially and I just felt that immediate draw,” she said.”
““Happy anniversary @theellenshow and @portiaderossi.”During an interview with Oprah Winfrey, de Rossi recalled about falling for DeGeneres.”
“It’s still one of the most fun things I’ve ever done,” Radin wrote.”


"To learn more about their lovely moments over the years, click here."
"That August, the couple had a close wedding at their home in Los Angeles."
"The happy couple later displayed their engagement ring on the red carpet of the Emmy Awards in the daytime of the same year."
“…… Her talk show "DeGeneres" announced her plans to marry De Rossi. After the news that the Supreme Court of California has repealed the law against same-sex marriage was announced.... "
"My knees felt weak, and I was overwhelmed by my own feelings, but it took me about 10 months to get up the nerve and find a real solution from the 2008 episode of" penjada pinkert Smith celebrating 20 years with Will Smith. "
"I can't believe it, but she turned around like an arrow through my heart..."
"We did talk a little bit, and then in those three years, we saw each other at parties or all kinds of things, but the most important one was when taking pictures. In fact, she continued, I just went over to say hello to her, I can't..."
"We actually met on social occasions, and I just felt the direct attraction," she said
"Happy Anniversary @ theEllenShow and @ portiaderossi." In an interview with Oprah Winfrey, de Rossi recalled falling in love with DeGeneres
"It's still one of the most interesting things I've ever done," Latin wrote



Number  52
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Contact us at letters@time.com.”
“Please enter a valid email address.”
“Mayer was admitted to the hospital for an emergency appendectomy early Tuesday, his spokeswoman Anna Loynes said in a statement.”
“The sudden surgery caused Dead and Company, the band Mayer is touring with, to postpone their Tuesday concert in New Orleans.”
“Dead and Company tweeted the news about 12:30 p.m.”
“ET.”
“The band and Mayer’s next tour stop is Thursday in Orlando.”
“It’s unclear if that show will be postponed as well.”
“Loynes said all tickets for Tuesday’s show would be honored and later rescheduled as soon as possible.”
“The singer’s representatives did not comment on his current condition.”


"Contact us letters@time.com 。”
Please enter a valid email address
Mayer was taken to hospital early Tuesday for emergency appendectomy, her spokesman, Anna loins, said in a statement
Mayer's accompaniment delayed Tuesday's concert in New Orleans after a sudden operation that killed him
"Death and the company tweeted this around 12:30 p.m."
"Wait a minute."
"The next stop for the band and Mayer is Thursday in Orlando."
"It's not clear that the show will be delayed as well," he said
"All tickets for Tuesday's show will be cashed out and rescheduled as soon as possible," Loynes said
"The singer's representative did not comment on his current situation."



**Something goes wrong**
“The actress and her representatives have also not addressed the hospitalisation rumour yet.”
“It is also to note that Jolie was recently seen giving a powerful speech in Vancouver urging the UN to curb sexual violence during war, proving that she is fine now.”
“According to Gossip Cop's sources, despite her history of health issues, Jolie hasn't been admitted recently.”
“The incomplete report does raise some red flags.”
“Although the piece talked about her deteriorating health condition, not once has it mentioned when, where and why she was hospitalised.”
“Everyone who's close to Angie is concerned," the source claimed.”
“That just goes to show how serious this is, that he'd put their drama to the side for the sake of her health.”
“Apparently, Pitt has also "reached out because he's so worried, and told her to start eating and get healthy for the kids sake.”
“"There are times when she feels lightheaded and is on the verge of passing out," the informant said.”
“The source added that Jolie is so caught up managing the children that she is hardly focusing on herself and her health.”


"The actress and her representatives have yet to respond to the hospital rumors."
"It's worth noting that Julie recently made a strong speech in Vancouver urging the United Nations to curb sexual violence during the war, proving that she is very good now."
"According to gossip police sources, although Julie has a history of health problems, she has not been admitted to hospital recently."
"This incomplete report does raise some dangers."
"Although this article talked about her deteriorating health, it didn't mention when, where and why she was hospitalized."
"People close to Angie are worried," the source said
"It just shows how serious it is. He put their farce aside for her health."
Obviously, Pete also "reaches out to help because he's worried and tells her to start eating for the children's health."
"Sometimes she feels dizzy and about to faint," the source said
"The source added that Julie was too busy managing her children to focus on herself and her health."



Number  54
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“So now I really have to figure this out ‍♀️”Image zoom Khloé Kardashian for Good America | Credit: Courtesy Good AmericanIn her first television appearance since confirming her pregnancy, Kardashian told Ellen DeGeneres that her boy name would be in honor of Thompson.”
““Lol I knew the name if I was having a boy.”
“!” Kardashian admitted.”
“It’s so hard!!”
““NO!!!”
“On Thursday, Kardashian narrowed it down even further, telling one fan on Twitter, “I think im going with a T.”“@khloekardashian do you have a name picked out for your sweet baby girl yet?” another fan asked the Revenge Body star in early March.”
“Earlier this month, the mom-to-be admitted on the social-media platform that she and her NBA star boyfriend, 27, had gotten as far as choosing a first initial — T or K — but were still debating on what to call their baby girl.”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“The rumors likely came out of the fact that Kardashian, 33, frequently posts photos of luxurious rose arrangements to her social media — usually in shades of pink and white.”


"So now I really have to find a way." ♀️ In her first TV appearance after confirming her pregnancy, Kardashian told Ellen DeGeneres that her boy's name would be in memory of Thompson
"Ha ha, if I had a boy, I would know the name."
"!" Kardashian admits. "
"It's too hard!"
"No
"On Thursday, Kardashian narrowed down further, telling a fan on twitter," I think I'm going with T. " @Have you named your lovely baby girl? "Another fan asked the avenging star in early March."
"Earlier this month, the mother to be admitted on social media that she and her 27 year old NBA star boyfriend had chosen the first letter - t or K - but were still discussing how to call their baby girl."
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
"The rumor may come from the fact that 33 year old Kardashian often publishes pictures of luxurious rose decorations on her social media - usually pink and white."



Number  55
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"But I'm a very real, honest person, so what you see is what you get."”
“News after the live telecast.”
“"My journey tonight was all over the place," she explained to E!”
“During last week's quarterfinals, Mel B walked off stage and threw a drink on Simon after he made a joke about her wedding night.”
“In recent weeks, however, viewers have taken an extra notice into Simon's unique relationship with the former Spice Girls member.”
“For the past two seasons, the duo has made up one half of the America's Got Talent judges table alongside Howie Mandel and Heidi Klum.”
“We may not agree with their critiques, but we can all agree that there's something unique about Mel B and Simon Cowell's dynamic.”


"But I'm a very real, honest person, so what you see is what you get."
"The news after the live broadcast."
"My journey tonight is all over the place," she explained to e! "
"In last week's quarter final, Mel B walked off the stage after Simon made a joke about her wedding night and threw him a drink."
"However, in recent weeks, the audience has paid special attention to Simon's unique relationship with the former Spice Girl."
"In the past two seasons, the pair, along with Howie Mandel and Heidi Krum, have occupied half of the US talent list."
"We may not agree with their criticism, but we can all agree that the dynamics of Mel B and Simon Cowell are unique."



Number  56
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, are you bummed out that Selena and Niall won’t be dating any time soon?”
“She thinks he’s cute and all for what he said, but it’s not going any further than the comments.”Plus, she’s happily taken with The Weeknd.”
“We’ve EXCLUSIVELY learned that she’s flattered by his childhood crush comment, but there’s one BIG reason why they’ll never get together.”
“It’s every guy’s worst nightmare to be put inside the friend zone.”
“Unfortunately, that’s the case for Niall Horan, 23, who recently admitted in a radio interview with SiriusXM that Selena Gomez, 24, was his childhood crush.”
“As much as we’d love to see these two start a romance, it’s not going to happen any time soon.”
““Selena really likes Niall but she feels a more brotherly connection towards him as opposed to a romantic one,” a source tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““That’s why nothing has happened between them.”
“After attending David Henrie, her Wizards Of Waverly Place co-star’s wedding, she’s starting to have ideas of her own about marrying the “Starboy” crooner.”
“Their brief reunion was the cutest thing we’ve ever seen!”


"Holly bugs, Serena and Neil won't be dating soon. Aren't you happy?"
"She thinks he's cute and fully supports what he said, but it's just a comment." In addition, she would be happy to be interviewed this week. "
"We learned exclusively that she was flattered by his infatuated childhood remarks, but one of the important reasons was that they would never be together."
"Being put in the friends zone is every man's worst nightmare."
"Unfortunately, this is the case with Niall Horan, 23, who recently admitted in an interview with Sirius XM that Selena Gomez, 24, was his childhood sweetheart."
"While we'd love to see these two start romance, it won't happen soon."
"Selena really likes NiAl, but she feels more fraternal to him than a romantic," one source said exclusive to Hollywood life
"That's why nothing happened between them."
After attending the wedding starring David Henry, her Wimbley square wizard, she began to have her own idea to marry the star boy singer
"Their brief reunion is the most lovely thing we have ever seen!"



Number  57
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And a major part of the problem is an industry where there are far more opportunities for Ashton Kutcher to prove that he's a reliable box office draw than Natalie Portman, thus financially justifying him getting three times what she made for No Strings Attached.”
“Amy Adams plays Garrett Hedland s girlfriend...”
“Chris Pratt is a proven box office draw not just in the MCU but (relatively speaking) the likes of Sony's Passengers (where he correctly got 60% of Jennifer Lawrence's $20 million payday) and The Magnificent Seven.”
“There was little chance that Pratt and Howard were going to end up with the same relative paycheck for the second film.”
“That she and Pratt both returned meant the filmmakers were aware that while Pratt's post-LEGO Movie/Guardians of the Galaxy popularity was a big part of the film's initial success, it was not his movie.”
“This has gotten better in our current serialization era, but it's still an issue, especially for stand-alone pictures and comedies.”
“...treating their female leads like disposable items.”
“I was actually relieved that Howard was asked to return considering the long history of big franchises (Mission: Impossible, The Hangover, Indiana Jones, the 1990s Batman sequels, etc.)”
“That she came back at all for the sequel means the filmmakers realized that.”
“Pratt's Owen was the co-star, with similar screentime and most of the action beats, but it wasn't necessarily his journey.”


"A major part of the problem is that in this industry, Ashton Kutcher has more opportunities to prove that he can attract more box office than Natalie Portman, thus proving that he can earn three times as much as Natalie Portman economically."
"Amy Adams plays Garrett heidland's girlfriend..."
"Chris Platt is recognized as a box office attractor not only in the field of MCU, but also (relatively speaking) in Sony's passengers (60% on Jennifer Lawrence's $20 million payday) and in" the seven. "
"It's very unlikely that Pratt and Howard will get the same relative income in the second film."
"She and Pratt are back, which means that filmmakers realize that while Pratt's post LEGO movie, the guardian of the galaxy, played a big part in the film's initial success, it's not his movie."
"It's better in our current serialization era, but it's still a problem, especially for independent pictures and comedies."
“… Treat women like disposable items. "
"Given the long history of big franchises (Mission: impossible, hangover, Indiana Jones, Batman sequel of the 1990s, etc.), I'm really relieved that Howard was asked to come back."
"Her coming back to make a sequel means the filmmakers are aware of that."
"Pratt's Owen is co starring and has similar movie time and most of the action beat, but it's not necessarily his journey."



Number  58
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“The sisters seemingly haven't been able to see eye to eye in dramatic promos for season 15 of Keeping Up With the Kardashians, and in an exclusive new clip, things get even more heated.”
“After Kourtney held her ground on picking a time to shoot their family Christmas card, Kim called her "the least exciting to look at" -- pushing her older sister to the breaking point.”
“Kourtney breaks down in an emotional phone call to Khloe, who just so happens to be sitting with Kim and their mom, Kris Jenner.”
“"I'm not here to be mistreated by my f**king b**ch family," she cries.”
“"Kim saying that I'm the least interesting to look at -- who even speaks like that?"”
“"You guys just have really different values than me.”
“I choose to be a mother to my three kids.”
“I am not here looking for another job.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"It seems that the two sisters haven't been able to reach an agreement in the dramatic Promo of" keep up with Kardashian "season 15. In the exclusive new clip, things get more intense."
After Courtney insisted on choosing the time to shoot their family's Christmas cards, king called her "the least exciting person" - pushing her sister to the brink of collapse
"Courtney collapsed in an emotional call to Chloe, who was sitting with Kim and their mother, Chris Jenner."
"I'm not here to be abused by my family," she cried
"Kim said I was the least interesting person to see - who would talk like that?"
"Your values are totally different from mine."
"I chose to be a mother of three."
"I'm not looking for another job."



Number  59
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She will certainly date and has no problem doing it sooner than later.”HollywoodLifers, do you think Scarlett and Colin would make a cute couple?”
““She is going to live her life.”
““She is not going to wait until her divorce is complete,” an insider told us EXCLUSIVELY.”
““They were laughing and seemed to really hit it off.”As HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY reported, Scarlett wasn’t looking to waste any time when it came to getting back into the dating pool.”
““Scarlett and Colin were flirting and canoodling in full view of everyone at the after-party,” another source confirmed to the paper.”
“The pair have attended events together in the months since the split, but if this PDA report is true, it definitely seems like ScarJo is moving on!”
“Then, in March, she officially filed for divorce.”
“They made out at least twice, then they went back to talking and hanging with other people.”In January, it was reported that Scarlett and her husband, Romain Dauriac, had separated after just over two years of marriage.”
“They were at the bar in front of everyone.”
““They would make out a bit, then go back to talking.”


"She'll definitely date, sooner or later." Hollywood stars, do you think Scarlett and Colin will be a lovely couple? "
"She's going to live her own life."
"She won't wait until the end of the divorce," an insider told us exclusively
"They're laughing. They seem to really get along." Scarlett doesn't want to waste any time going back to the dating pool, according to an exclusive report from Hollywood life
Another source confirmed to the paper: "Scarlett and Colin are flirting and frolicking in everyone's eyes after the party."
"The two took part in some activities together in the months after the breakup, but if this PDA report is true, scarjo will definitely move on!"
"Then, in March, she formally filed for divorce."
"They made out at least twice, and then continued to chat and hang out with others." In January, it was reported that Scarlett and her husband, Roman dauriac, had separated after more than two years of marriage
"They're in front of everyone in the bar."
"They'll make out and then continue the conversation."



Number  60
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Does Chris’s face say “we’re totally fine” in these photos?”
“Like two days ago.”
“I’ve actually never been a true-blue fan of either separately.”
“I’ve read some of Anna’s interviews where she seemed funny and “real” and interesting, but mostly I just kind of find her sad these days.”
“I think she was more famous than Pratt when they got married, and now he’s this big movie star and she’s supposed to play the Rita Wilson role, and I don’t think she’s comfortable with that.”
“Plus, I believe some (but not all) of the rumors and blind items about them.”
“I think Chris and Anna’s marriage isn’t all that.”
“I think they love each other and they adore their son but they’re one of those couples which… I don’t know, I guess I just wouldn’t be surprised if they announced their split tomorrow, you know?”
“Their vibe is not one of happiness, despite the happy-couple act they performed on the red carpet of the Passengers premiere.”
“Speaking of the premiere, Anna told E!”


Does Chris have "we're fine" on his face in these pictures
"Just like two days ago."
"In fact, I've never been a real fan of the blues in both areas."
"I've read some interviews with Anna. She looks interesting, real and interesting, but most of the time I just think she's been a little upset recently."
"I think she was more famous than Pratt when they got married. Now that he's a big movie star, she should play the role of Rita Wilson. I don't think she's used to it."
"Besides, I believe in some (but not all) rumors and Braille about them."
"I don't think Chris and Anna's marriage is that simple."
"I think they love each other, they worship their sons, but they are the kind of I don't know. I don't think I'll be surprised if they break up tomorrow, you know? "
"Although they performed a happy couple on the red carpet at the premiere of passengers, their atmosphere is not a kind of happiness."
"When it comes to premiere, Anna told me!"



Number  61
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I was at rock bottom, in the middle of hell.””
“(As Us Weekly exclusively revealed, the Bush rocker was cheating on her with their children’s nanny, Mindy Mann.)”
“Blake Shelton credits Gwen Stefani for getting him back on his feet following his divorce from Miranda Lambert.”
“The country superstar opened up about his romance with the No Doubt frontwoman in a new interview with Billboard magazine.”
“As previously reported, Shelton told Stefani that he was splitting from Lambert during a meeting with their Voice coworkers.”
“The “Misery” singer, who was new to the team at the time, got emotional.”
““I won’t forget that day.”
“I looked over at Gwen — who I didn’t really know — and she had these huge tears in her eyes.”
“I thought, ‘Wow, she feels super bad for me!’” Shelton recalled.”
““She didn’t tell me much, because we didn’t know each other at the time, but she said, ‘I’m going through something very similar to what you’re going through.”


"I'm at the bottom of hell."
"(Bush's rock singer and mindymann, their baby's nanny, were cheating on her, as US weekly exclusively revealed.)
"Black Sheldon thanks Gwen Stephanie for getting Miranda Lambert back on his feet after his divorce."
"In a new interview with Billboard magazine, the country superstar revealed his love affair with the undisputed heroine."
"As mentioned earlier, Sheldon told Stephanie that he broke up with Lambert's voice colleagues when he met them."
"The 'miserable' singer, who was a newcomer to the team at that time, was very emotional."
"I won't forget that day."
"I look at Gwen - I don't know her very well - she has huge tears in her eyes."
"I thought," Wow, she's very sad for me! "Sheldon recalled
"She didn't tell me too much because we didn't know each other at the time, but she said that what I experienced was very similar to what you experienced."



Number  62
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He’s furious and trying to talk her out of it.””
“Hearing her talk about her plan to have his kid, even if it’s not anytime soon, sends him over the edge.”
“But it seems that the reality TV star is ready for baby No.”
“4 and it’s not with her ex.”
“At 39, Kourtney Kardashian is still a young woman.”
“But her boyfriend Younes Bendjima is even younger – 24 to be exact.”
“So, even though she currently has her hands full with her kids Mason, 9, Penelope, 5, and Reign, 3, that doesn’t mean she isn’t thinking about having more children later.”
“In fact the reality TV star even toyed with the idea in a February 2018 episode of Keeping Up With the Kardashians.”
“During the show she told her sisters Kim Kardashian and Khloe Kardashian that she’d been “thinking about freezing” her eggs.”
“Kourtney made it clear why she was thinking about having that extra “insurance,” saying, “What if I want my love to come into the world?”Now it seems that Kourtney wasn’t just toying with the idea.”


"He was angry and tried to persuade her not to do it."
"Hearing her talk about plans to have a baby, if not very soon, would break him down."
"But reality TV stars seem to be ready for the baby."
"And not with her ex boyfriend."
"Courtney Kardashian, 39, is still a young woman."
"But her boyfriend, yones benjima, is younger, 24 to be exact."
"So even though she's busy taking care of her children, Mason, 9, Penelope, 5 and raven, 3, that doesn't mean she won't want to have more children in the future."
"In fact, the reality star even toyed with the idea in the February 2018 episode" keep up with Kardashian. "
On the show, she told her sisters, Kim and Chloe, that she had been "thinking about freezing" her eggs
Courtney made it clear why she was considering extra "insurance," and she said, "if I want my love to come into the world? "Now it seems that Courtney is not just playing with the idea."



Number  63
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Give us all your thoughts below!”
“Click here to see pics of Fergie’s “M.I.L.F.”
“That much we know.”
“But the story behind why the beloved hip-hop/pop group may be breaking up with their lady is a little muddled.”
“An insider tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY what went down.”
““Fergie and the [Black Eyed Peas] have parted ways,” an insider close to Peas member will.i.am told HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY today, May 29, after rumors started swirling that the songstress had been booted from the hip-hop/pop group.”
“She wasn t kicked out It was more a case of they had run their course together and were experiencing creative differences Okay that is definitely WAY less intense than what Media Take Out was reporting earlier saying that Fergie s bandmate Taboo Nawasha 41 dissed the 41 year old...”
“...singer with a scathing tweet on May 24 that said she wasn t one of the classic BEP members and implied she was totally out of the band...”
“He then unfollowed the 41-year-old singer on Twitter today, the same day it was announced she had left Interscope Records to start her own record label under BMG and will be working with them on her upcoming solo album, Double Duchess.”
“$” music video.”


"Tell us what you think!"
Click here to view Fergie's "m.i.l.f." photo
"We know so much."
"But the story behind why this popular hip-hop / pop band might break up with their lady is a bit confusing."
An insider told reporters that Hollywood life only knows what happened
"Ferguson and the Black Eyed Pea have gone their separate ways," an insider close to pea member will told me in Hollywood Life's exclusive report today, May 29, after rumors that the female singer was fired from a hip-hop / pop band
"She didn't get kicked out, it's more because they have experienced creative differences together. Well, it's definitely less intense than the media reports that Fergie's band members taboo 41 year old navasha to belittle the 41 year old player..."
“… The singer sternly said on her microblog on May 24 that she is not one of the classic members of BEP, and hinted that she is completely out of the band... "
"Today, he released the 41 year old singer on twitter. On the same day, it was reported that she left Interscope records to set up her own record company under BMG, and will work with them to produce her upcoming solo album double duchess
"$" music video



Number  64
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Please visit the source responsible for the item in question to report any concerns you may have regarding content or accuracy.”
“The news articles, Tweets, and blog posts do not represent IMDb's opinions nor can we guarantee that the reporting therein is completely factual.”
“This content is published for the entertainment of our users only.”
“The news of Becker’s death was announced on his official […]IMDb.com, Inc. takes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, Tweets, or blog posts.”
“See Hollywood stars’ reaction tweets below.”
“At this time, no cause of death has been provided.”
“The musician and co-founder of the rock band died on Sunday at the age of 67.”
“Celebrities are reacting to the death of Walter Becker Steely Dan ’s lead guitarist.”


"Please visit the person in charge of the relevant project and report any concerns about content or accuracy."
"News articles, tweets and blog posts don't represent IMDB's opinions, and we can't guarantee that the reports in them are completely true."
"This content is published just to entertain our users."
"Becker's death was announced on his official website ] IMDb.com , Inc. assumes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, tweets or blog posts. "
"Please see the reaction of Hollywood stars below."
"At present, no cause of death has been provided."
"The co-founder of the musician and rock band died on Sunday at the age of 67."
"Celebrities responded to the death of Walter Becker Steele Dan's lead guitarist."



Number  65
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...musician Jack Antonoff made a donation to the ACLU to support those affected by Trump’s executive orders.”
“Fun.”
“Scandal star Kerry Washington encouraged her followers to remember American history.”
“Pop star Miley Cyrus pledged her support to immigrants in the country.”
“Even director Judd Apatow followed suit.”
“Actor Rosie O’Donnell pledged to match Sia’s donation to the ACLU in turn.”
“Musician Sia told her followers that she would match their donations to the ACLU up to $100k.”
“Gaycation star Ellen Page attended a protest at John F. Kennedy International Airport.”
“Grey’s Anatomy‘s Jesse Williams pointed out that many of the country’s accomplishments were due to immigrants and refugees.”
“Actor Mindy Kaling referenced her book, where she details her parents’ experience as immigrants.”


“…… Musician Jack Antonov donated to the ACLU to support those affected by Trump's executive order
"Interesting."
"Scandal star Kerry Washington encourages her followers to remember American history."
"Pop star Miley Cyrus is committed to supporting immigrants in the country."
"Even the director, Judd apato, followed suit."
"Actor Rosie O'Donnell has promised to match the donation to the new course American Civil Liberties Union."
"Musician thea told her followers that she would match their donations up to $100000 to ACLU."
"Gaycation star Alan page attended the protest at Kennedy International Airport."
"Jesse Williams of gray anatomy points out that many of the country's achievements are due to immigrants and refugees."
Actress Mindy Kaling cites her book, which details her parents' experiences as immigrants



Number  66
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“CNN’s Cheri Mossburg and Stella Chan contributed to this report.”
“CNN has reached out to both Pitt and Jolie’s representatives for comment.”
“Democratic and Republican Presidential candidates are finishing up with the last full day of campaigning before voters head to the polls tomorrow.”
“(Photo by Joe Raedle/Getty Images)The gate-keeper - Huma Abedin has worn many hats for Hillary Clinton - intern, "body woman," chief of staff - but the title that best describes her is gate keeper and confidant.”
“No one without the last name Clinton is said to have a tighter relationship with the former secretary of state.”
“Although her formal title in the 2016 campaign is not yet clear, she remains one of Clinton's most trusted personal aides.”
“Studio assistants Alex Cameron and Olivia Steen move apart the wax figures of Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie at Madame Tussauds London following the news of their divorce on Wednesday September 21, 2016.”
“LOS ANGELES, CA - NOVEMBER 05: Actress/director Angelina Jolie Pitt (L) and husband actor Brad Pitt arrive at the AFI FEST 2015 presented by Audi opening night gala premiere of Universal Pictures' "By The Sea" at the Chinese Theatre on November 5, 2015 in Los Angeles, California.”
“(Photo by Kevin Winter/Getty Images)LOS ANGELES, CA - JANUARY 29: (L-R) Actor Brad Pitt (L) and actress Angelina Jolie arrive at the 18th Annual Screen Actors Guild Awards at The Shrine Auditorium on January 29, 2012 in Los Angeles, California.”
“(Photo by Jason Merritt/Getty Images)Actors Angelina Jolie and Brad Pitt attend the World Premiere of Disney's "Maleficent" at the El Capitan Theatre in 2014 in Hollywood, California.”


"Cherie mosberg and Stella Chen of CNN contributed to this report."
"CNN has contacted representatives of Pitt and Julie for comments."
"Democratic and Republican presidential candidates will finish their last day's campaign before voters go to the polling station tomorrow."
(Photo by Joe raedle / Getty Images) doorman huma Abedin, who once wore many hats for Hillary Clinton, is the office director's "body woman", but her title can best be described as doorman and confidant
"No one named Clinton is said to be closer to the former Secretary of state."
"Although her official title in the 2016 campaign is unclear, she is still one of Clinton's most trusted personal assistants."
Studio assistants Alex Cameron and Olivia sting separate their wax figures at Madame Tussauds in London on Wednesday, September 21, 2016, after news of Brad Pitt's divorce from Angelina Jolie
"November 5, Los Angeles, California: Actress / Director Angelina Jolie Pitt (left) and husband actor Brad Pitt attended the AFI Film Festival 2015, the premiere of Audi Universal Pictures' seaside at the Chinese Theater in Los Angeles, California on November 5, 2015."
(Kevin winter / Getty pictures) Los Angeles, California - January 29: (left right) actor Brad Pitt (left) and actress Angelina Jolie arrive at the Shrine Auditorium for the 18th annual guild of actors awards in Los Angeles, California January 29, 2012
(Jason Merritt / Getty Images) in 2014, actors Angelina Jolie and Brad Pitt attended the world premiere of Disney's maleficent at the El Capitan theatre in Hollywood, California



Number  67
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“They entered to take a dip and smiled while looking at their phones together.”
“Earlier this month, Billie and Taylor were photographed holding hands while they enjoyed some quiet pool time together in Cabo San Lucas.”
“The family wishes that she takes her time and makes no major decisions while she is still grieving."”
“Now she has this huge hole in her life and we are worried that she will rush into marriage with Taylor to fill it," a friend tells Naughty Gossip, "He is a great guy, but she needs to take a little time before she rushes into any life changing decision.”
“"Carrie and Debbie were everything to Billie.”
“However, some think the 24-year-old actress is getting too close to the "Twilight" actor too quickly and she needs time to breathe.”
“Rumor has it, Billie wants to tie the knot with Taylor, just a month after the loss of her loved ones.”
“It's all thanks to her boyfriend Taylor Lautner who is doing his best to help Billie enjoy herself with a trip to Cabo San Lucas.”
“Jan 31, 2017AceShowbiz - Billie Lourd is coping very well following the loss of her mom Carrie Fisher and grandma Debbie Reynolds.”
“CelebrityJust a month after the loss of her mom Carrie Fisher and grandma Debbie Reynolds, Billie wants to tie the knot with her boyfriend.”


"They came in for a bath, looked at their cell phones and laughed together."
Earlier this month, Billy and Taylor were photographed holding hands while enjoying a quiet pool in Cape Saint Lucas
"The family wanted her to take her time and not make big decisions while she was still sad."
"There's a huge hole in her life now, and we're worried that she'll rush to marry Taylor to fill it," a friend told mischievous gossip. "He's a great man, but she needs a little time before she makes any hasty decision to change her life."
"Carrie and Debbie are everything to Billy."
"However, some people think that the 24-year-old actress is too close to the twilight cast, too fast, and she needs time to breathe."
"It's rumored that Billy wants to marry Tyler a month after he lost his family."
"Thanks to her boyfriend Tyler Lautner, who is doing his best to help Billy have a good time in Cabo San Lucas."
"Aceshowbiz Billie Lourd lived a good life in 2017 after losing her mother, Carrie Fisher, and grandmother, Debbie Reynolds."
"Just a month after losing his mother, Kelly Fisher, and grandmother, Debbie Reynolds, Billy wanted to marry her boyfriend."



Number  68
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“A spokesman for the city of Springdale told TMZ, which first reported the suit, that the claims are “without merit and false.””
“The suit alleges that officials in the small town failed to properly consult with various branches of government before releasing the documents.”
“The original story led to the cancellation of the TLC reality show “19 Kids and Counting.”The sisters are not contesting the accuracy of the In Touch report — indeed, they themselves subsequently confirmed that they were the victims in the case.”
“Instead, they seem to be following the playbook of Hulk Hogan, who brought down Gawker with an invasion-of-privacy claim.”
“The sisters — Jill Dillard, Joy Duggar, Jessa Seewald, and Jinger Vuolo — also sued the city of Springdale, Arkansas, and Washington County, Arkansas, which released investigative records to In Touch pursuant to a public records request.”
“The suit alleges that the localities violated state and federal privacy laws in releasing the documents.”
““Plaintiffs had no knowledge that the highly personal and painful details revealed in their confidential interviews would be disclosed to anyone except law enforcement and child services personnel,” the suit states.”
““Indeed, they were instructed that their statements would remain confidential and not be released to the public.”According to the suit, local officials provided the sensitive police records just five days after receiving a records request from In Touch’s lawyer.”
“If they had done so, the plaintiffs allege they would have discovered that juvenile records were not subject to disclosure.”
“In Touch has not responded.”


A Springdale spokesman told TMZ, who first reported the lawsuit, that the charges were "groundless and false."
"The lawsuit alleges that town officials did not properly consult with government departments before releasing the documents."
The original story led to the cancellation of the TLC reality show 19 children and counting. The sisters did not dispute the accuracy of the contact report - in fact, they later confirmed that they were the victims of the case
"Instead, they seem to be following Hulk Hogan's script, which topples tech for privacy violations."
"The sisters - Jill Dillard, Joey Dugar, Jesse Seward, and ginger wallow - also sued Springdale, Arkansas, and Washington County, Arkansas, which released the investigation records to contact in response to a public record request."
"The lawsuit alleges that these places violated state and federal privacy laws in publishing these documents."
"The plaintiffs did not know that the very personal and painful details revealed in their secret conversation would be disclosed to anyone other than law enforcement and child service personnel," the complaint said
"In fact, they are instructed that their statements will remain confidential and will not be made public." According to the lawsuit, local officials provided sensitive police records only five days after receiving a record request from a "contact" lawyer
"If they do, the plaintiffs claim that they will find that the minors' records will not be disclosed."
"No response in contact."



Number  69
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“On Friday, she live-streamed clips of his concert on her Instagram account — singing along to his songs and smiling wide throughout.”
“Image zoom Credit: Erika Goldring/Getty ImagesRELATED VIDEO: How Gwen Stefani Surprised Herself as a Mom of Three BoysAnd Stefani has turned into Shelton’s biggest fan too.”
“Shelton and Stefani, 47, met as coaches on The Voice and started dating not long after Shelton’s divorce from fellow country crooner Miranda Lambert and Stefani’s divorce from husband Gavin Rossdale.”
““You know, texting each other,” he said.”
“But Shelton, with the cheers of the audience behind him, quickly recovered from the apparent snafu.”
“In video captured of the moment and shared online by her fans, Stefani can be seen lifting her head from Shelton’s shoulder and flashing him a shocked expression.”
“...whose oldest sons Zuma 8 and Kingston 10 were in the audience shook...”
“In between songs like Neon Light A Guy with a Girl The Baby Every Time I Hear That Song and fittingly Ol Red Shelton joked about the origins of their relationship explaining they started hanging out together and messing around Image zoom Credit Kevin Mazur WireImage His admission had Stefani...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Reaching Out, a local charity that provides assistance to family members of people battling cancer — was a prelude to Saturday’s block party, which will officially open the venue.”


"Last Friday, she showed live footage of his concert on her instagram account - singing along with his songs, smiling all the way."
"Credit for image zooming: Erica godlin / Getty Images related video: Gwen Stephanie surprised herself as the mother of three boys, and Stephanie became Sheldon's biggest fan."
Sheldon and Stephanie, 47, met as coaches on the sound and began dating shortly after Sheldon divorced fellow singer Miranda Lambert and Stephanie divorced her husband Gavin Rosedale
"You know, texting each other," he said
But Shelton, cheered by the crowd, soon recovered from the apparent chaos
"In the video taken at this moment, Stefani can be seen looking up from Sheldon's shoulder and showing him a look of shock."
“…… Their eldest sons Zuma 8 and Kingston 10 were shocked in the audience
"In the middle of a song like neon, a boy and a girl, every time I hear that song, she jokes about the origin of their relationship, explains that they started to get together, messed up the picture, zoomed in the picture of Kevin mazul, who admitted to having Stephanie..."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Helping out, a local charity that helps families of cancer patients, is a prelude to Saturday's block party, which will officially open."



Number  70
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“So, I’m lucky.””
“There is no one else I would have ever wanted to spend my life with except him.”
“He’s an incredible, amazing man and such a good partner to go through life with.”
“Obviously, it took work and getting past things between the two of us, but it was all very worth it.”
“It was familiar territory, but when a lot of time goes by, it’s like getting to know a new person.” She adds, “He was somebody I’d always cared about so deeply and loved very deeply.”
““I think we were both a little unsure about what was going on in the very beginning.”
“Is that so?’ ” she explains.”
“I want us to always be cool and be friends.’ He was like, ‘Yeah, here’s the thing: We’re not going to be friends.’ And I was like, ‘Oh.”
“"I remember we were hanging out and I was like, ‘Listen, I’m really, really happy for us to be friends again.”
“Miami...”


"So, I'm lucky."
"I don't want to spend my life with anyone else but him."
"He's an incredible, amazing person and a good companion to spend a lifetime with."
"It's clear that we need to work hard and overcome difficulties between the two of us, but it's all well worth it."
"It's a familiar area, but when a lot of time goes by, it's like meeting a new person," she added. "He's a person I've always cared about and loved."
"I think we're all a little bit uncertain about what happened in the first place."
"Is that so? "She explained
"I hope we always keep calm and become friends." "Yes, it's like this: we won't be friends," he said I said, "Oh."
"I remember when we were together, I said," listen, I'm really, really happy that we can be friends again. "
"Miami..."



Number  71
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at 800-344-9598 any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“...sister We pay for juicy info...”
“She intends to wipe that smirk off her face and has instructed her agents to contact all the main booking and scouting companies the mole insists adding plus she s networking like crazy in the same business circles as her...”
“Kendall s superior attitude towards her and the rest of the family since she hit the big time modeling...”
“In her opinion she has just as much to offer in the beauty and style stakes Not only does the lip kit queen think she has what it takes but a pal tells us she s also fed up with...”
“An informant close to the situation dishes to Radar, “Kylie has never understood the big fuss about Kendall and her catwalk career.”
“Kylie, 20, is taking her rivalry with Kendall, 21, up a level – by launching a modeling career in direct competition to her older sis!”
“Sinister sister Kylie Jenner is fed up with her model sibling Kendall Jenner‘s “superior attitude” since rising to high-fashion fame, so she’s plotting to conquer her catwalk career, a pal snitches to RadarOnline.com exclusively.”
“Kylie Plotting To Conquer Kendall's Catwalk Career The youngest Jenner is 'fed up' with her model sibling's 'superior attitude.'”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call 800-344-9598 at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
“… Sister, we pay for interesting information... "
"She's going to wipe that silly smile off her face and instruct her agent to contact all the major booking and scouting companies," the insider insisted. In addition, she and her contacts in the same business circle are also crazy... "
"Kendall's superior attitude towards her and the rest of her family since she became the best model in the world..."
"In her opinion, she has the same many things to choose from the bets of beauty and fashion, not only the queen of the lipstick thinks she has the ability, but also a friend tells us that she has had enough..."
"An informant close to the situation reminds us," Kelly never understood what trouble Kendall and her fashion career would have
"Kelly, 20, is taking her competition with 21-year-old Kendall to a new level - she started a modeling career, competing directly with her sister!"
"The evil sister Kylie Jenner is tired of her model brother Kendall Jenner's" superior attitude "after she became famous, so she is plotting to conquer her runway career," a friend whistled RadarOnline.com Exclusive to the website. "
"Kelly is plotting to conquer Kendall's fashion show career. Jenna, the youngest, is tired of her model brother's" superior attitude. "



Number  72
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Find out more → https://t.co/5FY1AWbg4Y pic.twitter.com/PDVVcgzvlG — Kensington Palace (@KensingtonRoyal) March 30, 2017”
“Right now, the palace press office is in overdrive trying to fix Prince William’s disastrous image, thanks to his Swiss rendezvous last week and clear disregard for protocol, tradition, or basic decency.”
“As such, we’re hearing that sources close to the royals are now alleging that Kate Middleton wants Prince William to go to couple’s therapy with her.”
“Couple’s therapy works for some marriages, and doesn’t work for others – but this is THE royal marriage we’re talking about.”
“Prince William’s marriage to Kate Middleton is probably the most scrutinized marriage in the world, especially right now, and that attention will only make the idea of couple’s therapy more difficult to pull off.”
“For example, what therapist should they go to?”
“What facility?”
“Does the therapist come to the palace?”
“Any way they try to slice this, the press getting even a whiff of this would lead to widespread speculation that Prince William and Kate Middleton are getting a divorce.”
“His marriage to Kate Middleton is also clearly in tatters as a result, and any other wife might have left by know.”


"Learn more → https://t.co/5FY1AWbg4Ypic.twitter.com/PDVVcgzvlG- Kensington Palace (@ Kensington Royal) 30 March 2017 "
"Now, the palace press office is trying to repair Prince William's disastrous image, thanks to his meeting in Switzerland last week and his apparent disregard for etiquette, tradition or basic etiquette."
"So we've heard sources close to the royal family now claim that Kate Middleton wants Prince William to go with her for treatment."
"Conjugal therapy works for some marriages and doesn't work for others - but that's what we're talking about in Royal marriages."
"Prince William's marriage to Kate Middleton may be the most watched marriage in the world, especially now, which will only make the idea of couple therapy more difficult to realize."
"For example, which therapist should they go to?"
"What facilities?"
"Has the therapist come to the palace?"
"No matter what they think about it, even if the media can smell it, it will lead to widespread speculation that Prince William and Kate Middleton are going to divorce."
"His marriage to Kate Middleton has obviously fallen apart, and any other wife could leave with knowledge."



Number  73
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Do you really think she cares about the money she makes from a little TV show?””
“And while first-time-expecting Kylie is reportedly less than thrilled with certain physical aspects of her first pregnancy, she’s over the moon about becoming a mother.”
“Kris Jenner Liposuction Panic After Hitting 200 Lbs.!”
““Kylie’s makeup company made $400 million last year, and she will be the first billion-dollar sister,” a pal remarked after “Keeping Up with the Kardashians” was renewed on E!”
“But their baby sis, makeup queen Kylie Jenner, couldn’t care less!”
“The Kardashian clan has signed a massive $150 million TV deal, with most of the reality show cash going to Kim, Khloé and Kourtney.”
“Rob Shuter reports….”


"Do you really think she cares about the money she makes from a small TV show?"
"It's reported that although Kelly, who is pregnant for the first time, is not so excited about some physiological aspects of her first pregnancy, she is very excited about becoming a mother."
"Chris Jenner hit 200 pounds after liposuction panic."
"Kelly's cosmetics company made $400 million last year, and she's going to be the first sister to make $1 billion," a friend said after "keep up with Kardashian" renewed her E-contract
"But their little sister, the queen of make-up, Kelly Jenner, doesn't care!"
"The Kardashian family has signed a huge $150 million television deal, and most of the cash for reality shows has gone to Kim, Heroe and Courtney."
"Rob Shuter report..."



Number  74
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, do you really think Kimye are splitting?”
“Despite Kim’s rep denying the divorce report, Life & Style still continues to report that the couple is struggling.”
“Kim has allegedly made the decision to file for divorce from Yeezy and is ‘ready to move on’ with her life, according to a new report.”
“UPDATE: A rep for Kim exclusively reveals to HollywoodLife.com that this report is “absolutely false.” — Original report: Kim Kardashian, 37, will allegedly be filing for divorce from Kanye West, 40, Life & Style reports, adding that “it’s officially over” between the power couple.”
““She is ready to move on with her life,” an insider tells the mag.”
“After Ye s 2016 hospitalization where reports claimed he suffered a mental breakdown the source says that things only got worse with his erratic behavior Upon his release from UCLA Medical Center back in Nov 2016 Kanye s felt spied on by Kim which has caused him to come distant...”
“...as reported by the mag...”
““Kanye will go days without talking to her.”
“He’s hot and he’s cold.”
“Even their sex life isn’t what it used to be.”The mag goes on to report that Kanye is hiding dark secrets, that only Kim knows about.”


"Holly worm, do you really think the golden leaf is going to split?"
"Although Kim's representative denied the divorce report, life and fashion continues to report that the couple are struggling."
According to a new report, Jin Yaner is said to have made a decision to divorce Yeats and is ready to continue her life
Update: a representative of King exclusively revealed that the report of Hollywood Life "is absolutely false." - original report: Kim Kardashian, 37, is said to be divorcing Kanye West, 40, and life & Style reports, adding that the "relationship between power couples" is officially over
"She's ready to move on with her life," one insider told the magazine
"After Ye was hospitalized in 2016, it was reported that he had a mental breakdown. The source said that after he was discharged from UCLA Medical Center in November 2016, the situation would only get worse, because his unstable behavior made Kanye feel monitored by Kim, which made him alienated..."
“… According to the magazine
"Kanye didn't talk to her for days."
"He's hot and cold."
"Even their sex life is not what it used to be." The magazine went on to report that Kanye had a secret that only Kim knew



Number  75
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“‘A crowd of people is not at all a sterile environment – she could have caught a virus flying around.’”
“She praised the Duchess’ ‘heroic deed’ in emerging hours after giving birth, but stressed: ‘Of course it is risky.”
“Others bizarrely claimed the child – who shares her birthday with Catherine the Great of Russia – was born several days earlier with the event kept secret.”
“A leading pro-Kremlin paper also claimed the Duchess of Cambridge ‘put the health of her daughter at risk for the sake of her subjects’ by appearing in public so soon.”
“Scroll down for video Russians yesterday insisted there had been a conspiracy over the royal birth and a surrogate mother must have carried the baby princess Russian women said it was impossible for Prince William s wife to look so...”
“...good immediately after the birth...”
“‘If she really gave birth naturally, it was surely some days ago,’ said one woman commenting on the story in Komsomolskaya Pravda newspaper.”
“Another wrote: ‘Look at the baby – she does not look like a newborn at all.”
“She is at least three days old.”
“There is nothing which would help a woman even if she gave birth with the help of best doctors stand up five hours after giving birth and leave the clinic on her feet Then came the extraordinary allegation that the...”


"The crowd is not a sterile environment at all - she may be infected with viruses flying around."
"She praised the Duchess for her" heroic behavior "in the hours after childbirth, but stressed:" of course there are risks. "
"Others claim strangely that the child - who shared her birthday with Catherine the great of Russia - was born a few days ago and that the incident has been kept secret."
"A leading newspaper supporting the Kremlin also claimed that the Duchess of Cambridge appeared in public so quickly that she" put her daughter's health at risk for the sake of her subjects. "
"The Russians insisted yesterday that there was a conspiracy at the birth of the royal family. The surrogate mother must be pregnant with a little princess. The Russian woman said that Prince William's wife could not look like this..."
“… Immediately after birth... "
"If she really gave birth naturally, it must have been a few days ago," a woman said in the Communist Youth League Pravda, commenting on the matter
Another wrote, "look at this baby - she doesn't look like a newborn at all."
"She's at least three days old."
"Even if a woman gives birth with the help of the best doctor, and she stands up and leaves the clinic five hours after giving birth, there is nothing that can help her, and then there is an extraordinary accusation that..."



Number  76
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I remained silent in an attempt to protect my family from further embarrassment and to restore a small degree of the privacy they have lost.”
“In April of 2018 the disgraced anchor made a statement to the Washington Post in which he said, "I have made no public comments on the many false stories from anonymous or biased sources that have been reported about me over these past several months...”
““Matt and Shamin have known each other for many years, as she spends a lot of time in the Hamptons, as does he," a source close to Lauer told Page Six.”
“Not long after the divorce was finalized, Lauer reportedly began dating marketing and public relations executive Shamin Abas.”
“A source reportedly told the publication that the former couple, who have three children together, were on good terms.”
“The publication stated at the time that Lauer would pay Roque up to $20 million in a divorce and that she retained the ownership of a horse farm that they jointly owned in the Hamptons.”
“The couple had been separated for almost two years.”
“James Devaney Getty ImagesAccording to reports from Page Six, Lauer and Rocque filed for an uncontested divorce in July of 2019, which was finalized by a Suffolk County Supreme Court judge that September.”
“Matt Lauer at a basketball game with his children Jack, Romy, and Thijs at Madison Square Garden in January 2016.”
“Laying Low After 'Today'After his firing from the Today show in November 2017, Lauer reportedly spent his days holed up in his now-for sale Hamptons house, where he "focused on family."”


"I kept silent, trying to protect my family from further embarrassment and restore a small part of their lost privacy."
"In April 2018, the discredited anchor issued a statement to the Washington Post, in which he said," in the past few months, anonymous or biased sources have reported many false reports about me, and I have not made any public comments... "
"Matt and shaming have known each other for many years because she and he have spent a lot of time in Hampton," a source close to Raul told page 6
It is reported that shortly after the divorce, Raul began dating marketing and public relations director shamin Abbas
"According to reports, a source told the media that the former couple had three children and had a good relationship."
"It was said in the publication at the time that Raul would pay rock up to $20 million in divorce fees and she retained the ownership of a racecourse they jointly owned in Hampton."
"The couple have been separated for nearly two years."
"James devanni Getty photo according to the report on page 6, Raul and Locke filed a divorce without objection in July 2019, which was finally determined by the Supreme Court judge of Suffolk County in September of the same year."
"In January 2016, Matt Raul and his children, Jack, ROMMY and tis, played basketball in Madison Square Garden."
"In November 2017, Raul was fired from the" Today Show ". He kept a low profile after the" Today Show ". According to reports, Raul hid in his Hampton villa for sale all day," focusing on family. "



Number  77
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“‘Truth will set you free, but not until it’s done with you first.’””
“What’s the David Foster Wallace quote?”
“Brad Pitt celebrated his 54th birthday on Monday, and a source tells PEOPLE the actor is doing well and taking better care of himself since his split from Angelina Jolie in September 2016.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““In a sense, this split was good for Brad because he sized himself up and realized there had to be changes,” an industry source tells PEOPLE.”
“While his divorce from Jolie is not yet final, the two are moving forward amicably and coordinating schedules so both can spend time with their six kids.”
“Image zoom Credit: Splash News Online“Brad and Angie are doing OK, working out time for him to be with the kids which he treasures,” says the source.”
“Image zoom Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie in 2014 | Credit: Kevin Mazur/WireImageHe’s also been “casually dating,” according to the source.”
““He has been going out but there is nothing serious in the dating area at all, nothing to speak of at this point,” adds the insider.”
“Pitt previously opened up about how he’s moving forward since announcing the end of his 12-year relationship and two-year marriage with Jolie.”


"Truth will set you free, but only if you finish it first."
"What's David Foster Wallace's famous saying?"
"Brad Pitt celebrated his 54th birthday on Monday, and a source told people that Brad Pitt has done well and taken better care of her since she broke up with Angelina Jolie in September 2016."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"In a sense, the break-up was good for Brad because he measured himself and realized that something had to change," an industry source told people
"Although his and Julie's divorce has not yet been finalized, they are moving forward in a friendly way and coordinating their schedules so that they can both have time with their six children."
"Credit for image zooming: splash news online" Brad and Angie did a good job of making time for him to spend with his beloved children
"Photo of Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie in 2014 source: Kevin mazul / WireImage he also" dates at will, "according to sources
"He's been dating, but it's not serious at all in terms of dating, and there's nothing to say now," the person familiar with the matter added
"Pete has publicly said how he has moved forward since announcing the end of his 12 year relationship and two-year marriage with Julie."



Number  78
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Even with this, she still gets nervous in public.””
“(Image: Splash News)Video Loading Video Unavailable Click to play Tap to play The video will auto-play soon 8 Cancel Play nowA source had told The Sun : “Kim and Calum dated when they were a lot younger – they weren’t in the public eye back then.”
“...fling with Calum Best...”
“A spokesperson for Keeping Up With The Kardashians star Kim, 36, said the pair had crossed paths at school as children but that’s as far as any connection went.”
““The story is false.”
“They never dated however he was in her 5th grade class said the rep Image Splash News Image Channel 5 Calum s official Twitter account had earlier retweeted the story about a rumoured hook up with the cheeky message Calum and Kim Sitting in a tree The rumour about Kim...”
“...and Calum currently in the Celebrity Big Brother house surfaced overnight...”
“According to the claims, Kim had been introduced to Calum via stepbrother Brody Jenner way before she even met first husband, Damon Thomas.”
““Calum was close pals with Brody and is still friends with him and Scott Disick today."”
“A source said: “Kim feels safe, but that is because she has triple the security that she used to have.”


"Even so, she will be nervous in public."
"When Kim and Calum were dating, they were much younger and out of public view," a source told the sun
“… With Karen best... "
"Kim, 36, a spokesman for Kardashian, said the two met at school as children, but it was just a connection between them."
"The story is false."
"They've never dated, but he said in her fifth grade class that the official twitter account on behalf of picture splash news picture channel 5 Karem earlier forwarded a story about rumor collusion, cheeky news, the rumor that Karem and Kim are sitting in a tree, Kim..."
“… And kalum is now in the celebrity big brother's house, which has surfaced overnight... "
"It is reported that Kim was introduced to kalum through his stepbrother Brody Jenner before he met his first husband Damon Thomas."
"Callum and Brody are good friends and are still friends with Scott Disick today."
"Kim feels safe, but that's because she's three times as safe as she used to be," a source said



Number  79
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It seems that both on and off the court, Tristan needs to do something – and fast.”
“Tristan wasn’t bragging afterwards, as he only put up 14 points as Cleveland barely won the game.”
“Khloe Kardashian has reportedly told Tristan that he needs to propose or their relationship is over.”
“Even after Tristan Thompson’s alleged cheating, Khloe Kardashian, 33, is reportedly going all-in on her relationship with her baby daddy.”
“The Keeping Up with the Kardashians star has told Tristan that he needs “to propose or get lost,” an insider tells In Touch.”
“This ultimatum has left those in Khloe’s inner circle shook.”
““Friends can’t believe that she would consider giving him a second chance, let alone marry him,” a source tells In Touch.”
““She forgave Lamar [Odom] for cheating,” the insider added, “and now she’s doing the same thing with Tristan.”
“She thinks marriage will be the answer to their problems, even though it’s clear she can never trust them again.” True.”
“Khloe and Lamar’s relationship was plagued with tons of problems, but she judging by what she did with James Harden, 28, KoKo may not be so forgiving.”


"It seems that Tristan needs to do something both on and off the court - and fast."
"Tristan didn't brag afterwards because he only got 14 points and Cleveland hardly won the game."
"It is reported that Kardashian has told Tristan that he needs to propose or their relationship will be over."
"Even after Tristan Thompson was accused of cheating, Khloe Kardashian, 33, is reported to be fully committed to maintaining her relationship with her little father."
"The Kardashian star told Tristan that he needed to" either propose or get lost, "a person familiar with the matter told contact magazine
"This ultimatum shocked people in the inner circle of helo."
"Friends can't believe she's considering giving him a second chance, let alone marrying him," one source told contact
"She forgave Lamar (Odom) for cheating," the person familiar with the matter added. "Now she has done the same thing to Tristan."
She thinks marriage is the answer to their problems, though it's clear that she can't trust them anymore
"There are a lot of problems with Khloe's relationship with Lamar, but judging from her relationship with James Harden, 28, Koko may not be so tolerant."



Number  80
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Jennifer Lopez believes that Alex Rodriguez is her soulmate, and she can’t believe how happy she is.”
“AdvertisementInsiders say that Lopez and Rodriguez’s kids are also ready for them to tie the knot, and the couple is happy that all of the children get along and have accepted their new family.”
“Sources say that Lopez sees herself marrying A-Rod sooner rather than later, and she is starting to get impatient.”
“Are the singer and future baseball Hall-of-Famer headed for a split if he doesn’t put a ring on it?”
“According to Life & Style, J.”
“Lo thinks Rodriguez is “the one,” but she doesn’t want to put too much pressure on him since they have both been married before.”
“But, that isn’t keeping her from looking at rings and pointing out what she likes when they walk past an expensive jewelry store.”
“#FeelingTheLove #GroupHug #FamilyTime A post shared by Alex Rodriguez (@arod) on May 19, 2018 at 9:53pm PDTLopez tied the knot for the first time back in 1997 when she married Ojani Noa, but they divorced just one year later.”
“Her second marriage to Cris Judd lasted for only two years, 2001 to 2003.”
“Then, she got married a third time back in 2004 to singer Marc Anthony.”


"Jennifer Lopez believes Alex Rodriguez is her soul mate. She can't believe how happy she is."
"Advertising insiders say the children of Lopez and Rodriguez are also ready to get married, and the couple are happy that all the children get along well and accept their new family."
"It's reported that Lopez thinks it's a matter of time before she marries A-Rod, and she's starting to get impatient."
"If this singer and future Baseball Hall of fame don't wear a ring, will he be split?"
"According to lifestyle, J."
Rodriguez thinks Rodriguez is "the only one", but she doesn't want to put too much pressure on him because they have been married before
"But that doesn't stop her from looking at the ring and pointing out what she likes when it passes an expensive jewelry store."
"# feel love # group hug # family time on May 19, 2018 at 9:53 PM, Alex Rodriguez (@ arod) shared a post that pdtlopez married Ojani NOA for the first time in 1997, but they divorced a year later."
Her second marriage to Christie Judd lasted only two years, from 2001 to 2003
"Then she married singer Mark Anthony for the third time in 2004."



Number  81
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Please visit the source responsible for the item in question to report any concerns you may have regarding content or accuracy.”
“The news articles, Tweets, and blog posts do not represent IMDb's opinions nor can we guarantee that the reporting therein is completely factual.”
“This content is published for the entertainment of our users only.”
“An article in the latest issue of Life […]IMDb.com, Inc. takes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, Tweets, or blog posts.”
“As Gossip Cop reported, Stiller and wife Christine Taylor split in late May after 17 years of marriage.”
“That’s the claim in one of this week’s new tabloids, but Gossip Cop has the truth.”
“Is Justin Theroux really playing matchmaker for Ben Stiller following the actor’s separation?”


"Please visit the person in charge of the relevant project and report any concerns about content or accuracy."
"News articles, tweets and blog posts don't represent IMDB's opinions, and we can't guarantee that the reports in them are completely true."
"This content is published just to entertain our users."
"An article in the latest issue of life [..." ] IMDb.com , Inc. assumes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, tweets or blog posts. "
Stiller and his wife, Christina Taylor, broke up at the end of May after 17 years of marriage, gossip police reported
"That's what a new tabloid said on Monday, but gossip police has the truth."
"Is Justin seru really the matchmaker for Ben Stiller after he broke up?"



Number  82
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“Does this prove Blac Chyna's abuse allegations are true?”
“Rob Kardashian acting out-of-control is nothing new.”
“RadarOnline.com has found footage of the troubled reality star with a short temper slapping his ex in the face!”
“As Radar has reported, Kardashian is currently at war with ex Blac Chyna, after his online hissy fit saw him slamming his baby mama for allegedly cheating on him.”
“Chyna snapped back with accusations of her own, claiming that she was abused by Rob, and that truth would soon come out.”
“Insiders deny that Rob was ever abusive, but he’s put his hands on a woman at least once before.”
“In an old clip clip from KUWTK, Rob is seen fighting with then-girlfriend Adrienne Bailon in front of Kris and the rest of his family.”
“He berates the singer for “calling off the f***ing wedding in India.”He then grabs her, and slaps her right across the face, as Kris looks on in horror.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"Does this prove that Blake ziner's abuse charges are true?"
"Rob Kardashian's behavior out of control is nothing new."
“ RadarOnline.com He found the scene of the troubled reality TV star slapping his ex boyfriend in the face
"According to radar reports, Kardashian is currently at war with the former blac Chyna, who hissed on the Internet and accused his mother of deceiving him."
"Gina fiercely refuted her accusations, claiming that she was abused by Rob, and the truth will soon be revealed."
"Insiders deny that rob has been abusive, but he has at least once attacked a woman before."
"In an old clip from kutek, rob is seen fighting with his then girlfriend Adrian Byron in front of Chris and his family."
He reprimanded the singer for "canceling the wedding in India," then grabbed her and slapped her in the face. Chris looked at her in horror



Number  83
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Do you think she’s a good fit for him?”
“HollywoodLifers, what do you think of Liam and Cheryl’s new romance?”
“We love Liam Payne and so do his 1D bandmates, which is why one of them is worried that he’s about to get seriously hurt by new love Cheryl Fernandez-Versini!”
“HollywoodLife.com has the EXCLUSIVE details on why Harry Styles thinks she’s totally wrong for him.”
“Liam Payne, 22, has been spending lots of time with new girlfriend, British X-Factor judge Cheryl Fernadez-Versini, 32, as of late.”
“While he seems totally enamored of their time together – even posting selfies of himself cudding on her lap – his pal Harry Styles, 22, is worried that the soon-to-be-divorced singer is going to break his heart, HollywoodLife.com has EXCLUSIVELY learned.”
“Keep reading for the shocking reasons why Harry thinks they’re a terrible fit!”
““Harry and Liam are the best of friends, so naturally he only wants the best for his buddy.”
“However, Harry does have his concerns about his new relationship with Cheryl.”
“He doesn’t want to see Liam get burned, a source tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”


"Do you think she suits him?"
"Hollywood stars, what do you think of Liam and Cheryl's new relationship?"
"We love Liam Penn, and his 1D band mates love him, and that's why one of them is worried that he will be seriously hurt by his new sweetheart Cheryl Fernandez wisini!"
"Hollywood life has exclusive details about why Harry stiles thinks she's totally unsuitable for him."
"Liam Payne, 22, has recently been with her new girlfriend Cheryl fernadez versini, 32, a judge at the X-factor in the UK."
"Although he seems to be totally infatuated with their time together - even putting his selfie on her lap - his 22-year-old friend Harry styles worries that the divorcing singer will break his heart, and Hollywood life has learned it all."
"Read on, why does Harry think they fit this shocking reason?"
"Harry and Liam are best friends, so naturally he just wants to give the best to his friends."
"But Harry does have concerns about his new relationship with Cheryl."
"He didn't want to see Liam burned to death," a source said



Number  84
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...pregnant with their first child If she isn t preggo and they really wanted the gossip to stop they would just issue a denial but we think it s telling that they haven t...”
“The only things left are a wedding and a baby In fact rumors are swirling that the couple plan to tie the knot in Hawaii by the end of summer adding fuel to the growing speculation that she s indeed...”
“Not only did they move in together, but the A-list actor has been spending time bonding with her daughter Madeline, and he recently spent the weekend with her parents when they came into town.”
“To us, those are two huge signs that she's got a bun in the oven!The Oscar winner and the SNL producer have been busy crossing off some major milestones on their relationship checklist recently.”
“...and her boobs have gotten a lot bigger...”
“Her maybe baby bump just keeps getting bigger Ben Affleck s girlfriend Lindsay Shookus left their shared Pacific Palisades mansion over the weekend with suitcases in hand and we couldn t help but notice that her midsection looked noticeably fuller...”


“… Pregnant with the first child, if she is not pregnant, they really want the rumors to stop, they will only deny it, but we think it means they are not... "
"There's only one wedding and one child left. In fact, the rumor is that the couple plan to get married in Hawaii before the end of the summer, which makes more and more people guess that she really..."
"Not only did they move together, but the A-level actor has been with his daughter Madeleine, who recently spent the weekend with her parents when they went to town."
"For us, these are two huge signs that she has a loaf in the oven! Oscar winners and SNL producers have recently been busy crossing out some important milestones on their relationship list
“… Her breasts are getting bigger... "
"Her stomach is getting bigger and bigger. Lindsay shookus, Ben Affleck's girlfriend, left their apartment in Pacific Palisades with a suitcase last weekend. We can't help noticing that her abdomen looks obviously fuller..."



Number  85
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““Heart and thoughts in Westminster.”Among others sending well-wishes to the city are Ellen DeGeneres, Nicki Minaj, Rob Lowe, and Edgar Wright.”
““All safe here,” he tweeted.”
“...the new Mary Poppins responded to fans checking in on him...”
“Celebs from across the world chimed in many of them being U K natives like J K Rowling who tweeted Bravery and simple humanity have shown Westminster at its best While Lin Manuel Miranda who is in the country filming...”
“K Parliament...”
“On the one year anniversary of the attack in Brussels tragedy struck London on Thursday after an attack there left at least four dead including the suspected assailant and a police officer and injuring 20 more outside of the U”
“J.K. Rowling, Lin-Manuel Miranda among those to share their well-wishes.”


"Heart and mind in Westminster." Also to the city are Ellen DeGeneres, Nicky Minagi, rob law and Edgar Wright
"Everything is safe here," he tweeted
“…… The new Mary Poppins responded to the fans' attention to him.... "
"Celebrities from all over the world agree. Many of them are British natives, such as JK Rowling. They show bravery and simple humanity on twitter, which makes Westminster show the best side. While linmanuel Miranda is shooting in Britain..."
"K Council..."
"On the first anniversary of the Brussels attack, an attack occurred in London on Thursday, killing at least four people, including the suspected attacker and a policeman, and injuring 20 others outside the United States."
"J.K. Rowling, linmanuel Miranda and others share their good wishes."



Number  86
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“"She won't fall in love anytime soon," the source revealed.”
“A source tells ET that the 49-year-old actress has started "casually dating," five months after announcing her split from husband Justin Theroux.”
“After Aniston and Theroux ended things, the Friends star "really relied on her friends to get her through the tough times," according to the source.”
“"During that time, she was able to heal and be comfortable with dating again."”
“"Jennifer has never felt she needed a man, but she loves love," the source continued.”
“"Jennifer is casually dating, but right now nothing serious.”
“She is just having fun, seeing where things go."”
“Jennifer Aniston Spotted in NYC for First Time Since Justin Theroux Split This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"She won't fall in love soon," the source said
A source told et that the 49 year old actress started "casual dating" five months after she announced her break-up with her husband, Justin Cyrus
After Aniston and Cyrus split up, friends star "really relied on her friends to pull her through," according to sources
"During that time, she was able to recover and it was comfortable to date again."
"Jennifer never felt that she needed a man, but she loved him," the source continued
"Jennifer's on a casual date, but it's nothing serious right now."
"She's just playing to see what's going on."
"For the first time since Justin Cyrus broke up, Jennifer Aniston found this video unavailable in New York because we couldn't load the sponsor's information."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page



Number  87
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  88
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Just an amazing job by her of setting the boundary."”
“I always tell her, like, she saved my life because she was the first person to really tell me that, like, the party's over.”
“"I didn't know what my plan was," he said.”
“After some thinking, Zac decided to try to convince a doctor to remove his gallbladder so that he could get prescription pills.”
“ABC via Getty ImagesHis partying, though, got more intense, and he desperately wanted more pills.”
“So, I had a lot of the outsides going on."”
“And, you know, I started dating a girl my sophomore year that I would eventually marry.”
“I mean, I was playing baseball, and I was trying to get out of there in four years, which I was able to do.”
“"I would not tell you that my drug use was so rampant during college.”
“And the Adderall eventually turned into some cocaine use here and there," he said.”


"She's great at setting boundaries."
"I always told her that she saved my life because she was the first to really tell me that the party was over."
"I don't know what my plan is," he said
After careful consideration, Zach decided to persuade a doctor to remove his gallbladder so that he could get the prescription medicine
"ABC via Getty Images although his party is getting more and more intense, he is eager for more pills."
"So, I have a lot to do."
"And, you know, I started dating a girl in my sophomore year, and I'll eventually marry her."
"I mean, I was playing baseball and I wanted to get out of it in four years, but I did it."
"I'm not going to tell you how rampant I was when I was in college."
"Snakes eventually turned into cocaine abuse," he said



Number  89
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“Dakota Johnson and Christ Martin were spotted in Malibu on Saturday, enjoying a romantic date night.”
“The elusive couple have been dating for several months but have managed to avoid being photographed together until now.”
“Johnson and Martin can be seen laughing and smiling in the photo, enjoying a moment together surrounded by a warm glow of lights.”
“Jacson / Splash NewsThe pair spent about two hours enjoying dinner and drinks at Soho House and arrived and left together in Martin's car.”
“In December, a source told ET that Johnson, 28, and Martin, 40 had been dating for at least two months.”
“"They’ve been dating since early October and spend most nights hanging out at his house and laying low," the source shared.”
“"His friends already love her and see how happy she makes him."”
“Rumors began when the two were spotted at a Nick Cave concert in Israel in November, according to multiple reports.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"Johnson and Christian Martin, Dakota, were photographed in Malibu on Saturday, enjoying a romantic date night."
"The elusive couple have been dating for months, but only now have they managed to avoid being photographed together."
"Johnson and Martin can be seen smiling in the picture, enjoying a moment together in the warm light."
"Jacson / splash news spent about two hours enjoying dinner and drinks at SOHO house, then arrived and left together in Martin's car."
Last December, a source told et that Johnson, 28, and Martin, 40, had been dating for at least two months
"They've been dating since early October, hanging out and lying in his house most nights," the source said
"His friends already love her. See how happy she makes him."
According to several reports, the rumor began last November when they were found at a concert in Nick Cave, Israel



Number  90
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, do you think it’s too soon for Selena and The Weeknd to get married and start a family together?”
“HollywoodLife.com has reached out for comment.”
“So is she going to walk down the aisle as a pregnant pride?!”
“Get all of the crazy details right here.”
“Selena Gomez, 24, is pregnant with The Weeknd‘s baby, sources claim to Life & Style magazine in their Feb. 13 issue.”
“OMG!”
““Selena is crazy about The Weeknd, 24, and has told pals that he’s the one,” one insider tells the mag, adding that the “Heart Wants What It Wants” singer has been experiencing cravings.”
““She’s [dropped] several hints that she’s expecting, complaining to those close to her that she’s too tired to stay out and that she feels nauseous.”
“When she’s not nauseous, though, she’s having weird cravings, and she can’t stop eating ice cream!” That certainly does seem a little fishy.”
“It sounds kind of nuts, but friends say that Selena “can’t wait to have a child of her own”, according to the report, and she’s constantly telling friends “how much she wants to be a mom”.”


"Holly worms, do you think it's too early for Selena and Zhou De to get married?"
"Hollywood Life" we've already contacted
"So, will she go to the palace of marriage like a pregnant pride?"
"Put all the crazy details here."
Serena Gomez, 24, is pregnant with this week's baby, lifestyle magazine reported on February 13
"My God
"Selena is crazy about 24-year-old this week and she tells her friends that he's the one," a person familiar with the matter told the magazine She added that singers who "want what they want" have been experiencing craving
"She (dropped) some hints of what she was looking forward to and complained to the people around her that she was too tired to stay outside and felt sick."
"But when she doesn't want to throw up, she has a strange desire. She can't stop eating ice cream! "It's really a bit suspicious."
"It sounds crazy, but friends say that Selena" can't wait to have her own child, "and according to reports, she keeps telling friends" how much she wants to be a mother. "



Number  91
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I love my children the same way any father does."”
“As William told BBC News in 2016, "As far as we're concerned, within our family unit, we are a normal family.”
“So far, they feel they've struck just the right balance.”
“But it's also "vital" for their kids—third, fourth and fifth in line for the British throne, respectively—"to have as much normalcy in their lives as possible."”
“"They feel it's important to make them aware of their backgrounds," a source told Us Weekly.”
“...in 1841 the same outfit his older siblings donned they re keen to give their tiny heirs a life outside the gilded walls of Kensington Palace...”
“While the pair certainly abide by many royal traditions today after all 11 week old Louis was baptized at St James s Palace wearing a replica of the intricate lace and satin dress made for Queen Victoria s eldest daughter...”
“Now the 36-year-old and his wife Kate Middleton, 36, are following in her trailblazing footsteps.”
“And her decisions to let them wear jeans and baseball caps and eat McDonald's hamburgers, while not express defiance of any sort of rule, were certainly not the done thing.”
“After all, a newly crowned Queen Elizabeth II left young kids Prince Charles and Princess Anne in the care of his grandparents and household staff to embark on a six-month tour of the Commonwealth shortly after her coronation.”


"I love my children like any father."
"As William told BBC News in 2016," as far as we are concerned, within our family unit, we are a normal family. "
"So far, they feel they have found the right balance."
"But it's also" crucial "for their children to be the third, fourth and fifth heirs to the British throne -" to make their lives as normal as possible. "
"They feel it's important to let them know their background," a source told us weekly
“…… In 1841, his brothers and sisters wore the same clothes. They longed for their little heirs to live outside the gilded walls of Kensington Palace.... "
"Although they do abide by a lot of Royal traditions today, 11 week old Louis wore a replica of a complex lace and satin dress for Queen Victoria's eldest daughter when he was baptized at St. James's palace..."
"Now Kate Middleton, 36, and his wife Kate Middleton, 36, are following in her pioneering footsteps."
"She decided to let them wear jeans, baseball caps and McDonald's hamburgers. Although she didn't show any contempt for any form of rules, she certainly didn't do it."
After all, the newly crowned Queen Elizabeth II gave her young children, Prince Charles and Princess Anne, to his grandparents and family members, and soon after her coronation began her six-month journey to the Commonwealth



Number  92
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“A representative for Justin Bieber declined to comment on the matter after being approached.”
“Experts say Capuchins also need to be kept in groups, not alone.”
“According to The Sun, the 20-year-old pop star left his American bulldog pup with a dog trainer back in February... and hasn't been back for her since.”
“Speaking to the paper, trainer Trevor Dvernichuk revealed he had been left with the pooch for months.”
“Scroll down for videoIs that good Karma?”
“Justin Bieber is said to have left behind his American bulldog puppy Karma with a dog trainer in Canada... and hasn't picked her up since February'This is like taking your kid to school and not picking it back up,' he said.”
“Bieber's father Jeremy had originally asked Dvernichuk, of Ontario, Canada, to look after Karma for a few weeks and get her trained before taking her to America.”
“However, the singer has failed to return to get the dog and is said to have not responded to calls to take her back.”
“He also claimed that the singer has not paid for Karma's upkeep.”
“Adorable: Karma the puppy - who was named by one of his fans - came into Bieber's life last ChristmasIn September, the dog trainer took to his Facebook page, writing: 'Karma is gonna bite you in your ass biebers.'”


"A representative of Justin Bieber declined to comment on the matter after being approached."
"Experts say capuchins also need to be raised in groups, not alone."
According to the sun, the 20-year-old pop star gave his American Bulldog to a dog trainer in February... I never came back to her
"In a newspaper interview, trainer Trevor dvernichuk revealed that he had been with the dog for months."
"Scroll down to see the video. Is that a good karma?"
"It's said that Justin Bieber left his American Bulldog Dog karma to the Canadian trainer... He said that since February, she has never been picked up, which is like taking the children to school and not coming back
"Bieber's father, Jeremy, initially asked devinichuck, Ontario, Canada, to take care of karma for a few weeks, to train her, and then to take her to the United States."
"However, the singer didn't come back to pick up the dog, and it's said that he didn't respond to the call to take her back."
"He also claimed that the singer did not pay for the maintenance of karma."
"Cute: the little dog Kama - named by one of his fans - came into Bieber's life last Christmas. In September, the dog trainer wrote on his Facebook Page: "Kama will bite your ass, Bieber."



Number  93
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“[email protected]”
“Have a tip we should know?”
“Last September, when she was still at Fox, Kelly––who said she’s friends with Lauer and respects him a lot––defended him after he got criticism in the liberal media for not being tough enough on Donald Trump during that NBC News presidential forum.”
“In Touch has published a number of demonstrably false stories touting a feud between Lauer and Kelly including another cover story from February alleging Lauer was going to be dumped at the Today show in favor of the former Fox News star...”
“From the report The notion that Lauer has been replaced says an extremely well placed NBC News insider is totally false And as for the contention that there will be a joint Putin and Trump interview and that it will be conducted by Kelly our impeccable source calls it laughable...”
“Lauer, Gossip Cop reports, will continue to be the face of Today and a key fixture at NBC News despite the arrival of Kelly, which is currently slated for June.”
“It’s fairly safe to assume Trump will not be joining Putin on a love seat for for a tell-all with Megyn Kelly anytime soon, as much as we would like to will that into existence.”
“What’s more, the tabloid offers up some fairly outrageous evidence to support its story, claiming Kelly showed up Lauer by nabbing a joint interview with President Donald Trump and Russian President Vladimir Putin.”
“Yet the piece “appears to be wholly manufactured by the publication,” according to Mediaite‘s sister site Gossip Cop.”
“In Touch’s latest cover features a headline screaming “Shakeup At The ‘Today Show’: Matt Replaced By Megyn,” along with a dubious story alleging betrayal and backstabbing between the two television heavy-hitters.”


"[email protection]"
"What should we know?"
"Last September, when she was still working on Fox, Kelly - she said she and Raul were friends and respected Raul very much - defended Raul because he was criticized by the free media for not being tough enough with Donald Trump on the NBC News presidential forum."
"In touch has published some obviously false reports advocating the discord between Raul and Kelly, including another cover story in February claiming that Raul will be abandoned on the today show and replaced by the former Fox News Star..."
"It can be seen from the report that Raul was replaced by a very good NBC News insider is totally wrong. As for the statement that there will be a joint interview between Putin and trump and the interview will be conducted by Kelly, our impeccable sources call it ridiculous..."
"Raul, gossip police report, will continue to be the face of today and a key regular show on NBC, despite Kelly's arrival, which is currently scheduled for June."
"It's quite certain that trump won't soon be sitting on the throne of love with Putin and talking to megyn Kelly, just as we hope that all this will come true."
"In addition, the tabloid also provided some rather outrageous evidence to support its report, claiming that Kelly seized the joint interview with President trump and Russian President Putin and appeared in front of Raul."
According to gossip police, mediaite's sister website, "however, this article" appears to have been produced entirely by the publication
In touch's latest front page screams "shaken on today's show: Matt replaced by Megan," along with a suspicious story about betrayal and stabbing between two TV heavyweights



Number  94
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know in the comments section below!”
“HollywoodLifers, what do you think of these juicy details?”
“Here’s all the EXCLUSIVE details!”
“With her reported first child soon arriving, Kylie Jenner, 20, has about a million things to worry about!”
“But few things can compete with what she and Travis Scott, 25, are going to name their alleged baby.”
“However, according to our sources, the Keeping Up with the Kardashians star and her beau are not seeing eye to eye in this department!”
“Could something like this drive them apart?!”
“Head here to take a look back at their relationship in photos!”
““Travis and Kylie have been at war over their baby name,” an insider tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““They both have strong opinions about the name of their baby but Kylie refuses to compromise with Travis at all.”


"Please let us know in the comments section below!"
"Holly bug, what do you think of these interesting details?"
"Here are all the exclusive details!"
"It's reported that 20-year-old Kelly Jenner's first child will be born soon. She has about a million things to worry about!"
"But there's little to compare with what she and 25-year-old Travis Scott are going to name their so-called children."
"However, according to our sources, Kardashian star and her boyfriend don't see eye to eye in this department!"
"Can such things separate them?"
"Come here and see their relationship in the picture!"
"Travis and Kelly have been arguing about the child's name," a person familiar with the matter told reporters Exclusive to Hollywood life
"They all have strong opinions about the names of the children, but Kelly refuses to compromise with Travis."



Number  95
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“See Now: Famous Actors Who Turned Down Iconic Movie Roles...”
“That said, other users defended Gomez, claiming that because she had undergone a kidney transplant months prior, she shouldn't be criticised.”
“Although the lip synching was never confirmed, hundreds of Twitter users shared messages about the issue online and slammed the singer for failing to sing live as other performers had done.”
“In other Selena Gomez news, the 25-year-old singer recently came under fire after she seemingly lip synched her performance at the 2017 American Music Awards.”
““She is falling in love all over again with a new and improved Justin who calls when he says he is going to call, texts when he says he will and is doing everything right.”Did Selena Gomez Lip Sync At The 2017 AMAs?”
“Selena feels secure in their relationship because he is making it easy for her to trust him completely.”“Justin has grown, matured and has really changed a lot in the last few years,” the source added.”
““Since they’ve reunited, Justin now keeps every promise he makes, and is doing everything he says he is going to do.”
““Selena is blown away by Justin’s new integrity,” a source close to the couple told Hollywood Life.”
“Although Gomez and Bieber are trying to stay private, an insider recently said that their romance has come as a pleasant surprise to Gomez.”
“Since then, they have reportedly been doing their best to keep the nature of their relationship to themselves.”


"Now look at the famous actors who refuse idol movie roles..."
"In other words, other users defended Gomez, claiming that she should not be criticized because she received a kidney transplant a few months ago."
"Although the lip synching has never been confirmed, hundreds of Twitter users have shared information about the issue online and attacked the singer for not singing live like other performers."
"In another piece of Selena Gomez's news, the 25-year-old singer was recently attacked because her performance at the 2017 American Music Awards appeared to be lip synching."
"Once again, she fell in love with a new and improved Justin. He said to call when he wanted to make a phone call, to text when he wanted to make a phone call, and everything was done very well." Did Serena Gomez do mouth syncing on AMAS 2017? "
"Selena feels safe in their relationship because he makes it easy for her to trust him completely." "Justin has grown, matured and really changed a lot in the past few years," the source added
"Since their reunion, Justin has kept every promise he made and done everything he said he would do."
"Selena was shocked by Justin's new integrity," a source close to the couple told Hollywood life
"Despite Gomez and Bieber's attempts to keep their privacy, an insider recently said that Gomez was surprised by their relationship."
"It has been reported that since then they have been doing their best to maintain the nature of the relationship."



Number  96
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Ever since Paris, I just go through this worst case scenario mode in my head,” she explained.”
“The suspect entered through the front gate at the end of the long driveway.”
“The suspect did not enter their home.”
““A witness observed a suspect enter and exit the victim’s vehicle and then flee the location,” an LAPD PIO tells Us.”
““A second suspect who was hiding in some bushes also fled the location.”
“Suspect No.”
“1 took personal items from the victim’s vehicle.”The cars did not belong to Kardashian or West.”
“However, some of their staff’s vehicles were on the property at the time.”
“A source tells Us, “The second their private armed security guards noticed the intruder, they came out with guns drawn and flash lights out.”
“Kardashian opened up about the harrowing experience in an episode of Keeping Up With the Kardashians earlier this month.”


"I've had the worst of it in my mind since Paris," she explains
"The suspect came in through the front door at the end of the long driveway."
"The suspect did not enter their home."
"A witness saw a suspect enter and exit the victim's vehicle and then flee the scene," a LAPD officer told us
"The second suspect, who was hiding in the Bush, also fled the site."
"No suspects."
"I took personal belongings from the victim's car." These cars don't belong to Kardashian or west
"However, the vehicles of some of their staff were on the property at that time."
"A source told us," when their private armed security guards noticed the intruder, they pulled out their guns and put out the flashing lights
"Kardashian revealed that painful experience in an episode earlier this month," follow Kardashian. "



Number  97
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For more on the couple’s decision to put their baby plans on hold, pick up the new issue of Us Weekly, on stands now.”
““Not because of a change in her love for Blake,” explains the source, “but because she feels as if it might not be meant to be.” The country star is on board with her thoughts.”
““Gwen sat in the stands and was grooving along,” a concert-goer says in the new issue of Us Weekly.”
““Blake sang a lot in her direction.” At one point, he even shared a sweet detail of their home life, says the witness: “Their dog was having puppies and they couldn’t wait to get home!”For now, those furry family members are serving as surrogates of sorts.”
““Blake and Gwen have decided to put plans to have a baby on hold,” an insider shares in the new issue.”
““Their feeling is if it happens naturally, great.”
“But they’ve decided to not focus on it for the time being.”Stefani, 48, and Shelton, 41, have been trying to conceive for over a year, the source reveals.”
“But the one blessing of their struggle is that it’s made them stronger than ever.”
“The source says Shelton is “absolutely devoted” to Gwen’s sons, Kingston, 11, Zuma, 9, and Apollo, 4: “Blake is extremely attentive, loving and doting towards Gwen and the boys.”Shelton’s devotion is part of what made the couple try for a child together.”
““Blake has always wanted children,” explains a friend.”


"For more information about the couple's decision to suspend their family planning, please read the new issue of American weekly and start now."
"It's not because her love for black has changed," the source explained, "but because she feels it may not be predestined." The country star was on the boat with her ideas
"Gwen is sitting in the stands and walking," one concert goer said in the new issue of American weekly
"Black sang a lot to her." On one occasion, he even shared the sweet details of their family life. The witness said: "their dog gave birth to a puppy, and they can't wait to go home! "At the moment, those furry family members are acting as surrogate mothers of all kinds."
"Black and Gwen decided to postpone their plans to have children," an insider said in the IPO
"Their feeling is that if it happens naturally, that's great."
Stefani, 48, and Sheldon, 41, have been trying to conceive for more than a year, sources said
"But one of the benefits of their struggle is that it makes them stronger than ever before."
The source said Sheldon was "absolutely loyal" to Gwen's sons Kingston (11), Zuma (9) and Apollo (4), "black was very concerned, loving and doting on Gwen and the children." Sheldon's loyalty is one of the reasons why the couple want to have children together
"Black always wanted to have children," a friend explained



Number  98
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Belafonte’s lawyers dismissed the claim, arguing that the videos were “consensual.””
“(PEOPLE confirmed in July Brown was ordered to pay Belafonte $40,000 per month in temporary spousal support and pay for $140,000 in attorney fees and forensic fees on Belafonte’s behalf.)”
“The couple, who are ending their marriage after 10 years wed, reached an agreement in the domestic violence portion of their divorce, TMZ reports — with the former Spice Girl agreeing to drop the temporary restraining order she filed in April against Belafonte.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Brown, 42, had accused her ex of physically and emotionally abusing her, alleging in her TRO filing that she was “in fear” for her life and that Belafonte’s alleged abuse ramped up when her career was on an upswing.”
“Belafonte, 42, and Brown — who wed in Las Vegas in June 2007 — also settled a portion of their property division, TMZ reports.”
“A rep for Brown did not immediately return PEOPLE’s request for comment.”
“Image zoom Melanie “Mel B” Brown and Stephen Belafonte | Credit: Phillip Faraone/GettyThe former couple’s divorce has been a nasty battle since Brown filed in March and asked for joint legal and physical custody of their 6-year-old daughter, Madison.”
“Brown also requested to terminate the court’s ability to award spousal support in her filing.”
“Amid her restraining order filings in April, Brown claimed that Belafonte hired a German exchange student, Lorraine Gilles, to be their nanny and pitted the two women against each other.”


Bellafonte's lawyer dismissed the claim, saying the videos were "consensual"
"(it was confirmed in July that Brown was ordered to pay $40000 a month in temporary spousal support to Belafonte and $140000 in attorney and forensic fees on behalf of Belafonte.)
According to TMZ, the couple, who are about to end their marriage after 10 years of marriage, have reached an agreement on the domestic violence part of the divorce, and the former Spice Girl has agreed to lift the temporary restraining order she imposed on Belafonte in April
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Brown, 42, accused her ex girlfriend of physical and emotional abuse. In her tro file, she said she was" afraid "of her own life, while Belafonte's alleged abuse intensified as her career rose."
Belafonte, 42, and brown, who married in Las Vegas in June 2007, also resolved part of the property split, TMZ reported
"A representative of Brown didn't immediately respond to requests for comment."
Photo zooming Melanie melbrown and Stephen Belafonte | source: Philip Faraoni / Getty the divorce of the former couple has been a fierce battle since Brown filed for divorce in March and asked for joint legal and physical custody of their 6-year-old daughter Madison
"Brown also asked for the termination of the court's right to provide for her spouse in her application."
In a restraining order filed in April, brown claimed that Belafonte had hired a German exchange student, Lorraine Gilles, as their nanny and had the two women compete with each other



Number  99
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This could be explained by Demi using a push-up bra or padded bra to accentuate her cleavage.”
“In some photos, you can see evidence of a Demi Lovato breast enlargement taking place.”
“Demi really doesn’t care and denies having cosmetic surgery, although her before and after pics suggest otherwise!”
“Demi Lovato Face 2008Demi Lovato Face 2016Demi Lovato, the Heart Attack singer, has been rumored to have had several plastic surgery procedures to alter her appearance to go alongside her natural body changes.”
“See if you can see any unusual facial feature changes that can’t be attributed to the aging process.”
“Demi Lovato Face TransformationAs a quick heads up, let’s dive right on in and check out Demi Lovato’s face.”
“No doubt this drinking played into her new body shape.”
“In her 2018 song, Sober, Demi confesses that she relapsed after six years of staying off alcohol.”
“She’s almost looking like a new person, but there is no plastic surgery here.”
“In the after photo, we can see that Demi has gained a lot of weight.”


"This can be explained by Demi using push ups or padded bras to protrude the cleavage."
"In some photos, you can see the signs of Demi Lovato's breast enlargement."
"Demi really doesn't care and denies having had plastic surgery, even though her previous and subsequent photos show that it's not like that!"
"2008 Demi Lovato face 2016 Demi Lovato, a heart singer, is said to have undergone several plastic surgeries to change her appearance to cope with the natural changes in her body."
"See if you can see any unusual changes in facial features that cannot be attributed to the aging process."
"Demi Lovato's face. As a person who looks up quickly, let's go straight in and have a look at Demi Lovato's face."
"There is no doubt that the wine has given her a new shape."
"In the 2018 song sober, Demi admitted that she relapsed after six years of abstinence."
"She looks like a newcomer, but there's no plastic surgery here."
"In the later photos, we can see that Demi gained a lot of weight."



Number  100
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“—Reporting by Sharareh Drury...”
“"They're young and in love, so you never know."”
“"Of course, no one knows," the source said.”
“And the big question remains: will J.B. and Gomez get back together?”
“Bieber is also continuing his world tour that is already booked through next April.”
“News that "he was having a good time with his friends, they were enjoying the food, and left after the [Jets] game was over."”
“A source at the restaurant tells E!”
“Meanwhile, Bieber was spotted having a fun night with friends in NYC on Sunday, dining with a large group at the Upper East Side's Philippe.”
“Her next movie, the very risqué Spring Breakers with James Franco, Vanessa Hudgens and Ashley Benson, is set to be released sometime in the spring while Getaway with Ethan Hawke will hit theaters in August.”


"- sharareh Drury reports..."
"They're young and in love, so you never know."
"Of course, no one knows," the source said
"The big question remains: will J.B. and Gomez get back together?"
"Bieber will continue his world tour, which is scheduled for April next year."
It was said that "he had a good time with his friends, they were enjoying the delicious food and left after the [jet] race."
"A source in the restaurant told e!"
Meanwhile, it was found that Bieber had a good evening with his friends in New York on Sunday, dining with a large group of people at Philip's restaurant on the upper east side
"Her next film, spring break with James Franco, Vanessa Hudgens and Ashley Benson, will be released in the spring, and run away with Ethan Hawke will be released in August."



Number  101
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She’s on a mission to save lives and make a difference.””
““She’s not sitting at home reading her own press.”
“The person guiding the strategy behind the scenes has been Alan Nierob, a seasoned showbiz publicist and longtime exec at Rogers & Cowan.”
“Last fall Jenner hired Nierob, who has handled crisis PR for some of Hollywood’s biggest names including Robert Downey Jr. and Mel Gibson, for help in guiding her through a storm of media attention as she came out as transgender.”
“Nierob declined to comment on this story.”
“Sources close to the situation said Jenner turned to Nierob for a very specific reason — one that is poignant in light of the turns in Jenner’s life today.”
“In the mid-1980s, Nierob helped Jenner at a moment of crisis when a reporter for the New York Times was pursuing a story about Jenner being a cross-dresser.”
“At the time, Jenner was on the rebound from a career downturn and was enjoying a new round of endorsement deals and media gigs.”
“In the mid-1980s, a story about the Olympic decathlon star dressing in women’s clothing would have severely damaged, if not destroyed, Jenner’s public image.”
“Jenner had previously been repped by Rogers & Cowan around the time of his 1976 Olympic triumph but never by Nierob.”


"She has a mission to save lives and change the world."
"She's not sitting at home reading her own newspaper."
"Behind the scenes is Alan nierob, an experienced public relations performer and a long-term executive at Rogers & Cowan."
"Last fall, Jenner hired nerobu, who handled crisis public relations for some Hollywood celebrities, including Robert Downey Jr. and Mel Gibson, and helped her through the storm of media attention when she appeared as a transgender."
"Nirob declined to comment on the matter."
"People familiar with the matter say there is a very specific reason for Jenna's turning to nirobo - it's a poignant turning point in Jenna's life today."
"In the mid-1980s, when a reporter from the New York Times was covering the story of Jenner's cross dressing, nerobu helped Jenner in a time of crisis."
"At that time, Jenner was recovering from a career downturn, enjoying a new round of endorsement deals and media performances."
"In the mid-1980s, a story about Olympic decathlon stars in women's clothes would seriously damage Jenner's image if it didn't damage her public image."
"Jenna was replaced by Rogers and Cowen when he won the Olympic championship in 1976, but never by nileb."



Number  102
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“5 perfume ad.””
“Unless that means I can be an actor for a day and get paid $7 million to star in a Chanel No.”
““I’m not convinced after seeing three table designs (and a bathtub that reminds me of an ashtray) that Brad Pitt should quit his day job to be in the furniture or product design game.”
““[A piece I would want in my home is] possibly the oval table — in the guest room of a second home, if I owned a second home.”5.”
“These first pieces are audition monologues; you already have the part.”4.”
“Stay that person, with all of his confidence and drive and risk-taking, when designing.”
“Pitt, you are a great actor.”
““Mr.”
““These pieces are too nice; I do not hear Mr. Pitt’s voice unleashed with full authority.”3.”
““The shiny metal surprised me specifically; the mod Trumpian swankiness, in general.”2.”


"5 perfume advertising"
"Unless it means I can be an actor for a day and play Chanel one for seven million dollars."
"After looking at the design of three tables (and a bathtub that reminds me of an ashtray), I don't believe Brad Pitt should quit his day job to design furniture or products."
"(one thing I want to get at home) it could be an oval table - in the guest room of the second house if I have a second house."
"The first part of these is the audition monologue, you already have a role." four
"When designing, keep that person with all his confidence, drive and adventure."
"Pete, you're a great actor."
"Sir."
"These songs are so beautiful that I can't hear Mr. Pitt's voice is completely authoritative."
"I'm particularly surprised by the glittering metal; on the whole, it's Department of defense trump chic."



Number  103
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The previous record holder was Psy’s “Gentleman” with 36 million views in the first 24 hours.”
“...highly publicized falling out with rapper Kanye West and his wife Kim Kardashian...”
“Swift shot back at the time that no where did the video show her approving being called a “b***h.”Shading an old frenemy?”
“Said “receipts”– an internet catchphrase used to call for proof or evidence – was a video of a phone conversation between the rapper and Swift, which Kardashian said proved the singer knew about the song lyric she later complained about.”
“...her husband s spat with the pop star...”
“The moment at the end of the video when Swift said Getting receipts gonna edit this later as she pointed her camera phone and mimicked the act of recording a video was interpreted by some fans as a swipe at Kim Kardashian who was said to have brought receipts to...”
“...tilted stage...”
“Some fans think Swift took a shot at West with the lyrics I don t like your little games don t like your tilted stage The role you made me play of the fool no I don t like you The rapper s last concert tour featured a floating and...”
“Swift and the couple have had competing narratives as to whether Swift signed off on West calling her a “b***h” in a song lyric.”
“The viewers don t get a cause of death so one is left to assume Swift is making a statement about all the bad press she s gotten in the last year or so with everything from her break up and spat with producer and DJ Calvin Harris to her...”


"The previous record holder was psy's gentleman, with 36 million views in the first 24 hours."
“… Falling out with rapper Kanye West and his wife Kim Kardashian... "
Swift hit back at the time, saying that there was no video showing her as "B * * H" shadow an old friend? "
Kardashian said the receipt was a video of the rapper talking to swift on the phone, which proved that the singer knew the lyrics of the song she later complained about
“… Her husband had a fight with a pop star... "
"At the end of the video, swift pointed to his camera phone and imitated the action of recording the video, saying that he would take the receipt and edit the video later. At that moment, some fans interpreted it as a thump on Kim Kardashian. It is said that he brought the receipt to..."
“… Tilt the stage... "
"Some fans think swift shot West with the lyrics. I don't like your little game. I don't like your slanted stage. You let me play the role of a fool. No, I don't like that there was a floating and
"Swift and the couple had different opinions about whether swift signed a lyric song and West called her" B * * h. "
"Audiences don't know the cause of death, so they can only assume that Swift is making a statement about all the bad news she has received in the past year or so, from her breakup and quarrel with producer and DJ Calvin Harris to her..."



Number  104
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s called ‘journalism, people.”Also backing Maddow was Billy Eichner, who wrote, “Trump won cause while an intelligent woman was trying to tell us about Russian ties u complained about her presentation & here we are again.””
“Maddow Star Trek alum Wil Wheaton said Maddow always gives deep context on her way into a story...”
“He added I think M Night Shyamalan is about to show up Montel Williams quipped In case you were wondering Rachel Maddow is doing the TV equilvalent of a snail race to hold the audience Other celebs stood up for...”
““This feels like a whole lot of hedging,” comedian and actor Kumail Nanjiani tweeted.”
“...let down...”
“While viewers waited and watched with bated breath including a number of celebrities many complained that Maddow took too long to reveal the contents of the tax return and that her inability to produce a smoking gun was ultimately a...”
“MSNBC host Rachel Maddow teased a major revelation about President Trump’s long-sought tax returns Tuesday afternoon, sending Twitter users into a frenzy of speculation an hour before her program hit the air.”


"It's called 'news, people'. Also supporting Mado was Billy Eisner, who wrote: "trump won the cause, while a smart woman tried to tell us about Russia's relations, and you complained about her speech & here we are again."
"McDonnell's Star Trek alumnus will Wheaton said that McDonnell always gave her a deep background in the way of story..."
"He added, I think m night Shyamalan is coming, and Montel Williams joked, in case you suspect that Rachel Maddow is doing a snail race TV show to attract the support of other celebrities..."
"It feels like a big hedge," comedian and actress Kumar nanjani said on her microblog
“… Put it down... "
"When the audience, including some celebrities, held their breath and watched, many people complained that it took too long for Mado to publish the contents of her tax return, and that she couldn't take out a smoking gun. In the end, it was a..."
"On Tuesday afternoon, MSNBC host Rachel Maddow ridiculed a major disclosure of President Trump's long sought tax return, and Twitter users were in a frenzy of speculation an hour before her show was aired."



Number  105
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But a source is calling reports that drinking or flirting had anything to do with the couple's split "fiction."”
“Following the announcement, rumors started flying about Channing and Jenna and what caused them to split up.”
“After eight years of marriage, the duo, who share a 4-year-old daughter named Everly, announced their separation in a joint statement to fans on social media Monday.”
“"Channing and Jenna released an honest and loving statement which is the only truth."”
“News in a statement.”
“"The media is fabricating stories and none of these accusations are remotely true," a rep for Channing tells E!”
“Channing Tatum and Jenna Dewan are addressing rumors surrounding their separation.”


However, it is reported that drinking or flirting is related to the "fiction" of the couple's breakup
"After the announcement, rumors about Channing and Jenna began to fly all over the place. What caused them to break up?"
"After eight years of marriage, they have a four-year-old daughter named Everly, who announced their separation in a joint statement to fans on social media on Monday."
"Channing and Jenna made a sincere and loving statement, which is the only truth."
"The news in the statement."
A representative of Qian Ning told e
"Channing Tatum and Jenna Dewan are dealing with rumors about their separation."



**Something goes wrong**
“She and Darren are said to have gotten close while filming the upcoming home-invasion horror movie this past summer in Montreal.”
“The couple were spotted walking hand-in-hand with Darren Aronofsky in New York earlier this monthThey were spotted putting on a tactile display while out together in New York City earlier this month.”
“Jennifer Lawrence and Emma Stone are the BFFs of our dreams and their bond seems to be indestructible.”
“So much so, that the two starlets texted every day for a year.”
“Jennifer recently revealed in her interview with Vanity Fair that the two were introduced by Woody Harrelson.”
“'I feel like it was our version of The Notebook': Jennifer Lawrence reveals she texted with Emma Stone every day for a yearThe actor, who co-starred in the Hunger Games series with Jennifer and Zombieland with Emma, thought they would hit it off.”
“He was right and the two began their very close friendship.”
“The Silver Linings Playbook star told the magazine: 'She texted me that she got my number from Woody.'”
“Introductions, please: Woody Harrelson introduced the actresses over text and the rest is history as they are all seen attending the Adele concert together in FebruaryThe duo then proceeded to text every day for a year.”
“'I feel like it was our version of The Notebook - 365 texts,' she continued.”


"It is said that she and Darren were close when they were filming the upcoming domestic violence horror film in Montreal last summer."
"Earlier this month, the couple were photographed walking hand in hand with Darren Aronofsky in New York. Earlier this month, they were photographed showing touch when they were out together in New York
"Jennifer Lawrence and Emma stone are our dream friends, and the bond between them seems unbreakable."
"That's why the two little stars have been texting every day for a year."
"In a recent interview with vanity fair, Jennifer revealed that woody hallerson introduced them."
"I think this is our version of the notebook": Jennifer Lawrence revealed that she has been texting Emma stone every day for a year. The actor co starred in the hunger game series with Jennifer and Emma, and co starred in zombie paradise with Emma. He thinks they will get along. "
"He's right. They started a very close friendship."
"The first-line star told the magazine: 'she texted me that she got my number from woody.'"
Please introduce: Woody Harrison introduced the two actresses by text message, and the rest became history, because we all saw them participate in Adele's concert together in February. They then text every day for a year
"I think this is our version of the notebook - 365 text messages," she continued



Number  107
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Related:Watch Selena Gomez Rap This Drake Track Like a BossAbigail Breslin Has Some Thoughts About Selena Gomez’s Vacation PhotosSelena Gomez Just Cut Her Hair...”
“No more fro-yo past 9pm, guys.”
“This is basically us every single time we have a little too much sugar before bed.”
“At least Sel’s hate of needles and insomnia gets us some hilarious Instagram videos though, right?”
“She might be well on her way to conquering the world, but that doesn’t make her immune to irrational fears, not being able to fall asleep at night included.”
“The visit was for a routine check-up, and even though she’s a fan of tattoos, this type of needlework is definitely not her favorite.”
“Like, she really wasn’t having it.”
“Over the weekend, she shared an Instagram video of her trip to the doctor’s office, and she was straight-up terrified of getting poked with a needle.”
“Selena Gomez has taken over Hollywood with music, TV shows, and movies, but don’t be fooled—she’s still just like us.”


"Related reports: watching Selena Gomez rap the Drake track like a bosabi. Gill Breslin has some ideas about Selena Gomez's holiday. Selena Gomez just cut her hair..."
"There's no time after 9 p.m., guys."
"It's basically that we have a little too much sugar every time we go to bed."
"At least Searle's aversion to needles and insomnia brings us some funny instagram videos, right?"
"She may be on her way to conquer the world, but it doesn't make her immune to irrational fears, including being unable to sleep at night."
"This time I'm here for a routine check-up. Although she likes tattoos, this kind of needlework is definitely not her favorite."
"Like, she really didn't have that."
"Last weekend, she shared a video from the doctor's office on instagram, and she was bluntly afraid of being stabbed by a needle."
"Selena Gomez took over Hollywood with music, TV series and movies, but don't be fooled, she's still like us."



Number  108
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““He needs effective intervention, not more drugs.”And the insider added: “Kim feels he’s a ticking time bomb!””
““[Lexapro] plays havoc with a person’s brain chemistry,” addiction expert Dr. Gregory Smith told The ENQUIRER.”
“Caitlyn Jenner Caught In Hormone Therapy Hell!”
“...a close friend revealed...”
“He knows she s ready to walk said the source and he s doing everything he can to keep her for now Kanye who s rapped about taking Lexapro for anxiety and depression had also been diagnosed with paranoid schizophrenia...”
“Kanye used to make the Fashion Week rounds to promote his clothing line, but Kim had him under house arrest this year!”
“Kris Jenner: Liposuction Panic After Hitting 200 Lbs.!”
“Kardashian insiders revealed the rapper’s self-destructive drug abuse, mood swings and humiliating public breakdown last November forced Kim to finally lay down the law.”
““She’s using this time to send a message to him — ‘Clean up your act, or it’s OVER!’” a source told The National ENQUIRER.”
“Kim Kardashian grounded loony-tunes hubby Kanye West from attending New York Fashion Week as scolding punishment for his gonzo behavior!”


"What he needs is effective intervention, not more drugs." "Kim thinks he's a time bomb," the person familiar with the matter added
Dr Gregory Smith, an addiction expert, told the questioner: "lexapro severely disrupts a person's brain chemistry."
Caitlin Jenner is in the hell of hormone therapy! "
“…… A close friend revealed that... "
"He knew that she was ready to walk," the source said. He was making every effort to keep her. At present, Kanye, who had talked about taking lexaprol because of anxiety and depression, was also diagnosed with paranoid schizophrenia... "
"Kanye used to tour fashion week to sell his collection, but Kim put him under house arrest this year!"
Chris Jenner: after the liposuction panic, hit 200 pounds. "
"Kardashian insiders revealed that the rapper's self destructive drug use, mood swings and humiliating public collapse in November last year forced Kim Jong Il to finally enact the law."
"She used this time to send him a message -" clean up your behavior, or it's over! "A source told the national inquirer."
"Kim Kardashian banned her husband Kanye West from New York Fashion week because he reprimanded and punished his debauchery!"



Number  109
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Please visit the source responsible for the item in question to report any concerns you may have regarding content or accuracy.”
“The news articles, Tweets, and blog posts do not represent IMDb's opinions nor can we guarantee that the reporting therein is completely factual.”
“This content is published for the entertainment of our users only.”
“The actor formed his rock supergroup in 2015 along with Alice Cooper and Joe Perry , but an article in the latest issue of Star says he’s now ready […]IMDb.com, Inc. takes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, Tweets, or blog posts.”
“That’s the claim in one of the new tabloids, but Gossip Cop has learned the truth.”
“Is Johnny Depp really quitting his all-star rock band, Hollywood Vampires ?”


"Please visit the person in charge of the relevant project and report any concerns about content or accuracy."
"News articles, tweets and blog posts don't represent IMDB's opinions, and we can't guarantee that the reports in them are completely true."
"This content is published just to entertain our users."
"The actor formed his rock superstar with Alice Cooper and Joe Perry in 2015, but an article in the latest issue of star magazine says he's ready now [ ] IMDb.com , Inc. assumes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, tweets or blog posts. "
"It's in a new tabloid, but the gossip police already know the truth."
Is Johnny Depp really going to quit his all star rock band Hollywood vampires



Number  110
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Kim has done absolutely nothing wrong.”Photo: AOL”
“A rep for Kardashian tells us, “The patent lawsuit filed by SnapLight has no merit and is just another attempted shakedown.”
“The secret to my selfies http://Lumee.com.” Gossip Cop has reached to SnapLight, LuMee, and Harooni for comment.”
“Like little tiny, tiny light bulbs.”DeGeneres acknowledged, “I saw [Kardashian’s] phone… It makes you look better,” to which Clinton added, “I have been desperately looking for one of those ever since with no luck!” And right after that, Kardashian tweeted, “Selfies about to be LIT!!!”
“I’ve never seen this anywhere else… it has lights all the way around it.”
“In fact, when Clinton was asked in January 2016 on the “Ellen Degeneres Show” about taking a selfie with Kardashian, the Democratic presidential nominee recalled, “She takes out her phone and she presses a button.”
“#PrimeDay #LuMee.”After meeting and taking a selfie with then-presidential candidate Hillary Clinton at a fundraiser, Kardashian used the encounter to later promote LuMee.”
“Best deal ever!”
“LuMee cases are featured today as Amazon’s Prime Deal of the Day.”
“#lumeecollab.”She similarly noted on Twitter in April, while taking a selfie, “White Lumee Duo In Apple stores worldwide #LumeeCollab.” And the Instagram photo above was her promoting an earlier version of LuMee in July 2016, with a link to Amazon and a caption that read, “Hey Guys!”


"Kim Jong Il has done absolutely nothing wrong." Photo: AOL
A representative of Kardashian told us, "snaplight's patent lawsuit has no value, it's just another attempt to finalize it."
"The secret of my selfie http://Lumee.com . "Gossip police have contacted snaplight, lumee and HAROONI for advice."
"It's like a little light bulb." DeGeneres admits, "I saw a cell phone It makes you look better, "Clinton added." since then, I've been desperately looking for a light bulb like this, but I'm not lucky! Just after that, Kardashian tweeted, "selfie's about to light up!"
"I've never seen this anywhere else There are lights all around it. "
"In fact, when Clinton was asked to take a selfie with Kardashian on the Ellen DeGeneres Show in January 2016, the Democratic presidential candidate recalled," she took out her cell phone and pressed a button. "
Kardashian used the meeting to promote Lumi after meeting with then presidential candidate Hillary Clinton at a fund-raising meeting and taking a self portrait
"The best deal ever!"
"The lumee case is today known as Amazon's best deal of the day."
“lumeecollab。” In April, she also mentioned on twitter that the instagram photo on "white lumee duo of Apple stores around the world" was an early version of her promotion of lumee in July 2016, linked to Amazon, with the title "Hey guys!"



Number  111
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Yesterday it was reported that the international pop star was 'on the edge' of going bankrupt before his death and his estate may owe as much as $1billion dollars in unpaid taxes to the IRS.”
“Paris might have much more than relationship woes on her plate soon, as the star may have to shoulder the burden of some of her father's outstanding debts.”
“The 18-year-old was spotted picking up a discrete purchase out in Los Angeles on Wednesday.”
“During the trip, the Rolling Stone cover girl looked casual and worry-free, flaunting her collection of body art in a cropped top that left little to the imagination.”
“The single life: Paris Jackson was spotted in Los Angeles alone on Wednesday after it was reported that the star split from her rocker boyfriend Michael SnoddyTo tie-dye for!”
“The funky starlet wore a pair of eclectic tie-dye pants while outThe celebrity offspring's platinum locks were pulled back into a practical top knot and kept out of her face with a teal scarf during her errand.”
“She wore funky tie-dye pants and carried a woven backpack adorned with a number of cool key chains while holding a brown paper bag in her hand.”
“Paris didn't mind going braless during the trip, showing off the outline of her new nipple piercings as well as a hint of her belly and pierced navel.”
“Her many tattoos were also on display while a huge peace pendant on her neck and strappy sandals perfected the outfit's retro vibe.”
“Body bling: The second generation star went braless during her outing, showing off her new nipple piercings in the cropped brown teeAccording to Radar Online, Paris recently called things off with her boyfriend of little over a year.”


"It was reported yesterday that the international pop star was on the verge of bankruptcy, and his legacy may owe as much as $1 billion in unpaid taxes to the IRS."
"Paris may soon face more than emotional troubles, because the star may have to bear some of his father's outstanding debts."
"The 18-year-old was found in Los Angeles on Wednesday to have bought a separate item."
"During the journey, the rolling stone cover girl looked casual and carefree. She wore an irregular cut coat to show off her collection of body art, leaving little room for imagination."
"Single life: Paris Jackson" was filmed in Los Angeles on Wednesday after it was reported that the singer broke up with rock boyfriend Michael snowdito for a year
"The trendy actress wore an eclectic tie dyed pair of trousers, while the platinum hair of the celebrity descendant was pulled back to a practical top knot and covered her face with a turquoise scarf on business trips."
"She's wearing trendy tie dyed pants with a brown paper bag in her hand and a woven backpack decorated with some cool key chains."
"Paris doesn't mind doing nothing on the road, showing the outline of her new nipple perforation and hints of abdominal and navel perforation."
"Many of her tattoos are also on display, and a huge peace pendant and lace up sandals around her neck perfectly reflect the retro flavor of the dress."
"Sensual flash: the second generation star has little guts on the road, wearing an irregular Brown T-shirt to show off his new perforated nipples." Paris recently canceled her date with her boyfriend who has been dating for more than a year, according to radar online



Number  112
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Tell us below!”
“HollywoodLifers, how do YOU feel about Liam Hemsworth letting Miley have the spotlight?”
“Liam Hemsworth visited Miley Cyrus on the set of ‘The Voice’ last week, but he stayed hidden in the shadows so she could have the spotlight.”
“Isn’t that so adorable?!”
“Miley Cyrus may have an amazing team on The Voice this season — Brooke Simpson and Ashland Craft both praised her during an EXCLUSIVE interview with HollywoodLife.com — but she also has an amazing boyfriend.”
“When we asked the girls if their coach, Miley, ever brought Liam Hemsworth to set with her, Brooke admitted, “He was on set last week!” But Ashland added that they “didn’t talk to him” because “he was trying to hide from people.”
“It was during the show.”
“He was trying to make sure no one saw him.” So basically, he was trying to make sure he didn’t steal Miley’s thunder.”
““It was so cute!”
“They’re so real!” Ashland gushed.”


"Tell us next!"
"Hollywood stars, what do you think Liam Hemsworth made Miley the focus?"
"Liam Hemsworth visited Millie Cyrus on the sound set last week, but he stayed in the shadows so she could be in the spotlight."
"Isn't that cute?"
"Miley Cyrus may have an amazing dubbing team this season - Brooke Simpson and Ashland Kraft praised her in an exclusive interview with the media - but she also has a great boyfriend."
"When we asked the girls if their coach, Miley, had ever taken Liam Hemsworth to shoot with her, Brooke admitted," he was on the set last week! But Ashland added that they "did not speak to him" because "he tried to avoid others."
"It was during the show."
"He wanted to make sure no one saw him." So basically, he wanted to make sure he didn't steal Miley's thunder
"How lovely
"They are so real! "Ashland talks."



Number  113
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We’d be here for it.”
“Don’t be surprised if they reunite in the near future!”
“Ladies, it’s time to take notes!”
“The best way to get back at an ex-boyfriend is to look amazing.”
“FKA Twigs, 30, latest Apple commercial (promoting the HomePod) has her ex-lover Robert Pattison, 31, reminiscing about the good old days.”
““He loves her very much still and seeing this commercial reminds him of how amazing she is.”
“He sees her talent, he sees her smile, and watching it makes him happy since it such a time warp for him.”
“It takes him back to when they were in a better place.”
“It shows the best of everything about her.”
“Now, will that lead him back to her?”


"We will come."
"Don't be surprised if they get together in the near future!"
"Ladies, it's time to take notes!"
"The best way to get back at your ex is to look great."
"30-year-old FKA twigs, the latest Apple ad (promoting homepod), reminds 31 year old ex lover Robert Pattison of the good old days."
"He still loves her very much and seeing this ad reminds him of how amazing she is."
"He saw her talent, he saw her smile, it made him happy to see her smile, because it was a distortion of time for him."
"It brought him back to when they were in a better place."
"It shows her the best."
"Now, will that bring him back to her?"



Number  114
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Although they are said to be uncertain about the future, Khloe has been attending all of Tristan’s home games.”
“Thompson are trying to work through their relationship issues after the NBA star was busted cheating on the Keeping Up with the Kardashians star last month just days before she gave birth to their first child daughter True...”
“Now, rumors are circulating that Khloe has been banned from attending Cleveland Cavaliers games.”
“According to a May 23 report by Gossip Cop, Khloe Kardashian has not been forbidden from attending Tristan Thompson’s basketball games at home in Cleveland.”
“The rumor originated from a report by Media Take Out.”
“The site claimed that LeBron James specifically asked Tristan to keep Khloe away from Quicken Loans Arena on game days.”
““‘Lebron James asked Tristan to ban the Kardashian from all remaining playoff games,’ insisted the website.”
“The outlet maintained the prohibition applied to the NBA finals as well.”
“The online publication cited unspecified “reports” as the basis for its contentions, but a Google search indicated the claims originated with MTO.”
“In fact, when lemmings like HollywoodLife also spread these allegations, they credited MediaTakeOut as the source.”


"Although they are said to be uncertain about their future, Chloe has played in all of Tristan's home games
"Thompson is trying to solve the problem of their relationship, because last month, the NBA star was caught for secretly photographing Kardashian a few days before Kardashian was born. She gave birth to their first daughter. Really..."
"Now, it's rumored that Chloe is banned from the Cleveland Cavaliers."
"According to gossip police on May 23, Kardashian has not been banned from playing Tristan Thompson's home basketball game in Cleveland."
"The rumor originated from a report in the media."
"The website claims that LeBron James specifically asked Tristan to keep Chloe away from the quick loans arena on race day."
"LeBron James asked Tristan to ban Kardashian from all remaining playoffs," the website insisted
"The media maintained the ban applicable to the NBA finals."
The online publication cited unspecified "reports" as the basis for its arguments, but Google search showed that the claims originated from MTO
"In fact, when lemmings like Hollywood life spread the charges, they thought mediatakeout was the source."



Number  115
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Thanks for signing up to the Independent Culture newsletter verifyErrors message verifyErrors verifyErrors message verifyErrors The Independent would like to keep you informed about offers events and updates by email please tick the box if you would like to be contacted Read our full mailing list consent terms here...”
“The Independent would like to keep you informed about offers events and updates by email please tick the box if you would like to be contacted Read our full mailing list consent terms here Independent Culture Newsletter The best in film music TV radio straight to your inbox every week...”
“Independent Culture Newsletter The best in film music TV radio straight to your inbox every week Please enter your email address Please enter a valid email address Please enter a valid email address SIGN UP Thanks for signing up to the Independent Culture newsletter verifyErrors message verifyErrors verifyErrors message verifyErrors...”
“She recently released the video for her new single "Delicate", which imagined the musician gaining the power of invisibility, allowing her a brief sojourn away from her much-tormenting "reputation".”
“Swift’s 50-plus-stop stadium tour will commence on 8 May.”
“Even 2008's Fearless took only seven weeks to pass 2 million sales.”
“2014's 1989 hit 2 million during its third week of release, 2012's Red during its fifth week of release, and 2010's Speak Now during its sixth week.”
“In fact, longer than Swift's past three albums combined.”
“However, Forbes pointed out that, interestingly, it took significantly longer for Reputation to hit that phenomenal milestone.”
“All of Swift's six previous studio albums - 1989, Red, Speak Now, Fearless, and Taylor Swift - sold more than two million copies.”


"Thank you for registering for the independent cultural communication verifyerrors message verifyerrors message verifyerrors the independent would like to inform you of the offer and update information by e-mail. Please check the box. If you wish to contact, please read our complete mailing list and agree terms here..."
"The independent would like to inform you of the offer and updates by email. Please check the box. If you would like to contact, please read our complete mailing list. Agree terms here independent culture newsletters best movie music TV broadcast will be sent directly to your in box every week..."
"The best movie music TV broadcast of independent cultural communication is sent directly to your mailbox every week. Please enter your email address. Please enter a valid email address. Please enter a valid email address to register. Thank you for registering with verifyerrors message verifyerrors message verifyerrors message verifyerrors..."
She recently released a video of her new single delicate, imagining that the musician has gained the power of invisibility, leaving her tormented reputation for a short time
"Swift's 50 plus stop tour of the stadium will start on May 8."
"Even 2008's intrepid took only seven weeks to sell 2 million copies."
"In 1989 of 2014, it reached 2 million in the third week of release, red of 2012 in the fifth week of release, and speak now of 2010 in the sixth week of release."
"In fact, it's longer than Swift's last three albums combined."
"Interestingly, however, Forbes points out that reputation takes a lot longer to reach this amazing milestone."
"Swift's six previous albums - 1989's" red, "" speak now, "" fearless, "and" Taylor Swift "- sold more than two million copies."



Number  116
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Read original story ‘Genius: Aretha’ Trailer: Watch Cynthia Erivo Fight to Keep Her ‘Queen of Soul’ Crown (Video) At TheWrap...”
“She begins a successful career at Arista, with the help of Clive Davis, and in an unforgettable GRAMMY performance in 1998, she solidifies her eternal reign as the Queen of Soul.”
“Franklin and meets her idol, Clara Ward.”
“Meanwhile, Little Re has her first touring experience on the Gospel Circuit in 1954 with C.L.”
“UNTIL THE REAL THING COMES ALONG Sunday, March 21 at 10/9c Struggling to find her sound, Aretha catches the attention of Jerry Wexler at Atlantic Records in 1966.”
“Franklin, church.”
“After suffering the loss of her surrogate mother, Little Re braves her first solo in 1953, in her father’s, C.L.”
“Also Read: Here Are the Premiere Dates for Broadcast TV's New and Returning Midseason Shows (Updating) RESPECT Sunday, March 21 at 9/8c Desperate for a hit, Aretha travels to Muscle Shoals in 1967 to record her first album with Atlantic Records.”
“See below for the list of “Genius: Aretha” episode descriptions and air dates.”
““Genius: Aretha” hails from 20th Television and Imagine Entertainment, in partnership with Warner Music Entertainment.”


"Read the original story 'genius: Aretha' Trailer: watch Cynthia erivo fight to keep her 'soul Queen' crown (video) in the packaging..."
"With the help of Clive Davis, she started a successful career in Arista and consolidated her eternal dominance as Queen of the soul in an unforgettable performance at Grammy in 1998."
"Franklin met her idol Clara ward."
At the same time, young re had his first tour experience with C.L. on the gospel tour in 1954
"It wasn't until March 21 (Sunday) at 10 / 9 degrees Celsius that the real sound appeared, and Aretha caught the attention of Atlantic record company Jerry Wexler in 1966."
"Franklin, church."
After losing her surrogate mother, in 1953, the little girl was in her father's C.L
"Also read: Here's the premiere date of radio and TV's new and returning mid season show (update). Respecting Sunday, March 21, 9 / 8 degrees Celsius, desperate hit, Aretha went to muscle bank in 1967 to record her first album with Atlantic Records."
The following is the plot description and broadcast date of "Genius: Aretha"
"Genius: Aretha" is from TV 20, working with Warner Music Entertainment company



Number  117
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"And hopefully we’ll start a family in the near future."”
“The two hit it off during two back-to-back dates in London before the royal convinced Markle, who lived and worked in Toronto, to come with him on a trip to Botswana several weeks later.”
““(It) was sort of confirmation to me that all the stars were aligned,” Harry said in a BBC interview sitting next to Markle, who held his hand in both of hers throughout the entire conversation.”
““Everything was just perfect.”
“It was this beautiful woman just sort of literally tripped and fell into my life.”Markle said Harry proposed during a “cozy” night in at his Kensington Palace apartment, where the two were roasting a chicken.”
““A standard typical night for us,” Harry added.”
““It was just an amazing surprise.”
“It was so sweet and natural and very romantic.”
“He got on one knee,” said Markle, who immediately accepted.”
““As a matter of fact, I could barely let you finish proposing.”


"I hope we can get married in the near future."
"Two people hit it off in two consecutive dates in London. After a few weeks, the royal family persuaded Markel and Markel to travel to Botswana with his life and work."
"It's a confirmation to me that all the stars are the same," Harry said in a BBC interview, sitting next to Marcel, who held his hand throughout the conversation
"Everything is perfect."
"It was this beautiful woman who somehow tripped and fell into my life." Mark said Harry spent a "comfortable" night in his apartment at Kensington Palace, where they roasted a chicken and proposed to me
"It's a typical night for us," Harry added
"It's just a surprise."
"Too sweet, too natural, too romantic."
"He landed on one knee," Mark said, accepting immediately
"In fact, I can hardly get you to complete the proposal."



Number  118
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at 800-344-9598 any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“We pay for juicy info!”
“Weigh in with your thoughts in the comments below.”
“Caitlyn Jenner Looks Exactly Like Jessica Lange“Cait is pitching the idea to networks and is happy to sink her own money into this because she’s so determined to make it a hit.”Would you watch Caitlyn’s talk show?”
“Still, “Cait’s convinced this is going to be more successful than both Kris and Khloe’s shows, and is even toying with the idea of calling it Cocktails with Caitlyn,” a throwback to Kardashian’s program, Kocktails with Khloe.”
“...wife Kris and stepdaughter Khloe both failed in their efforts...”
“She thinks this is a great way to give people who haven t been heard a platform to tell their story while getting back in favor with the LGBTQ community at the same time Jenner 68 is brave to attempt a chat fest especially since the former Olympian s ex...”
““Cait has been plotting her next move for some time now, and she’s completely set on landing a show of her own,” an insider revealed.”
“Caitlyn Jenner Plans To Launch Her Own Talk Show After Ex's Chat Fest Flop ‘She’s so determined to make it a hit.’RadarOnline.com can exclusively reveal Caitlyn Jenner is making plans to launch her own talk show!”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call 800-344-9598 at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"We pay for interesting information!"
"Add your thoughts to the comments below."
"Caitlin Jen as like as two peas Jessica Lange," Caitlin is promoting the idea to Internet company. She is willing to put her money into it, because she is determined to make this idea popular. "Will you watch Caitlin's talk show?"
"Nevertheless," Kate is convinced that it will be more successful than Chris and Chloe's show, even playing with the idea of "cocktail with Caitlin." it's a copy of Kardashian's show "cocktail with Chloe."
“… His wife Chris and stepdaughter Chloe failed in their efforts. "
"She thinks it's a good way for those who haven't heard of it to have a platform to tell their stories, and get the favor of LGBTQ community again. At the same time, Jenna 68 bravely tried a chat event, especially since the former Olympic athlete..."
"Katie has been planning her next move for a while and she's ready to land on her show," a person familiar with the matter said
Caitlyn Jenner plans to launch her own talk show "she's determined to make it a hit" after her ex girlfriend failed to chat RadarOnline.com The website can exclusively reveal that Caitlin Jenner is planning to launch her own talk show! "



Number  119
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““However, at times it has also been a huge challenge, even for me who has support at home that most mothers do not.”For more updates on the Royal family, pick up the latest issue of Life & Style, on newsstands now!”
““Personally, becoming a mother has been such a rewarding and wonderful experience,” she said at the time, according to the Huffington Post.”
“Kate opened up about her own struggles with adjusting to motherhood back in March during a speech she gave in order to raise awareness of mental health issues in mothers.”
“And even though the couple can afford nannies to help care for their children, they “are determined to be hands-on parents” which can be an overwhelming experience.”
“At the moment, George and Charlotte are “are both at ages where they can’t sit still so they run around all over the place,” says a source.”
““He’s quite happy with a boy and a girl.”MORE: See New Photos of Prince George in Honor of His Fourth Birthday!”
“...number says the insider but William is not on the same page...”
“Tension has been simmering for some time says a royal insider and it came to the surface under the pressure of a royal tour Kate has her heart set on having at least one more baby because Coming from a family of three herself she thinks it s the perfect...”
“...a Tear or Two But William did not think her joke was funny and later that day they were spotted having a very tense argument because they disagree on expanding their family...”
“Since her children four year old Prince George and two year old Princess Charlotte are already too old for the toy she reportedly told her hubby We will just have to have more babies Photo Credit Getty Images MORE This New HBO Special on Princess Diana Might Make You Shed...”


"However, sometimes it's a huge challenge, even for me, I get support at home that most mothers don't have." To learn more about the royal family, choose the latest issue of life and fashion from the newsstand now! "
According to the Huffington Post, she said at the time: "being a mother is a very rewarding and wonderful experience for me personally."
"Kate made public her own difficulties in adapting to motherhood in a speech in March aimed at raising mothers' awareness of mental health problems."
"Although the couple had enough nannies to help take care of their children, it could be an overwhelming experience that they were" determined to be a parent for themselves. "
"At the moment, George and Charlotte" are at an age where they can't sit quietly, so they're running around, "a source said
"He's happy with a boy and a girl." More: look at the new picture of Prince George's fourth birthday
“…… The number says the informant, but William is not on the same page... "
"The tension has been brewing for some time, and a royal insider said that this is due to the pressure of the royal tour. Kate is determined to have at least one more child because she comes from a family of three, and she thinks it is perfect..."
“…… One or two tears, but William didn't think her joke was funny. Later that day, they were found to have a very tense quarrel because they didn't agree to expand their family... "
"As her children, four-year-old Prince George and two-year-old Princess Charlotte, are too old to play with the toy, she told her husband that we only need to have a few more children. This new feature about Princess Diana from the U.S. home theater may surprise you... "



Number  120
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“MORE : Kim Kardashian ‘jewellery heist mastermind sends star apology letter’ after gunpoint robberyMORE : Kim Kardashian, Jenny McCarthy and Mark Hamill lead tributes to Playboy founder Hugh Hefner...”
“Meet conclusion.”
“Kim Kardashian is excited for her younger sister Khloe’s baby news after it was revealed that the star is expecting her first child with boyfriend Tristan Thompson.”
“Khloe, who tried to have a baby with ex-husband Lamar Odom during their doomed marriage, is finally going to start the family of her dreams and Kim is there to support her.”
“‘Kim loves Tristan, so she is super supportive,’ a source told Us Weekly.”
“‘She couldn’t be more happy for the family.’Kim, 36, and her husband Kanye West are expecting their third baby via a surrogate, but the reality star is excited to watch the how family grow.”
“AdvertisementAdvertisement‘Kim can’t wait to be an aunt again.”
“She knows most of her sisters want big families and that is exactly what seems to be happening.”
“She loves witnessing the family blossom,’ she said.”
“Kanye West and Kim Kardashian West (Picture: GC Images)Kim confirmed her baby news after posting on Twitter a clip for the upcoming 14th season of Keeping Up With The Kardashians.”


"More: after Kim Kardashian's armed robbery, 'jewelry robbery mastermind sends star apology letter' more: Kim Kardashian, Jenny McCarthy and Mark Hamill take the lead in paying homage to Playboy founder Hugh Hefner..."
"Come to a conclusion."
"Kim kardashan is excited about sister Chloe's baby news because it's said Chloe will have her first baby with her boyfriend Tristan Thompson."
"Khloe tried to have a child with her ex husband Lamar Odom in her doomed marriage. She is finally going to form her dream family, and Kim is there to support her."
"Kim loves Tristan, so she's very supportive," a source told us weekly
Kim, 36, and her husband Kanye West are having their third child through surrogacy, but the reality TV star is happy to see the family grow up
"Kim can't wait to be another aunt."
"She knows that most of her sisters want a big family, and that's what's happening right now."
"She likes to see the family grow," she said
"Kanye West and Kim Kardashian West (photo source: GC images) confirmed their baby after tweeting clips of the upcoming season 14" keep up to the kardashians. "



Number  121
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know in the comments!”
“Source: BACKGRIDWhat do you think about Jessica being jealous of Mandy?”
“Source: BACKGRID"Jessica's always wanted Hollywood credibility," the insider concluded, "and it hurts her to see that Mandy's got it."”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: BACKGRID"But Jessica's still got the acting itch," the source said, "and she complains about Mandy to anyone who'll listen!"”
“Source: BACKGRID"She gripes that she was never taken seriously as an actress," the insider continued, despite the fact that Jessica's husband, former NFL star Eric Johnson, tries to reassure her by telling her "Mandy's success can't compare to hers."”
“"Now Jessica sees Mandy on billboards all over L.A. and it's like a slap in the face."”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: BACKGRID"Jessica and Mandy came up around the same time and they were always pitted against each other," the source said.”
“The former Dukes of Hazard star is envious of Mandy for being on an award-winning show.”
“Source: BACKGRIDLongtime friends Jessica and Mandy aren't so close anymore, an insider revealed to OK!.”
“Article continues below advertisementWatch the video for all the details!”


"Please let us know in the comments!"
"Source: background what do you think of Jessica's jealousy of Mandy?"
"Source: backgrid," the insider concluded, "Jessica always wanted Hollywood's credibility, and it hurt her to see Mandy get it."
"The article continues in the following advertising source: backgrid," but Jessica still has the itch to perform, "the source said," she complained Mandy gave anyone who would listen. "
"Source: backgrid" she complained that she never took herself seriously as an actor, "insiders continued, despite the fact that Jessica's husband, former NFL star Eric Johnson, tried to comfort her by saying," Mandy's success can't be better than hers. "
"Now Jessica is slapping Mandy on the billboard in Los Angeles."
"The article continues in the following advertising source: backgrid." Jessica and Mandy appear almost at the same time, and they are always opposite to each other, "the source said
"The former Dukes of danger star were envious that Mandy was on an award-winning show."
An insider to OK! Source: BACKGROUND: old friends Jessica and Mandy are not so close anymore
The article continues the following advertisement to watch all the details of the video! "



Number  122
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She also gave out Levin’s phone number, claiming he reported every canceled show following her Trump photo while she and her family received death threats.”
““The whole time I was working there, I didn’t know how Andy Cohen wanted to be me … I didn’t know Andy Cohen was on the red carpet, trying to be funny and asking questions on BravoTV.com,” she said.”
“Cohen responded to a 17-minute long video titled Kathy Griffin: A Hell of a Story in which the comedian claimed he asked her if she wanted to do cocaine before appearances on Watch Happens Live with Andy Cohen.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I am completely stunned by this story.”
“It is 100% false and totally made up,” he tweeted Saturday, the same day the video was posted.”
“Griffin, 56, spoke directly into the camera as she made multiple claims against Cohen.”
““Both times I did the show, right before we went live, Andy Cohen privately asked me in an office if I wanted to do blow,” she alleged.”
““I’ve never had a drink in my life.”
“You guys know I m no prude but I m kind of like a straightedge I thought he was kidding the first time Image zoom Credit Charles Sykes Bravo NBCU Photo Bank Getty The actress continued I was hoping he was kidding the second time I do the show same...”


"She also revealed Levin's phone number, claiming that Levin reported every cancelled performance after her trump photo when she and her family received death threats."
"I didn't know what Andy Cohen wanted to be when I worked there I didn't know Andy Cohen was on the red carpet, trying to be funny and asking questions Bravo network, "she said
"Cohen responded to a 17 minute video entitled" Kathy Griffin: a hellish story "in which the comedian claimed that he asked Andy Cohen if she wanted to take cocaine before appearing live with her."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I was completely shocked by the story."
"It's 100% wrong, completely fabricated," he tweeted on Saturday, the same day the video was released
"Griffin, 56, spoke directly to the camera while filing multiple claims against Cohen."
"On both occasions, before the show started, Andy Cohen asked me in private in his office if I wanted to make blow." She said
"I've never had a drink in my life."
"You know I'm informal, but I'm kind of straight forward. I thought he was joking about the first image zooming credit. Charles Sikes Bravo, nbcu photo bank. Getty, actress, went on, I hope he was joking about the second time I did the same show..."



Number  123
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“AdvertisementChris Martin has not commented on the rumors surrounding Coldplay and his romance with Dakota Johnson.”
“The singer rocked a casual look with a grey sweater and matching beanie while Johnson wore a long white coat and heels.”
“The Coldplay frontman drove Johnson to a local coffee shop in Malibu but made her walk back after she picked up the drinks.”
“Johnson brought along her dog for the outing, which is probably why Martin drove back home by himself.”
“It looked like the Fifty Shades actress wanted to get a quick walk in for her pup after the coffee run.”
“While things look pretty good between Martin and Johnson, not everyone in his circle is happy about their growing romance.”
“Inside sources claim that members of Martin’s band do not like his new girlfriend.”
“With Martin committing so much time to the relationship, the members of Coldplay are starting to find Johnson annoying.”
“Loved-up couple Dakota Johnson and Chris Martin have been spotted ‘holding hands and kissing’ on a veggie brunch date.”
“They looked ‘very cute together’ according to a fellow diner at Heirloom Restaurant in Vancouver.”


"Chris Martin didn't comment on Coldplay or his romantic relationship with Dakota Johnson."
"The singer showed a casual look with a gray sweater and matching little Bini, while Johnson wore a long white coat and high heels."
"The Coldplay leader drove Johnson to a local coffee shop in Malibu, but let her walk back after she got her drink."
Johnson took her dog on an outing, which may be why Martin drove home alone
"It looks like the 50 degree shadow actress wants to walk around for her dog after coffee."
"Although the relationship between Martin and Johnson looks good, not everyone in the circle is happy with their growing relationship."
"Inside sources say Martin's band members don't like his new girlfriend."
"Martin spent so much time in this relationship that members of Coldplay began to find Johnson annoying."
"Dakota Johnson and Chris Martin were photographed kissing hand in hand during a vegetarian brunch date."
"According to a partner at a family heirloom restaurant in Vancouver, they look 'very cute' together."



Number  124
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...to see two women rise together...”
“That would mean that whatever went down did so in those halcyon days of 2001.”
“Two decades.”
“That’s the length of some actors’ entire careers, yet the public was none the wiser.”
“The two actresses deserve some kind of award just for outwardly keeping the peace.”
“Pinkett Smith revealed the news to Extra while promoting her upcoming Facebook Watch talk show, which Union will eventually appear on.”
““I have a really touching episode with Gabrielle Union,” she told Extra.”
““We haven’t really been on the best of terms for 17 years, and we have a reconciliation.”
“They were like, ‘We wanna do a girlfriends show,’ and I was like, ‘Well .”
“.”


“… See two women standing up together... "
"It means that whatever happens, it happened in those quiet days of 2001."
"Twenty years."
"It's the length of some actors' entire careers, but the public is not wise at all."
"The two actresses deserve some kind of reward just because they are outwardly peaceful."
Pinkett Smith revealed the news to extra while promoting her upcoming Facebook watch talk show, which will eventually feature Union
"I had a very touching episode with Gabriel Eugene," she told Teresa.
"We haven't really been at our best for 17 years, we've reconciled."
"They said, 'we want to be a girlfriend show,' and I said, 'OK.'
“.”



**Something goes wrong**
“She’s always doing things like that.”And Jenner, who became a first-time mom to daughter Kourtney at age 22, says she sees glimpses of herself in her youngest child.”
“She had this elaborate gorgeous party that she wanted to do for all of us just out of love because she wanted to make sure that we had this amazing morning after church.”
“And she’s such a good mom," Kris Jenner says about daughter Kylie JennerWhen it comes to her latest project, Kris Jenner is mixing business with pleasure.”
“The Kardashian matriarch announced on Tuesday that she teamed up with daughter Kylie Jenner on a makeup line, Kris Jenner x Kylie Cosmetics.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I had the best time,” says Jenner, 62, of working with Kylie, 20.”
““It was her idea.”
“She actually surprised me one day at a meeting.”
“She walked in and said, ‘Guess what we’re going to do!’ It’s a lot of fun.”A perennial multi-tasker, the producer and manager is also collaborating with professional networking platform Bumble Bizz to find a new personal assistant.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”


"She always does things like that." Jenner said she saw her shadow in the youngest child. Jenna was 22 when she first became a mother to her daughter Courtney
"She had an elaborate and gorgeous party, and all she wanted to do for all of us was out of love, because she wanted to make sure we had this amazing after morning church."
"She's such a good mother," Chris Jenner said of her daughter, Kelly Jenner. Speaking of her latest project, Chris Jenner combines work and play
Kardashian's matriarch announced on Tuesday that she and her daughter Kylie Jenner have teamed up to create a cosmetics line, Kris Jenner x Kylie cosmetics
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I had the best time," said Jenner, 62, who works with Kelly, 20
"It was her idea."
"In fact, one day at a meeting, she surprised me."
"She came in and said," guess what we're going to do! As a versatile producer and manager, he also works with bumble bizz, a professional social platform, to find a new personal assistant
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"



Number  126
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I feel so blessed to do what I do, but there's nothing in the world better than watching your child succeed.””
““It’s very important that I’m present and she has a stable, innocent childhood.”
““My child is the most important person to me, and her upbringing is paramount to my work right now,” she said.”
“But she was direct about one thing in particular: her main focus is for Suri, who will be 11 in April, to maintain her childlike innocence as long as possible.”
““But it’s very relatable to me; if people know who you are, they might write about you, and you can't control that.”Throughout the piece Holmes remained coy about just how private she keeps her daughter‘s life.”
““There are more important things,” she continued.”
“In her Town & Country interview, Holmes said she knows she cannot control the fact that her name will be tabloid fodder.”
“Suri makes rare appearances on Holmes’s social-media accounts, mostly for occasions like a family birthday party last September and her mother’s birthday in December.”
“In a clear effort for privacy, the actress and director has been careful to keep her only child out of the public eye.”
“This quote begs the question of just how much Holmes, who has primary custody of her daughter, lets Suri see or read when it comes to tabloid mentions (especially involving the two of them).”


"I feel lucky to be able to do what I do, but there's nothing better in the world than watching your child succeed."
"It's important that I'm here. She had a stable, innocent childhood."
"My child is the most important person to me and her growth is crucial to my current job," she said
"But she said one thing very directly: her main focus is to keep Suri, who will turn 11 in April this year, as young as possible."
"But it makes a lot of sense to me; if people know who you are, they might write about you and you can't control it." Throughout the article, Holmes always maintains a shy attitude towards her daughter's private life
"There are more important things," she continued
Sherlock Holmes said in an interview that she knew she couldn't control her name and that it would become tabloid material
Suri rarely appeared on Holmes's social media account, mainly at family birthday parties in September and mother's birthday in December
"In order to protect privacy, the actress and director have been very careful not to let her only son appear out of public view."
"This sentence evades the question of how much Sherlock Holmes let Suri see or read when she mentioned in the tabloids (especially when it comes to both of them) that she has the main custody of her daughter."



Number  127
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““@taylorswift13 dancing in a storm in her best dress because she’s fearless and it doesn’t get better than this in the ‘Delicate’ video is everything,” tweets a loyalist.”
“Naturally, Swift’s die-hard fans couldn’t care less about the Kenzo controversy.”
““Taylor Swift’s ‘Delicate’ video is a poor man’s version of Spike Jonze’s ad for Kenzo,” tweets another.”
“It’s almost beat-for-beat, just with worse dancing,” one whistleblower tweets.”
““Anybody else notice that the @taylorswift13 ‘Delicate’ music video ripped off Spike Jonze’s Kenzo video?”
“Critics say Swift’s video is a ripoff of Spike Jonze’s 2016 Kenzo commercial (starring “The Leftovers” actress Margaret Qualley).”
“The weird dance moves and the dramatic disrobing aren’t even the most buzzed-about bits of the video, though.”
“About a minute and a half in, things get crazy: The singer whips off the bottom of her gown, revealing a sassy, shorter version of her fringy frock.”
“This realization sets off a string of impromptu “La La Land”-esque dance moves — some of which are painfully awkward to watch.”
“She’s interrupted by a group of women, and when she turns back to the mirror, she realizes she can’t see her reflection anymore.”


"@ Taylor swift13 dances in the storm in her best clothes because she's fearless, and there's nothing better than that in the" exquisite "video," one of her loyalists tweeted
"It's natural that Swift's die hard fans won't be indifferent to Kenzo's controversy."
"Taylor Swift's' exquisite 'video is a poor man's version of spike Jonze's advertisement for Kenzo," another tweeter said
"It's almost beating, but dancing worse," one whistleblower tweeted
"Did anyone notice that @ Taylor swift13's" exquisite "music video was torn from spike jonz's Kenzo video?"
"Critics say Swift's video is a remake of spike Jonze's 2016 Kenzo ad (starring" leftover "actress Margaret quilly)
"However, the strange dance steps and the dramatic striptease steps are not even the liveliest parts of the video."
"About a minute and a half later, things got crazy: the singer yanked off the hem of his robe to reveal a fashionable short version of a tassel dress."
This understanding led to a series of impromptu "laladi" dance movements, some of which seemed very awkward
"She was interrupted by a group of women, and when she turned to look in the mirror, she realized that she would never see her reflection again."



Number  128
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“In the photos, the family is all smiles and definitely appears to be a happy — further solidifying the fact that the rumors are just silly rumors.”
“Jessica has also been posting a ton of family photos on her Instagram, including one from her daughter Maxwell’s Greatest-Showman-themed birthday.”
“Furthermore, the 37-year-old teased fans back in February with a photo of herself and Annie Bosko writing songs in a studio, hinting that a new album could be in the works.”
“A rep for Jessica told the magazine that there is “no merit” to the claims that Simpson is depressed over her size and where she is at in her career.”
“A post shared by Jessica Simpson (@jessicasimpson) on Apr 28, 2018 at 11:29am PDTTo debunk the baseless rumors, Gossip Cop took it upon themselves to speak with Jessica Simpson’s actual rep to get the full scoop.”
“But the publication fails to mention the fact that the 37-year-old is head of a billion dollar fashion brand and appears to be doing just fine career wise.”
“...has hit a low point at her acting and singing careers and since her professional life no longer puts her on the stage she doesn t have motivation to work out...”
“But Gossip Cop reports that the tabloid cover couldn t be any further from the truth and neither could the accompanying article which claims Simpson gained over 50 lbs and is down in the dumps because of her weight gain The article also claims that Simpson feels as though she...”
“However, even after posting a ton of body positive images, an NW tabloid cover claims that Simpson feels “fat and alone” while they also shared a less than flattering bikini picture from Jessica’s vacation.”
“The photo trifecta was complete with the last picture, one of Johnson and Simpson, both in their swimsuits.”


"In the photo, the family is smiling and must look happy - further reinforcing the fact that rumors are just stupid rumors."
"Jessica also posted a lot of family photos on instagram, including a birthday photo of her daughter Maxwell's greatest performer."
"In addition, in February this year, the 37 year old fan teased fans with photos of himself and Anne Bosco writing songs in the studio, suggesting that a new album might be in the pipeline."
A representative of Jessica told the magazine that Simpson's frustration with his short stature and career status was "worthless"
"Jessica Simpson (@ Jessica Simpson) shared a post at 11:29 a.m. on April 28, 2018. In order to expose groundless rumors, the gossip police took the initiative to talk with the actual representative of Jessica Simpson to get a complete exclusive."
"But the publication doesn't mention the fact that the 37 year old is in charge of a $1 billion fashion brand and seems to have done a good job in his career."
“…… She has reached a low point in her acting and singing career. As her career no longer puts her on the stage, she has no motivation to exercise... "
"But the gossip police reported that the cover of the tabloid was totally inconsistent with the facts, and the accompanying article claimed that Simpson had gained more than 50 pounds and was depressed because of his weight gain. The article also claimed that Simpson felt like..."
"However, even after posting a large number of positive pictures of her body, the cover of a Northwest tabloid claimed that Simpson felt" fat and lonely "and they also shared a picture of Jessica's less likable bikini on holiday."
"This photo trilogy is complete with the last photo. Johnson and Simpson are both in swimsuits."



Number  129
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Diana...”
“It s been less than three months since Prince Harry got down on one knee and yet already his bride to be is winning over public hearts and evoking memories of another former Kensington Palace resident Harry s mom Princess...”
“But as we edge closer to her May wedding date, it's becoming clear she's having a much bigger impact on the House of Windsor than any of us could have possibly predicted.”
“Meghan Markle's influence has jokingly been referred to as the "Markle Sparkle," a phrase that seems particularly fitting considering her glamourous past.”
“But with Meghan Markle in the mix, it feels like we may also be gaining a new People's Princess.”
“Sure, 2018 is going to bring us some extra family members: Prince George and Princess Charlotte will be getting a new sibling and we have a wedding to look forward to.”
“There's something a little bit different about the British royal family nowadays.”


"Diana..."
"Prince Harry has been on one knee for less than three months, but his bride to be has won the public's heart, evoking the memory of another former Kensington Palace resident Harry's mother Princess..."
"But as we get closer to her wedding date in May, her influence on the palace is becoming more and more obvious than any of us expected."
Megan markel's influence has been dubbed "markel's flash," a phrase that seems particularly appropriate given her fascinating past
"But with Megan marcel, it feels like we may also have a new princess of the people."
"Of course, 2018 will bring us some extra family members: Prince George and Princess Charlotte will have a new brother and sister, and we have a wedding to look forward to."
"The royal family is a little different now."



Number  130
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Do YOU think he should buy a new place and turn it into a gallery or art studio?”
““They have held a few secret rendezvous at the Malibu estate where she has been staying occasionally since her split from Brad.”HollywoodLifers, are YOU surprised Brad is so involved with the LA art community?”
“So much so, that the actor is now looking for a new place to purchase in the hip neighborhood, HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY reports.”
“Read here for all details!”
“Brad Pitt, 53, is no stranger to the art scene in Los Angeles.”
“In fact, the father of six has been spending more and more time at his friend Thomas Houseago‘s studio.”
““Brad is looking to buy space here (Frogtown).”
“He wants to convert one of the warehouses into a studio and art gallery.”
“He’s got tons of friends in the arts community and wants to help new and upcoming artists have a voice, somewhere they can showcase their work,” an insider tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
“How cool!”


"Do you think he should buy a new place and turn it into a gallery or art studio?"
"They had several secret meetings at Malibu manor, where she has lived occasionally since she broke up with Brad." Hollywood stars, are you surprised that Brad is so involved in the Los Angeles art world? "
"So much so that the actor is now looking for a new place to buy in the fashion community, exclusive to Hollywood life."
"See here for details!"
"Brad Pitt, 53, is no stranger to the art world in Los Angeles."
"In fact, the father of six is spending more and more time in his friend Thomas hausergo's studio."
"Brad wants to buy a place (frog town) here."
"He wanted to transform one of the warehouses into a studio and an art gallery."
"He has many friends in the art world and hopes to help new and upcoming artists have a say where they can show their works," an insider told reporters Exclusive to Hollywood life
"That's cool!"



Number  131
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Related: Gigi Hadid Apologizes for “Racist” Post “Mocking” AsiansCheck this out:”
“Watch this space for updates.”
“In an announcement on Twitter she posted, “I’m so bummed I won’t be able to make it to China this year.”
“Love my VS family, and will be with all my girls in spirit!!”
“Can't wait to tune in with everyone to see the beautiful show I know it will be, and already can't wait for next year!”Up until Thursday, it was understood that Gigi would be joining her sister and walking the show for the third year in a row.”
“The abrupt announcement has many fans speculating as to why she will not be there.”
“While some have cited other models having issues with Visa’s, the majority feel that it might have something to do with a viral video of her that was posted to Snapchat a few months ago.”
“In the video, Gigi is shown squinting her eyes while holding a Buddha, which was seen as extremely offensive.”
“With the show taking place in Shanghai, commenters called for the model to drop out almost immediately after news broke that she was joining the 2017 model cast.”
“Despite a written apology several months after the incident, it appears several fans were still held a grudge.”


Related report: Gigi Hadid apologizes for "racist" posts that "ridicule" Asians
"View this space for updates."
"I'm so frustrated that I can't go to China this year," she said in a twitter announcement
"Love my family, will be with all my girls in spirit!"
"I can't wait to watch this beautiful TV play with you. I know it will be like this, and I can't wait to watch next year! "Until Thursday, it's known that Gigi will join her for the third year in a row."
"The sudden announcement made many fans wonder why she didn't attend."
"While some people have mentioned that other models have problems with visa, most people think it may have something to do with her viral video, which was released on snapchat a few months ago."
"In the video, Gigi squints when holding a Buddha statue, which is considered extremely offensive."
"With the show in Shanghai, critics almost immediately called on models to quit after the news that she had joined the 2017 model line-up came out."
"Despite a written apology a few months after the incident, it seems that there are still a few fans who hold grudges."



Number  132
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Will it be on social media?”
“Despite being stuck in the hospital it was still the best Father’s Day ever for the couple,” our insider adds.”
“We’ve got EXCLUSIVE details on how Jay Z’s newborn twins with wife Beyonce already resemble the rapper, and the couple can’t wait to finally bring them home.”
“Any new parents can’t wait to bring their baby home from the hospital to the comfort of their own nursery.”
“Unfortunately for Beyonce, 35, and Jay Z, 47, mother and their newborn twins — a boy and a girl — are still at UCLA Medical Center a week after she gave birth on June 12.”
““Beyonce is eager to get her new babies home.”
“She has been stuck inside the hospital for a week now and Jay has been by her side daily as they follow all of the doctor’s conservative orders to ensure the newborns are healthy and strong before going home,” a source close to Jay tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
“Having twins always causes a higher risk of complications for both mother and babies, even though the kids reportedly just have a “minor issue” that doctors want to monitor.”
“Jay’s genes have proven dominant once again as the newborns resemble their rapper dad.”
““Everyone who has met the babies are already saying both kids look just like their father!”


"Will it be on social media?"
"Despite being trapped in the hospital, it's still the best father's Day ever for the couple," our insider added
"We have exclusive coverage of the similarities between jay z and his wife Beyonce's newborn twins and Rappers, and the couple can't wait to take them home."
"Any new parent can't wait to take their child home from the hospital to their own nursery."
"Unfortunately for Beyonce, 35, and Jay, 47, their mother and their newborn twins - a man and a woman - are still at UCLA Medical Center a week after giving birth on June 12."
"Beyonce is eager to bring her new baby home."
"She's been stuck in the hospital for a week, and Jay is around her every day, because they follow all the doctor's conservative orders to make sure the newborn is healthy and strong before they go home," a source close to Jay told her
"Twins are always associated with a higher risk of complications for mothers and babies, although it is reported that the children have only one 'minor problem' that doctors want to monitor."
"Jay's gene has once again been shown to be dominant, because the newborn baby is very similar to the rapper's father."
"Everyone who has seen children says that both children look like their father!"



Number  133
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“This is just an image we wish never got into our heads, tbh.”
“According to the mag, Kris Jenner isn't taking any chances on who the father could be, and "wants the candidates to take paternity tests."”
“Um.”
“"He [Scott] and Kylie were rumoured to be an item once, so he's not off the list."”
“...an insider has revealed that it's a possibility.”
“According to OK!”
“Things just got even more freaking insane, because reports are now coming out that Scott Disick is being tested too.”
“HOWEVER.”
“Although the pair were broken up when Kylie fell pregnant, he was sure there could be a chance that the baby was his.”
“Right after Kylie Jenner gave birth to Stormi, whose father we ASSUMED was Travis Scott... her ex Tyga demanded a paternity test.”


"It's just an image that we hope will never enter our minds, TBH."
According to the magazine, Chris Jenner did not speculate on his father's identity. He wanted the candidate to undergo paternity testing
"Well."
"It's rumored that he (Scott) and Kelly used to be a project, so he wasn't excluded from the list."
“…… It's a possibility, an insider said
"Press OK!"
"It's getting crazier because now it's reported that Scott Disick is also being tested."
"But."
"Although Kelly broke up when she was pregnant, he was sure the baby might be his."
"Right after Kelly Jenner gave birth to Tommy, we thought his father was Travis Scott... Her predecessor, TEGA, asked for a paternity test



Number  134
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“News, "Samantha's expertise is the protection of children and over the past few weeks, Angelina's come to rely on her counsel and decided to put her in the lead."”
“A source familiar with the proceedings also tells E!”
“"Angelina appreciates Laura's cooperation in transitioning the case over the past several weeks."”
“News in a statement.”
“"Angelina decided to change counsel to Samantha Bley DeJean of Bley and Bley, as Samantha's expertise is the protection and best interests of children," Mindy Nyby, spokesperson for Jolie tells E!”
“The 43-year-old Oscar winner has parted ways with divorce attorney Laura Wasser and will now be working with Samantha Bley DeJean.”
“Angelina Jolie is moving in a new direction amid her ongoing court battle with Brad Pitt.”


"News," Samantha's expertise is child protection, and in the past few weeks, Angelina has come to rely on her advice and decided to let her take the lead
"A person familiar with the matter told e!"
"Angelina thanks Laura for her cooperation in the transfer of cases over the past few weeks."
"The news in the statement."
Julie's spokesman, Mindy nibby, told e
"The 43 year old Oscar winner has broken up with divorce lawyer Laura Wasser and will now work with Samantha bradjean."
"Angelina Jolie is moving in a new direction in her court battle with Brad Pitt."



**Something goes wrong**
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“We pay for juicy info!”
“Tell us your thoughts below.”
““She sees both of her sisters with all these kids and it just makes her sad that she is the odd one out.”Do you think that Tristan Thompson should ask Khloe Kardashian to marry him?”
“...nothing more than to start a family and have a bunch of kids with Tristan the source told Radar...”
“She does not know why he has not asked her to marry him already and is just starting to become very frustrated because she wants a family and kids stat She wants her ring and she is just so bothered that he has not even gotten one yet Khloe wants...”
““Khloe is at the point right now where she is basically like, ‘WTF?,’” a source close to the Kardashian clan said.”
“RadarOnline.com has exclusively learned that Kardashian, 33, and NBA star boyfriend of one year, Tristan Thompson, 26, have been talking about getting engaged for so long that it is really starting to irk her!”
“Khloe Kardashian is tired of waiting on her man to pop the question!”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"We pay for interesting information!"
"Tell us what you think."
"She's sad to see her two sisters with so many children. She's a freak." Do you think Tristan Thompson should propose to Chloe Kardashian? "
“… It's just to form a family with Tristan and have a bunch of children, the source told radar
"She doesn't know why he hasn't proposed to her yet. She starts to get very depressed because she wants a family and children. She wants her ring. She's just upset. He hasn't even got what Khloe wants..."
"Khloe is basically saying," WTF? A source close to the Kardashian family said
“ RadarOnline.com The reporter exclusively learned that 33 year old Kardashian and 26 year old NBA star boyfriend Tristan Thompson have been talking about engagement for such a long time, which really starts to make her tired! "
"Khloe Kardashian is tired of waiting for her man to ask questions!"



Number  136
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Parker and Broderick live in New York City, but have been known to escape to their second home in Ireland and another house they own in The Hamptons.”
“She gave birth to their first son, James Wilkie, in 2002, and they welcomed a set of twins, Marion Loretta Elwell and Tabitha Hodge, via a surrogate seven years later.”
“The couple married in a synagogue in Manhattan in 1997 after they were set up by one of Parker’s brothers.”
“Husband Matthew Broderick is the winner of two Tony Awards and is well-known for playing the lead character in the 1986 success “Ferris Bueller’s Day Off” and for voicing Simba in the Disney classic “The Lion King” (1994).”
“She is a four-time Golden Globe winner and two-time Emmy Award winner for her work on the show.”
“Parker is best known for her portrayal of Carrie Bradshaw on the HBO hit series “Sex and the City”.”
“Sarah Jessica Parker and Matthew Broderick Net Worth: Sarah Jessica Parker is an American actress and the wife of actor Matthew Broderick.”


Parker and Broderick live in New York City, but they are known to have fled to their second home in Ireland and another house in Hampton
"She gave birth to their first son, James Wilkie, in 2002, and seven years later they had twins through surrogate mothers, Marion Loretta Elwell and Tabitha Hodge."
"In 1997, a brother of Parker founded the couple and they got married in a synagogue in Manhattan."
Husband Matthew Brodrick, two Tony Award winners, is famous for his leading role in the 1986 success film "the holiday of Ferris Buller" and his voice dubbing for Simba in the Disney classic "the lion king" (1994)
"She's a four time Golden Globe winner and two time Emmy winner because of her performance on the show."
Parker is best known for her role as Kelly Bradshaw in the HBO hit sex and the city
"Sarah Jessica Parker and Matthew Broderick net worth: Sarah Jessica Parker is an American actress and the wife of actor Matthew Broderick."



Number  137
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“As stated, it’s not the most common dementia.”
“Why isn’t it more well-known?”
“Cells as complex and important as neurons produce a bewildering array of proteins, to aid in the necessary functions and form the delicate cytoskeletal structure in place to maintain everything.”
“Put simply, Lewy Bodies are lumps, known as aggregates, of misshapen protein (of the type Alpha-synuclein) that occur in nerve cells (neurons) of people with certain conditions, most often Parkinson’s disease, and but also (obviously) dementia with Lewy Bodies.”
“What damage do they cause?”
“Why are they important?”
“What do they do?”
“The most obvious question when encountering dementia with Lewy Bodies is, what are Lewy Bodies?”
“What are Lewy Bodies?”
“Here’s why.”


"As mentioned earlier, this is not the most common form of dementia."
"Why not be more famous?"
Complex and important cells like neurons produce a series of puzzling proteins to help complete the necessary functions and form fine cytoskeleton structure to maintain everything
In short, Lewy bodies are aggregates of malformed proteins (α - synuclein type), which exist in the nerve cells (neurons) of people with some diseases. The most common is Parkinson's disease, but there are also dementia of Lewy bodies
"What damage have they done?"
"Why are they important?"
"What do they do?"
"When it comes to Lewy body dementia, the most obvious question is, what is Lewy body?"
"What is an obscene body?"
"That's why."



Number  138
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Which is not good news for Jennifer Hudson!””
“Now they hope Kelly never leaves.”
“Blake and Adam have been with the show since the beginning.”
““The show has had more trouble finding the right female judges.”
“Had they known she would have been this great they would have pushed harder years ago to get her to say ‘yes,” sources tell Straight Shuter.”
“‘The Voice’ had been talking to Kelly for some time.”
“But that isn’t true.”
“At first people were suspicious that she was only hired because she was the first winner of ‘American Idol’ and now the two singing shows go head-to-head.”
““Kelly has been a fantastic addition to the show.”
“Kelly Clarkson Replaces Jennifer Hudson On ‘The Voice’ Permanently – EXCLUSIVEKelly Clarkson will be spinning round in her judge’s chair at ‘The Voice’ for as long as she wants now that the show has offered her a permanent seat.”


"It's not good news for Jennifer Hudson!"
"Now they hope Kelly will never leave."
"Black and Adam have been with the play from the beginning."
"It's harder to find the right female judges for this show."
"If they knew she would be so great, they would have tried harder a few years ago to get her to say 'yes,'" the source told straight Shuter
"Voice has been talking to Kelly for some time."
"But that's not the case."
"At first, people suspected that she was hired because she was the first winner of American Idol, but now the two singing shows are close."
"Kelly is an excellent rookie in the play."
"Kelly Clarkson will permanently replace Jennifer Hudson in the voice - exclusive, Kelly Clarkson will be the judge of the voice, and now the show has a permanent seat for her if she wants to."



Number  139
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at 800-344-9598 any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
““She loves the fact this will be the ultimate slap in Tom’s face!”We pay for juicy info!”
“But she’s finally gone public with the worst-kept secret relationship ever — her romance with Cruise’s longtime pal Foxx — and is now happy to show it off to the world.”
“The actress had refused offers to write an explosive tell-all about her stifling marriage to Tom and the iron fist of the church.”
“So it may be no surprise that her next role is in the adaptation of the best-selling self-help book “The Secret.”“Katie hopes to use the film to become a self-help guru and completely defy Scientology’s views of therapy,” said the source.”
““Now she wants to pass on the benefit of her experience to help other women who’ve weathered similar nightmares.”Though Holmes, 38, escaped Cruise (and Scientology) in 2012, she’s determined to continue being an advocate of therapy.”
““Katie says therapy is the ONLY thing that saved her and daughter Suri from her suffocating marriage to Tom and the clutches of the church,” a source revealed to RadarOnline.com exclusively.”
“Crafty Katie Holmes is throwing some backhanded shade on ex-husband Tom Cruise and Scientology, RadarOnline.com has learned, by parading her romance with Jamie Foxx and lauding psychological therapy — which the church disdains.”
“Katie Holmes Embraces Therapy & Jamie Foxx To Get Revenge On Cruise Scientology opposes traditional psychotherapies.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call 800-344-9598 at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"She liked the fact that it would be the last slap on Tom's face! "We pay for interesting information!"
"But she finally made public the worst secret relationship ever - her relationship with Cruise's old friend fox - and now she's happy to show it to the world."
"The actress refused to write an article about her suffocating marriage with Tom and the church's iron hand."
"So it may not be surprising that her next role is adapted from the best-selling self-help book secrets." "Katie wants to use the film to become a master of self-help, completely ignoring Scientology's therapeutic ideas," the source said
"Now she wants to pass on the benefits of her experience to other women who have experienced similar nightmares." Although Sherlock Holmes, 38, fled Cruise (and Scientology) in 2012, she is determined to continue to be an advocate of treatment
"Katie said treatment was the only thing that could free her and her daughter Suri from their suffocating marriage to Tom and the clutches of the church," a source said RadarOnline.com Exclusive to the website. "
"The cunning Katie Holmes made a backhand attack on his ex husband Tom Cruise and Scientology, RadarOnline.com She learned a lot by showing off her romance with Jamie Fox and praising psychotherapy, which the church despises. "
"Katie Holmes was treated, and Jamie fox retaliated against Cruz Scientology for opposing traditional psychotherapy."



**Something goes wrong**
“...just have to wait and see but maybe they ll soon be hearing from Pastor Justin...”
“...very close to a lot of the Hillsong people However the source conceded it s not yet certain whether Bieber is looking to partner with the Hillsong people in some way or is considering some religious activity on his own including starting his own church So the Belieber community will...”
“He secretly arrived via private plane for the three day event and appeared in happy spirits The source told Australia Today We know that he was in Australia a few weeks ago having meetings and attending the big Hillsong convention that they had here The source added that Bieber is...”
“Mail reported...”
“Pastor Carl as he is known said Bieber got down on his knees ravaged by loss and sobbed I want to know Jesus In early July Bieber who has a Son of God tattoo across his chest attended the annual Hillsong conference in Sydney Australia with Pastor Carl the Daily...”
“The church is led by “rock star preacher” Carl Lentz who spoke of bringing Bieber to salvation in that GQ piece and who shadowed him on his tour of Australia in March.”
“Most notably, there is the Hillsong NYC, which opened in New York in 2010, the Guardian reported.”
“The Pentecostal church was founded in New South Wales in 1983 and has since expanded to outposts all over that country as well as the world, from Kiev to Paris to Buenos Aires.”
““It’s where the cool kids spend Sunday morning after Saturday night at the club,” the GQ piece said.”
“#9Today pic.twitter.com/BzZw1cnihC — The Today Show (@TheTodayShow) July 25, 2017Bieber is well known for attending the Hillsong Church, described in a 2015 GQ report as the megachurch “of choice” for hot young celebrities like Bieber, as well as Kevin Durant, Kendall Jenner and Selana Gomez.”


“… Just wait and see. Maybe they'll get a letter from pastor Justin soon... "
“…… It is very close to many folk singers, but the source admits that it is not sure whether Bieber wants to cooperate with them in some way, or is considering carrying out some religious activities on his own, including building his own church, so as to facilitate the belibe community.... "
"He secretly flew to the three-day event in a private plane and showed up happily. The source told Australia that today we know that he had a meeting in Australia a few weeks ago and attended their Hillsong conference here. The source added that Bieber was..."
Mail report
"The well-known Reverend Carl said that bibber knelt down and wept because of the loss of his family. I want to know that at the beginning of July, Jesus bibber, with the tattoo of the son of God on his chest, and reverend Carl attended the annual meeting of hirson in Sydney, Australia together..."
"The church is led by Carl Lenz, a rock star missionary, who in his GQ article talked about taking Bieber to the land of salvation and following him on his march trip to Australia."
According to the guardian, the most eye-catching is Hillsong NYC, which opened in New York in 2010
"The Pentecostal Church was founded in New South Wales in 1983 and has since expanded to outposts in the country and around the world, from Kiev to Paris to Buenos Aires."
"It's a place where cool kids spend Sunday mornings and Saturday nights at the club," said an article in GQ
"Today" pic.twitter.com/BzZw1cnihC -"The today show" on July 25, 2017, Bieber was famous for attending hillsson church. According to a 2015 GQ report, this is the "first choice" Cathedral for hot young celebrities such as Bieber, Kevin Durant, Kendall Jenner and Serena Gomez



Number  141
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You know."”
“It is kind of fun so see the world from the girl's side.”
“...that she s just friends with blonde bombshell Sophia Hutchins...”
“But now, it's being reported that they're getting married!”
“After their close friendship was described as a "mother and daughter" relationship, it's now said they've been dating in recent weeks.”
“And things are getting serious very quickly - despite their 47-year age gap.”
“If Caitlyn, 68, married 21-year-old transgender student Sophia, it would be her fourth marriage.”
“Before transitioning in 2015, she tied the knot three times as Bruce - to Chrystie Crownover in 1972, Linda Thompson in 1981, and to Kris Jenner in 1991.”
“(Image: ITV Picture Desk) (Image: Getty Images North America)Caitlyn has six biological children - two with each wife - and was step-father to Kris' kids, Kourtney, Kim, Khloe and Rob Kardashian.”
“Now, a source close to the star has told Heat magazine: "Cait really sees herself spending the rest of her life with Sophia.”


"You know that."
"It's fun, so look at the world from a girl's point of view."
“…… She's just a friend of blonde Sophia Hutchins... "
"But now, there are reports that they are getting married!"
"After their intimate friendship was described as a 'mother daughter' relationship, it is now said that they have been dating in recent weeks."
"Even though they are 47 years apart, things are getting worse."
"If Caitlin, 68, married Sophia, a 21-year-old transsexual student, it would be her fourth marriage."
"Before her transformation in 2015, she had three indissoluble bonds with Bruce - with Christie crowover in 1972, Linda Thompson in 1981, and Chris Jenner in 1991."
(photo source: ITV picture desk) (photo source: Getty Images North America) Caitlin has six biological children - two for each wife - who are Chris's children, Courtney, Kim, Chloe and rob Kardashian's stepfather. "
Now, a source close to the star told heat: "Katie really sees herself spending the rest of her life with Sophia."



**Something goes wrong**
“It just evolved over time and bloomed into this wonderful thing.'”
“I can't really say when it turned into more.”
“The wildlife warrior, 19, took to Instagram on Saturday to share an adorable couple photo with her boyfriend of four years.”
“However, upon uploading the image, Bindi was inundated with comments from fans all waiting for a wedding.”
“Patiently waiting for the proposal A photo shared by Bindi Irwin to Instagram on Saturday was inundated with comments from fans urging her to marry Chandler Powell pictured Several followers referenced a wedding or proposal beneath the photo which was taken during a sunset hike in Queensland s Glass House...”
“Mountains National Park...”
“One wrote: 'Every time you post a picture together I'm always sure it will be your engagement announcement.”
“Wishful thinking!'”
“Another echoed a similar sentiment, commenting: 'Patiently waiting for the proposal photo.'”
“'Every day is so special with you': Bindi recently celebrated her anniversary with boyfriend Chandler in a loved-up social media tributeOne follower tagged Chandler directly, writing: '@chandlerpowell propose already, man!”


"It just evolved over time and developed into this wonderful thing."
"I really don't know when it will become more."
"The 19-year-old wildlife fighter shared a lovely picture of a couple with her boyfriend of four years on instagram on Saturday."
"However, after uploading this photo, Bingdi was overwhelmed by comments from fans, who were waiting for the wedding."
"Bidi Irwin shared a photo with instagram on Saturday, and fans commented on it, urging her to marry Chandler Powell. Here, several followers mentioned a wedding or proposal at the bottom of the photo. The photo was taken during a sunset hike at the glass house in Queensland..."
"Mountain National Park..."
"One of them wrote: 'every time you post a photo together, I'm always sure it's your engagement announcement."
"Wishful thinking!"
Another netizen expressed a similar view, commenting: "wait patiently for the photo of the proposal."
"Every day with you is so special": Bingdi and her boyfriend Chandler recently celebrated her anniversary at a popular social media memorial service. One follower tagged Chandler directly, saying: "Chandler Powell has proposed, man!"



**Something goes wrong**
“And he knows he could still have a baby with her later down the line if they were ever to rekindle the passion they once had.””
“But even still, he forgives her because he loves her.”
“It’s hard to believe that it’s only been one year since Kylie Jenner and Tyga split — especially because so much has changed for Kylie since then.”
“The Keeping Up With the Kardashians star is now a mom to an adorable little girl named Stormi Webster whom she shares with her new boyfriend rapper Travis Scott and even though she s already moved on and had a whole baby with another man sources exclusively revealed to In...”
“Touch that Tyga isn t really over Kylie...”
““Even though they’re not together, Tyga misses Kylie.”
“For real,” the insider told In Touch.”
““He misses her sexiness.”
“Her body.”
“The lavish life, connections, money and exposure she gave him.”


"He knew that if they could rekindle their passion, he could have a baby with her in the future."
"But even so, he forgave her because he loved her."
"It's hard to believe it's only a year since Kelly Jenner and tiga broke up - especially because Kelly has changed so much since then."
"The Kardashian star is now the mother of a lovely little girl named stolmy Webster, who shares the girl with her new boyfriend rapper Travis Scott, even though she has moved and has a full child with another man
"Don't touch that TEGA really doesn't like Kelly..."
"Even if they're not together, TEGA still misses Kelly."
"It's true," the person said in contact magazine
"He missed her sexy."
"Her body."
"She gave him a life of luxury, connections, money and exposure."



**Something goes wrong**
“As a result, Gossip Cop has determined this report is completely false.”
“Plus, the magazine also wrongly asserts the kids are spending the summer in Los Angeles when the reputable People has already reported they’ll be in London.”
“A new report claims the estranged spouses have reconciled and are “rebuilding” their family.”
“Gossip Cop, however, can debunk the inaccurate story.”
“A headline in the latest edition of Globe exclaims Brad Angie Hot Again According to this world exclusive Pitt and Jolie have mended fences in a sizzling reunion between the sheets The supermarket tabloid alleges the real reason their divorce hasn t been finalized is because the stars couldn t...”
“...bring themselves to sign the papers Instead contends the magazine the warring exes had a steamy clothes ripping reconciliation Notably it s not said just when this alleged reunion occurred...”
“But a so-called “insider” is quoted as saying, “It was exciting and explosive, and it settled old scores and made them realize they weren’t done with each other.” What, was this supposed source in the room with them?”
“Perhaps hiding under the bed?”
“Or in the closet?”
“In any case the purported tipster goes on to assert They care for each other and they want to work things out It s even alleged Pitt dropped a bombshell admission to an unnamed pal in which he declared I love my wife The outlet and its insider further claim...”


"Therefore, the gossip police decided that the report was totally false."
In addition, the magazine mistakenly asserts that the children are spending their summer holidays in Los Angeles, while celebrities have said they will be in London
"A new report says separated spouses have reconciled and are 'rebuilding' their families."
"However, the gossip police can expose this inaccurate story."
According to the world exclusive, Pitt and Julie mended the gap in the warm reunion between the sheets. Supermarket tabloids say the real reason why their divorce has not yet been decided is that the stars can't make it
“…… Let them sign the papers themselves instead of arguing that the magazine's belligerent ex girlfriend had a hot suit torn and reconciled, especially if it doesn't mean, just when this so-called reunion happens... "
But one so-called "insider" said, "it's exciting and explosive, it solves the old scores and makes them realize they're not ending each other." What, is this a hypothetical source in the room with them? "
"Maybe under the bed?"
"Or in the closet?"
"In any case, the so-called informer continues to claim that they care about each other and they want to solve problems. Some even say that Pete has dropped an explosive confession to an anonymous friend in which he claims that I love my wife. The store and its insiders further claim that..."



Number  145
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And seeing you with our children, Ella and Alexander, is the greatest joy in my life.””
“I always hoped existed...”
“Taking the stage the British lawyer gave a sweet speech saying that the star is the person who has my complete admiration and also the person whose smile makes me melt every time Addressing him directly she added My love what I have found with you is the great love...”
“He seemed like the proudest parent and just couldn’t stop showing photos and talking about how much he loves the kids.”Clooney’s wife, 40, paid tribute to her husband’s parenting skills when he was presented with an AFI Lifetime Achievement Award on Thursday, June 7.”
““George teased that the babies are like models and he never has to show them how to pose because they do it so naturally.”
““George told a funny story about how he and Amal have to keep the toilet seat down for the twins’ sake and then he started showing his friends photos of them,” an eyewitness tells Us Weekly.”
“Standing with pals including Casamigos cofounder and close friend Rande Gerber, Clooney pulled out his phone, which has a background photo of his kids, Ella and Alexander, who turned 1 on June 6.”
“The Tomorrowland actor, 57, was casually dressed as he attended the party solo and sipped on a pineapple margarita at the event celebrating his tequila brand.”
“The Academy Award winner showed off pics of his twins with wife Amal while attending a Casamigos House of Friends Dinner at TAO in L.A. on Friday, June 8.”
“George Clooney is one proud papa!”


"To see you and our children, Ella and Alexander, is the greatest joy of my life."
"I always wanted to exist..."
"On the stage, the British lawyer made a sweet remark, saying that the star is a person I totally admire, and also a person who smiles and melts me every time I speak to him directly. She adds my love, and I find great love with you..."
"He seems to be the proudest parent, always showing photos and talking about how much he loves his children." On Thursday, June 7, 40 year old Clooney's wife presented her husband with the AFI Lifetime Achievement Award, honoring his parenting skills
"George joked that children are like models. He never has to teach them how to pose because they pose naturally."
"George told an interesting story that he and Amar had to put down the toilet seat for the twins, and then he started showing his friends their pictures," one witness told us
Standing next to friends like Rande Gerber, co-founder and friend of casamigos, Clooney takes out his mobile phone with background photos of his children Ella and Alexander, who turned 1 on June 6
"The 57 year old actor of tomorrow's world dressed casually and sipped pineapple Margarita at the party alone during the celebration of the tequila brand."
On Friday, June 8, the Oscar winner showed pictures of twins with his wife Amar at a dinner party at casamigos friends' home in Tao, Los Angeles
"George Clooney is a proud father!"



Number  146
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Share your thoughts and reactions in the comments section below!”
“Then she finds a way to brag about Younes and tries to one up him, she’s very competitive with Scott.”Our insider went on to add that Kourtney is claiming to be beating him in some supposed romance rivalry!”
“Kourtney Kardashian has been trying to one-up her ex Scott Disick in the love department!”
“Details!”
“Once Scott Disick, 34, and Kourtney Kardashian, 38, were a happy couple, now they’re rivals!”
“Or at least that’s what we’re hearing!”
“In recent days, Kourt has apparently been pretty nosy about Scott’s love life, according to our insiders!”
“Moreover, we’ve learned that she’s even been bragging about her steamy relationship with BF Younes Bendjima, 24!”
““Kourtney swears she doesn’t care that Scott’s in love with Sofia [Richie, 19] but it’s hard to believe her,” an insider tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““Whenever she sees Scott she grills him on Sofia and what they’ve been doing.”


"Share your thoughts and reactions in the comments section below!"
"Then she tried to brag about younes and try to beat him. She was very competitive with Scott." Our insiders went on to add that Courtney claimed to beat him in some so-called romantic competition! "
"Courtney Kardashian has been trying to compete with her predecessor, Scott Disick, in the love department!"
"Details!"
"Scott Disick, 34, and Courtney Kardashian, 38, were once a happy couple, and now they are rivals!"
"At least that's what we heard!"
"According to our insiders, in recent days, Kurt has obviously been very picky about Scott's love life!"
"In addition, we learned that she has even been boasting about her close relationship with her 24-year-old boyfriend younes bendjima!"
"Courtney swears she doesn't care if Scott falls in love with Sophia (Richie, 19), but it's hard to believe her," a person familiar with the matter told reporters exclusive to Hollywood life
"Whenever she saw Scott, she would question him about Sofia and what they had been doing."



Number  147
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“CopFilm Ratings comIMDbIMP awardsInstagramPeople...”
“2009 Bradley Cooper Why He Chose ReneeCathy Horyn 1998 Brad PittLeslie Bennetts 2001 It s Almost Impossible Not to Like Jennifer Aniston 2005 The Unsinkable Jennifer AnistonWarren Littlefield 2012 With Friends Like TheseVariousJonathan Van Meter 2008 Jennifer s Prime TimeVariousMerle Ginsberg 1999 Jennifer Aniston American Office MojoDaily Mail comGetty ImagesGossip...”
“Fox Searchlight Pictures 2002 The Good Girl Freestyle Releasing 2015 Cake Image Entertainment 2009 Management Lionsgate 2014 Life of Crime 2015 She s Funny That Way Miramx Films 2010 The Switch Netflix 2018 Dumplin 2019 Murder Mystery New Line Cinema 2009 He s Just Not That Into You Open Road...”
“Films 2016 Mother s Day 2018 Dumplin Paramount Pictures 1997 Til There Was You 2016 Office Christmas Party Roadside Attractions 2014 Life of Crime Saban Films 2018 The Yellow Birds Samuel Goldwyn Films 2009 Management Sony Pictures Classics 2006 Friends with Money TriMark Pictures 1993 Leprechaun Universal Pictures 2003 Bruce...”
“Almighty 2004 Along Came Polly 2006 The Break Up 2010 The Bounty Hunter 2011 Just Go with It 2012 Wanderlust Warner Bros Pictures 1999 The Iron Giant 2001 Rock Star 2005 Rumor Has It 2011 Horrible Bosses 2013 We re the Millers 2014 Horrible Bosses 2 2016 Storks The Weinstein...”
“Company 2005 Derailed TELEVISION 1992 1993 Herman s Head 1992 1993 The Edge WEB SERIES Apple TV 2019 2020 Top of the Morning Hollywood Reporter InStyle 2015 Jennifer Is Just Fine InStyle Molly McNearney 2017 Jennifer Aniston Is Just Fine SOURCES Thank you for visiting our site...”
“We hope you come back again.”
“If you like what you've seen you can follow us through "Google+" or "Follow By E-Mail".The following website is for entertainment purposes only.”
“No copyright infringement is intended.”
“All rights reserved to rightful film/television networks, productions companies, magazines, reporters, and sources listed above.”


"Public film ratings comimdbimp award stage audience..."
"2009 Bradley Cooper why did he choose reneecathy Horyn 1998 Brad pittleslie Bennets 2001 almost impossible not to like Jennifer Aniston 2005 unsinkable Jennifer Aniston Warren litterfield 2012 with friends like all kinds of Jonathan Fannie 2008 Jennifer Aniston Ginsberg 1999 Jennifer Aniston USA office mojo Daily Mail comgetty pictures
"Fox Searchlight Pictures 2002 good girl freestyle release 2015 cake Pictures Entertainment 2009 Management Lion Gate 2014 crime life 2015 she's funny miramx Movie 2010 switch Netflix 2018 DUMPLIN 2019 murder mystery New Line Cinema 2009 he just didn't walk into your open road..."
"Movie 2016 mother's Day 2018 DUMPLIN Paramount Pictures 1997 til there you 2016 office Christmas party roadside attractions 2014 crime life sarbane movie 2018 yellow bird Samuel Godwin Movie 2009 managing Sony movie classics 2006 friends with money Trimark pictures 1993 goblin global pictures 2003 Bruce..."
"Almighty 2004 Polly 2006 break up 2010 bounty hunter 2011 let it go 2012 Ranger Warner Bros 1999 steel giant 2001 rock star 2005 rumor 2011 terror boss 2013 we are Miller 2014 terror boss 2 2016 stork Weinstein..."
"Company 2005 derailed TV 1992 1993 Herman's first 1992 1993 edge network series Apple TV 2019 2020 top morning Hollywood Reporter InStyle 2015 good InStyle Molly McNeil 2017 good source thank you for visiting our website..."
"We hope you can come again."
"If you like what you see, you can follow us through" Google + "or" follow us through email. ". The following websites are for entertainment purposes only. "
"No infringement of copyright."
The copyright belongs to the legal film / TV network, production companies, magazines, journalists and the above sources



**Something goes wrong**
“That’s what he’s hoping for.”For more exclusive celebrity news, pick up the latest issue of In Touch, on newsstands now!”
““Because they’re not officially divorced yet, Angie’s in the driver’s seat when it comes to getting the children for the holidays, and she’s taking full advantage of that.”He misses them so much.”
“Stepping out of her chaufeured SUV onto a sidewalk in freezing midtown Manhattan, Angelina Jolie accompanied four of her six kids to a National Geographic exhibit in Times Square on Dec. 14.”
““Angelina started Christmas vacation early,” says an insider, explaining that the NYC visit was part of a holiday shopping trip.”
““The Pitt-Jolie family has always loved New York at Christmastime — the ice-skating rink in Central Park, the amazing store window displays along Fifth Avenue.”
“And she’s planning more trips with the kids in late December and early January.”Meanwhile, their dad, Brad Pitt, is doing everything he can to squeeze in some time with his brood, too.”
“Last year, he got just a few hours with his younger kids on Dec. 25, and this year he’s hoping things will be different for the holiday season and beyond.”
“(Photo Credit: Getty Images)“He’s champing at the bit to get more custody [of Maddox, 16, Pax, 14, Zahara, 12, Shiloh, 11, and twins Knox and Vivienne, 9].”
“His Christmas wish is to have equal custody,” the insider exclusively tells In Touch.”
“But at this point the divorce is still stonewalled and Angie has been talking about taking the kids away to a foreign country for Christmas It s been 15 months since their shocking split and Angie and Brad are still playing tug of war with their kids a source tells...”


"That's what he wanted." For more exclusive celebrity news, check out the latest issue of in touch at the newsstand! "
"Because they haven't officially divorced yet, Angie has the upper hand in taking care of her children for the holidays, and she makes the most of it." He missed them very much
On December 14, Angelina Jolie walked from her battered SUV to the icy sidewalk of downtown Manhattan and accompanied four of her six children to the National Geographic exhibition in Times Square
"Angelina started her Christmas holiday very early," said one person familiar with the matter, explaining that the trip to New York was part of a holiday shopping trip
"The Pitt Jolies have always loved New York at Christmas - the skating rink in Central Park, the amazing shop windows on Fifth Avenue."
"She also plans to go to more places with the children in late December and early January." Meanwhile, their father, Brad Pitt, is making every effort to squeeze in time with the children
"On December 25th last year, he had only a few hours with his children, and this year he hopes that the holidays and things will be different."
"(photo source: Getty Images)" he's fighting for more custody (16-year-old Maddox, 14-year-old parks, 12-year-old Zahara, 11-year-old Shiloh and 9-year-old twins Knox and Vivian)
"His Christmas wish is equal custody," the insider told contact exclusively
"But at this point the divorce is still Stonewall and Angie has been talking about taking their children abroad for Christmas - it's been 15 months since they were shocked to split up and Angie and Brad are still playing tug of war with their children, a source told..."



Number  149
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This year, Williams avoided a contest with Serena, who is taking a hiatus from the sport while pregnant.”
“When asked about the incident at a press conference at Wimbledon last week, the veteran player burst into tears and briefly left the room to compose herself.”
“The 37-year-old American tennis star's comeback to try and reclaim the top spot at the prestigious event follows a tumultuous month in which she was involved in a fatal car crash in Florida.”
“Muguruza, 23, won in straight sets: 7-5, 6-0.”
“"I tried my best to do the same things you do," Williams later said in a message to her pregnant younger sister Serena Williams, who was absent from play this year at the All England Club.”
“"I think there'll be other opportunities, I do."”
“Venus Williams on Centre Court at Wimbledon on Saturday.”
“Tim Ireland / APWilliams hadn't won a Wimbledon championship since 2008, when she defeated her sister.”
“She was also going for her eighth Grand Slam singles trophy overall.”
“Follow More at NBC SportsHer loss follows a difficult few weeks for the 10th-seeded American, who was involved in a car crash on June 9 near her home in Palm Beach Gardens.”


"This year, Williams avoided the game against Serena, and she suspended the sport during her pregnancy."
"When asked about it at a news conference at Wimbledon last week, the veteran burst into tears and left the room briefly to calm down."
"The 37 year old American tennis star made a comeback to try to win back the title of this famous event after a fatal car accident in Florida a month ago."
"Muguruza, 23, won two straight sets: 7-5, 6-0
"I tried my best to do the same thing as you," Williams later said in a letter to her pregnant sister, Serena Williams Selena is absent from the all England Club this year
"I think there will be other opportunities."
"Venus Williams is at the centre court at Wimbledon on Saturday
"Tim Ireland / AP Williams has never won the Wimbledon championship since beating his sister in 2008."
"She will also win her eighth Grand Slam singles trophy."
NBC sports channel pays more attention to the 10th seeded American who suffered a car accident near her home in Palm Beach Garden on June 9 and suffered a crushing defeat in the past few weeks



**Something goes wrong**
“Eniko has declined to address the allegations publicly.”
“A source says Channing Tatum and Kevin Hart and his leading lady, wife Eniko Parrish Hart , just celebrated their three-year wedding anniversary — as well as Eniko’s 35th birthday!”
“Kevin Hart and his pregnant wife Eniko have cemented their romance following allegations of a cheating scandal by celebrating their first wedding anniversary with heartfelt notes.”
“The Ride Along star posted a black and white photograph on Instagram, showing the newlyweds dancing on their Happy first anniversary to Kevin Hart and Eniko Hart !”
“The actor and comedian and his pregnant wife paid tribute to each other on Instagram Sunday with sweet messages and photos from their "Happy 1 year anniversary to this unbelievable wife of mine," Kevin wrote, alongside a photo of the two dancing.”
“© Provided by Cover MediaKevin Hart and his pregnant wife Eniko have cemented their romance following allegations of a cheating scandal by celebrating their first wedding anniversary with heartfelt notes.”
“The Ride Along star posted a black and white photograph on Instagram, showing the newlyweds dancing on their wedding day last year, and thanked her for "making me happy".”
“"Happy 1 year anniversary to this unbelievable wife of mine," he added.”
“"Thank u for all that you do.”
“Thank you for loving me & supporting me at the highest level...”


"Eniko refuses to respond publicly to these charges."
A source said that Channing Tatum and Kevin Hart, as well as his heroine and wife iniko parish Hart, had just celebrated their third wedding anniversary - and iniko's 35th birthday! "
"Kevin Hart and his pregnant wife, iniko, consolidated their relationship by sincerely celebrating their first anniversary after being accused of having an extramarital affair."
The hitchhiker posted a black-and-white photo of the newlyweds dancing on instagram as they congratulated Kevin Hart and Eniko Hart on their happy first anniversary
"The actor comedian and his pregnant wife paid homage to each other on instagram on Sunday, along with their sweet messages and photos of" happy first anniversary to my incredible wife, "as well as photos of the two dancing," kevin wrote
"() provided by cover mediakevin Hart and his pregnant wife Eniko, after being accused of fraud scandal, they sincerely celebrated their first wedding anniversary and consolidated their love."
The hitchhiker posted a black-and-white photo on instagram of the newlyweds dancing at last year's wedding and thanking her for "making me happy."
"Happy anniversary to my incredible wife," he added
"Thank you for everything."
"Thank you for loving me and supporting me at the highest level..."



Number  151
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Click here to upload yours.”
“We pay for videos too.”
“Actress Katie, 39, is said to have called off their marriage after with struggling trust issues.”
“3 Katie Holmes and Jamie Foxx have split, according to reports Credit: Getty - ContributorThe couple only went public with their relationship in September last year but were first linked back in August 2013.”
“Radar Online reports Dawson's Creek star Katie called it quits with Jamie after reports he had been dating other women during their time together.”
“A source is said to have told Radar Online: "Katie just couldn’t get over her trust issues."”
“The pair had insisted they were just good friends following Katie's divorce from Tom Cruise.”
“Two years ago, Jamie was forced to deny dating Katie when a picture emerged of the two of them holding hands in a recording studio.”
“Jamie Foxx abandons live interview when asked about girlfriend Katie Holmes 3 The pair were first linked five years ago but only went public with their romance in 2017 Credit Getty Contributor 3 Katie was said to have been banned from having a public relationship under the terms of her...”
“...divorce from Tom Cruise Credit Getty Images Getty Katie Holmes and Jamie Foxx spotted dancing together MOST READ IN CELEBRITY house tour Inside Katie Price s son Harvey s home as he lives on his own for the first time IT S ALL RITA”


"Click here to upload your."
"We also pay for video."
Katie, a 39 year old actress, is said to have cancelled their marriage because of a trust problem
Katie Holmes and Jamie fox are reported to have broken up. The couple only made their relationship public last September, but first contacted in August 2013
"Radar Online reported that Dawson's Crick star Katie said that after breaking up with Jamie, he reported that he had been dating other women for the same time."
It is said that a source told radar online: "Katie just can't overcome her trust problem."
"After Katie and Tom Cruise divorced, they insisted that they were just good friends."
"Two years ago, Jamie was forced to deny dating Katie, when there was a picture of them holding hands in the studio."
"When asked about his girlfriend Katie Holmes 3, Jamie fox gave up the live interview. They first contacted each other five years ago, but only in 2017 did they disclose their relationship. It is said that according to Katie's terms, Katie is forbidden to make her love public... "
“… Divorce from Tom Cruise - photo - Katie Holmes and Jamie fox dance together at the home of Katie Price's son Harvey - this is his first time living alone - it's all Rita "



Number  152
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Play slideshow Getty 1 of 33 Dakota Johnson puts on very busty in Florence for the Gucci CruiseGETTY Johnson plays Ana SteeleGETTY Jamie Dornan plays Christian Grey...”
““I love Jamie, I trust him and I really couldn’t tell you if I could have done this without him.”Dakota Johnson's sexiest pics Wed, May 31, 2017 Fifty Shades of Grey star Dakota Johnson in pictures.”
““It’s genuinely one of the fastest, closest friendships I’ve ever made in my life, just based on the amount of time we’ve actually known each other,” Johnson told OK!”
“The shots line up perfectly with what Dornan and Johnson each said earlier in the year, when they spoke very highly of one-another.”
“SG Dornan makes Johnson laugh on setSG The pair get on when the cameras stop rollingThe pair are also seen goofing around under an umbrella between takes on another scene - seemingly putting rumours that they despise one-another to rest.”
“In one supermarket-set scene, Johnson even has to try and control her laughter as Dornan fools around in front of her.”
“And by the looks of it - as you can see for yourself below - they really do get on like firm friends.”
“B-roll from Fifty Shades Darker - quick, candid shots from the set of the movie - show them interacting when the cameras stop rolling.”
“Does this footage reveal the truth of their working relationship?”
“You can unsubscribe at any time.”


"Slide show Getty 1's 33 Dakota Johnson in a very full Gucci tour in Florence, Getty Johnson as Anna steelgetty, Jamie Donan as Christian gray..."
"I love Jamie, I believe him, and I really can't tell you if I could have done it without him." "The sexiest picture of Johnson, Dakota, May 31, 2017, 50 shadow gray star, Dakota Johnson in the picture."
Johnson told OK: "this is really one of the fastest and closest friendships I've ever built in my life, based only on the time we really knew each other."! "
"These scenes are very consistent with what Donan and Johnson said earlier this year, when they spoke highly of each other."
"SG Dornan makes Johnson laugh on setsg. When the camera stops rotating, the two get on the car. In the interval of shooting another scene, they can also see the two playing under the umbrella - it seems that the rumors that they despise each other have been calmed down."
"In a supermarket scene, when Donan is playing around in front of her, Johnson even has to try to control her laughter."
"On the outside - as you can see with your own eyes below - they do get along well, like firm friends."
"The B-roll in the 50 shadows is darker - the fast, candid shot in the movie scene - showing their interaction when the camera stops scrolling."
"Does this video reveal the truth about their working relationship?"
"You can unsubscribe at any time."



Number  153
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“We asked Jess what's her secret to a perfect butt pic ... 'cause she would know.”
“Luckily, her hubby and a pap were there to avert disaster.”
“The singer damn near ate it when she almost fell off the sidewalk.”
“We're told the pair was inside the joint for a whopping 5 hours ... which is written all over Jessica's face.”
“Jessica was leaving Craig's Tuesday night in WeHo arm in arm with Eric Johnson, who turned 38 a few days ago.”
“Play video content TMZ.comJessica Simpson let loose at her hubby's birthday dinner, and needed some help keeping it together on the way out of the event.”


"We asked Jesse what's the secret of the perfect butt photo..." Because she'll know. "
"Fortunately, her husband and a dad were there to avoid disaster."
"The singer almost fell off the sidewalk and ate it."
"We were told they were in prison for five hours... On Jessica's face. "
"Jessica and Eric Johnson left Craig's WEHO on Tuesday night, arm in arm. Eric turned 38 a few days ago."
"I'm Jessica Simpson, who indulged at her husband's birthday party and needed some help to maintain the relationship on the way to the end of the event."



**Something goes wrong**
“...his brief stint as the national security adviser one official said...”
“It wasn t clear if Mr Flynn had offered to talk about specific aspects of his time working for Mr Trump but the fact that he was seeking immunity suggested Mr Flynn feels he may be in legal jeopardy following...”
““General Flynn certainly has a story to tell, and he very much wants to tell it, should the circumstances permit,” Mr. Kelner said.”
“Mr. Flynn’s attorney, Robert Kelner, wouldn’t comment on details of his discussions involving Mr. Flynn, but noted he is a decorated Army veteran with a lifetime of public service.”
“He has made the offer to the FBI and the House and Senate intelligence committees through his lawyer but has so far found no takers, the officials said.”
“...was directly involved in discussions about the possible lifting of sanctions on Russia imposed by the Obama administration...”
“As an adviser to Mr Trump s presidential campaign and later one of Mr Trump s top aides in the White House Mr Flynn was privy to some of the most sensitive foreign policy deliberations of the new administration and...”
“...a grant of immunity from prosecution according to officials with knowledge of the matter...”
“WASHINGTON Mike Flynn President Donald Trump s former national security adviser has told the Federal Bureau of Investigation and congressional officials investigating the Trump campaign s potential ties to Russia that he is willing to be interviewed in exchange for...”


“… His short career as a national security adviser, an official said
"It is not clear whether Flynn has ever offered to talk about specific aspects of his work for trump, but the fact that he seeks immunity shows that Flynn believes that he may face legal risks in the following circumstances..."
"General Flynn certainly has a story to tell, and he would love to, if circumstances permit," Mr. Kellner said
"Robert KELNER, Flynn's lawyer, declined to comment on the details of his discussions with Flynn, but pointed out that Flynn was a decorated veteran who had been in public service for life."
"He has made the proposal to the FBI and house and Senate intelligence committees through lawyers, but so far has not found any recipients," the officials said
“…… Directly participated in the discussion about the possible lifting of sanctions against Russia by the Obama administration.... "
"As an adviser to trump's presidential campaign and later one of Trump's senior aides in the White House, Flynn was very well informed of some of the most sensitive foreign policy deliberations of the new administration, and..."
“…… According to the informed officials, immunity from prosecution is granted... "
"The former national security adviser to President Donald Trump of Washington, Mike Flynn, told the FBI and congressional officials investigating the potential ties between Trump's camp and Russia that he was willing to be interviewed in exchange for..."



Number  155
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We were very, very fortunate to have that sort of longevity on a series…I've ticked this box, and I feel very proud of the work I've done there, and now it's time to work with [Harry] as a team."”
“However, Gossip Cop has learned that there is no truth to such report.”
“According to New Idea, the "Suits" star is struggling to adapt to the royal life that awaits her.”
“In fact, a so-called source claims that Prince Harry's fiancée is no longer happy.”
“"She is not happy and is finding things very tough at the moment," the insider said.”
“Markle was reportedly confined in the palace.”
“The "Horrible Bosses" star could not attend gym classes or jog around the Hyde Park.”
“The only thing she can do is visit Kate Middleton.”
“Unfortunately, the Duchess of Cambridge could not give the actress her full attention as she was also busy with Prince George, Princess Charlotte, and her pregnancy.”
“The so-called insider added that Markle's "frustrations are simmering beneath the surface."”


"We are very, very lucky to have such a long life experience in a series I checked this box and I'm very proud of what I've done there. Now it's time to work with [Harry]. "
"However, the gossip police already know that there is no truth in such reports."
"According to the new idea, the suit star is trying to adapt to the royal life waiting for her."
"In fact, a so-called source claims that Prince Harry's fiancee is no longer happy."
"She's not happy, she feels it's hard at the moment," the person familiar with the matter said
"Markel is reported to be in the palace."
The "terrible boss" star can't attend PE classes or jog in Hyde Park
"The only thing she can do is visit Kate Middleton."
"Unfortunately, the Duchess of Cambridge can't give the actress enough attention because she is also busy with Prince George, Princess Charlotte and her pregnancy."
The so-called insider added that markel's "frustration is brewing under the surface."



Number  156
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“— George Takei (@GeorgeTakei) July 25, 2017Lena Dunham, Margaret Cho, and Jaime King tweeted the same message encouraging voters to inundate their senators with support for ACA and Planned Parenthood, which faces defunding if the proposed bill passes.”
“Burns would fit in most excellently with this senate.”Mr. Burns would fit in most excellently with this senate.”
“My waiter just brought me soup with a fly in it but then gave a rousing speech about how flies shouldn't be in soup.”
“McCain deplored overly partisan politics and said he “will not vote for the bill as it is today” despite having just voted to allow debate on the bill.”
“Eat my filthy ass https://t.co/LteWFFDANU — The Blob (1988) Delaney (@robdelaney) July 25, 2017Seth Meyers went the subtle route and referred to McCain’s speech after his vote.”
“— Josh Gad (@joshgad) July 25, 2017Rob Delaney kept it short and (not very) sweet.”
“This wasn't a tricky decision Senator.”
“You are being treated w/ protected government health insurance.”
“U are a "maverick."”
“You have cancer.”


"- George Takei (@ George Takei) Lena Dunham, Margaret CHO and Jaime King tweeted the same message on July 25, 20177, encouraging voters to instill support for ACA and family planning in their senators. If the proposed bill is passed, it will face the problem of eliminating funding."
"Mr burns will be a perfect fit for this Senate." Mr burns will be a perfect fit for the Senate
"My waiter just brought me soup. There was a fly in the soup, but then he made an inspiring speech about why the fly shouldn't be in the soup."
He denounced partisan politics and said he "will not vote for the bill as he does today," even though he has just voted to debate it
"Eat my ass https://t.co/LteWFFDANU-Blob (1988) Delaney (@ robdelaney) July 25, 20177 Seth Meyers took a subtle route, referring to the speech of John McCain after the vote. "
"- Josh GAD (@ joshgad) July 25, 2017 rob Delaney keep it short (not too) sweet."
"It's not a tough decision, Senator."
"You're being treated with government health insurance."
"You're a maverick."
"You have cancer."



Number  157
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It was intended to be part of an effort to relaunch Universal’s iconic movie monsters, but those plans had to be reworked after the first film in that proposed cinematic universe, 2017’s “The Mummy,” bombed at the box office.”
“Depp’s other forthcoming big-budget movie, “The Invisible Man,” appears to be stuck in development limbo.”
““His baggage is a huge concern,” said Jeff Bock, a box office analyst with Exhibitor Relations.”
“Studios want Depp to share a few choice on-set memories, not expose him to a grilling about his stormy personal life.”
“And his legal battle with his former business managers has laid bare embarrassing spending details and, worse yet, exposed him as an actor in desperate need of paycheck roles to fund a lifestyle he can no longer afford.”
““Based on our understanding of the circumstances, the filmmakers and I are not only comfortable sticking with our original casting but genuinely happy to have Johnny playing a major character in the movies,” Rowling said in a statement.”
“The backlash to those allegations has been so intense that J.K. Rowling felt moved to defend casting the actor in “Fantastic Beasts” nearly a year before the film even hit theaters.”
“He is out of step with the #MeToo and Time’s Up movements after being accused by ex-wife Amber Heard of domestic assault.”
“The truth is that even before the Rolling Stone article hit stands, Depp has been widely viewed as a liability.”
“...for Depp did not immediately respond to a request for comment...”


"This was originally part of an effort to re launch Universal Pictures' iconic film monster, but these plans had to be re worked out after the box office of mummy, the first film in the proposed movie world, plummeted in 2017."
Depp's next big budget movie, invisible man, seems to be in a dilemma
"His luggage is a huge concern," said Jeff Bok, a box office analyst with exhibitor relations
"The producers want Depp to share some choices in the set's memory, rather than expose him to a torture about his stormy personal life."
"His legal battle with a former business manager revealed embarrassing details of spending, and worse still, he revealed that he was an actor who was in urgent need of a paid role to finance a lifestyle he could no longer afford."
"Based on our understanding of the situation at the time, the filmmaker and I are not only satisfied with sticking to our original cast, but also sincerely happy that Johnny plays an important role in the film," Rowling said in a statement
"The strong reaction to these charges made J.K. Rowling feel that nearly a year before the film was released, he defended his role in monster."
"After being accused of domestic violence by his ex-wife amber, he was at odds with the actions of meto'o and time."
"The fact is that Depp was widely seen as a burden even before the rolling stone article hit the shelves."
“…… Because Depp didn't immediately respond to a request for comment... "



Number  158
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Before dating Agdal, DiCaprio split with another blonde, Sports Illustrated babe Kelly Rohrbach, and has been linked to a litany of leggy catwalkers like Gisele Bündchen, Bar Refaeli, Erin Heatherton and Toni Garrn.”
“They were later seen around the globe at various hot spots, but the pair never officially confirmed they were a couple.”
“DiCaprio and Agdal were first spotted together in May 2016 at a club, then in June on a weekend getaway in Montauk.”
“Witnesses said that PDA was “minimal.”But Agdal doesn’t seem too broken up about the split, posting a provocative bikini shot on Wednesday with the caption, “Rooftop season ready.”Meanwhile, DiCaprio, 42, was seen Saturday in Malibu with friends.”
“But last Tuesday, the couple was seen at West Hollywood sushi restaurant Itacho, sources tell Page Six, where it seemed that the thrill was gone.”
“A source added that the relationship “ran its course.”They were together in late March for her 25th birthday on a yacht in St. Bart’s with pals, including Orlando Bloom.”
““They split up early this week and they remain friends,” said a pal close to the couple.”
“But the breakup is amicable.”
“Sources tell Page Six that the Oscar winner and Victoria’s Secret model broke up earlier this week, after dating for nearly a year.”
“Click to email this to a friend (Opens in new window)Click to share on Twitter (Opens in new window)Click to share on Facebook (Opens in new window)Leonardo DiCaprio and blond model Nina Agdal have called it quits.”


"Prior to his date with Agdal, DiCaprio broke up with another blonde Sports Illustrated babe Kelly robach and was associated with a series of long legged shows such as Giselle bonchen, bar Rafael, Irene HEATHERTON and Tony Ghan."
"They were later seen in hot spots around the world, but the two never officially confirmed that they were a couple."
"DiCaprio and Agdal were first found together at a club in May 2016 and then on a weekend holiday in montoc in June."
Witnesses said the PDA was "the smallest.". But Agdal didn't seem to be too divided, posting a provocative bikini shot on Wednesday with the title, "roof season ready." Meanwhile, DiCaprio, 42, saw Saturday in Malibu with friends
"But last Tuesday, the couple was seen at itacho, a sushi restaurant in West Hollywood, where people don't seem to be excited," the source told page 6
A source added that the relationship between the two was "logical" and that at the end of March, on her 25th birthday, they were on a yacht in St. Bart with friends, including Orlando Bloom
"They broke up very early this week and they are still friends," said a close friend
"But breaking up is friendly."
"The source told page 6 that the Oscar winner and Victoria's Secret model broke up earlier this week after dating for nearly a year."
"Click send this email to a friend (open in a new window) Click share on twitter (open in a new window) Click share on Facebook (open in a new window) Leonardo DiCaprio and blonde model Nina Agdal announced their exit."



Number  159
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Over the years, the actor has become known on social media for his stinging rebukes of politicians and as a frequent critic of President Donald Trump.”
“This is great news!”
“"Star Trek" star George Takei sent Twitter into a frenzy Saturday after retweeting a “bombshell” announcement: He’s running for Congress in 2018 to unseat embattled California representative and House Intelligence Committe Chairman Devin Nunes.”
““Well, the cat's out of the bag it seems,” he posted on Twitter with the hashtag #Takei2018.”
“Well, the cat's out of the bag it seems.”
“Let's do this!”
“#Takei2018 https://t.co/Wf7qvV1eXj — George Takei (@GeorgeTakei) April 1, 2017While some fans debated the suspicious timing of the tweet — if it’s midnight on the East Coast, does it count as April Fool's Day on the West Coast?”
“— social media exploded with the news.”
“The hashtag #Takei2018 began trending, and the actor's timeline was flooded with congratulations — some from other celebrities and politicians.”
“@GeorgeTakei I hope you can count me as one of your early endorsers!!”


"Over the years, the actor has been known on social media for his scathing criticism of politicians and frequent criticism of President Donald Trump."
"That's good news!"
Star Trek star George Takei tweeted Saturday after forwarding a "blockbuster" statement that he would run for Congress in 2018 to replace embattled California congressman Devon Nunez, chairman of the House Intelligence Committee
He tweeted a post labeled "takei2018": "well, it looks like this cat is out."
"Well, it looks like the cat is out."
"Come on!"
"Take I 2018 https://t.co/Wf7qvV1eXj-George  Takei (@ georgetakei) on April 1, 2017, when some fans debated the suspicious release time of this microblog - if it's midnight on the east coast, is it April Fool's day on the west coast
"- social media broke the news."
"The label Takei 2018 has become popular, and the actors' schedules are filled with congratulations - some from other celebrities and politicians."
"@ George Takei, I hope you can count me as one of your early spokesmen!"



Number  160
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“— Lauren CoxFollow @Iaurencox...”
““She absolutely wants full custody,” a source close to Beyonce told the magazine.”
“Beyonce, 34, is not going down without a fight in her alleged divorce from Jay Z, 45.”
“As the shocking claims about their split get worse and worse, Blue Ivy, 3, seems to be their next battle royale.”
“Will their little girl become the center of a tug of war event?”
“To hear more about Beyonce and Jay Z, head over to iTunes and download the latest HollywoodLife podcast for free!”
“Even though everyone at HollywoodLife.com is in a Jayonce prayer circle hoping that InTouchWeekly‘s Sept. 21 issue reporting their marriage is over is just a cruel joke, things seem to be getting serious.”
“The latest report reveals that it’s Beyonce who would not only want, but desperately fight to get full custody of their daughter, Blue Ivy.”
““Although she’s prepared to offer Jay visitation.” Ouch.”
“Comment below with your thoughts.”


“-Lauren  CoxFollow@Iaurencox …”
"She absolutely wants full custody," a source close to Beyonce told the magazine
"Beyonce, 34, won't stop fighting because she divorced jay z, 45."
"With the shocking talk of their breakup getting worse, the three-year-old blue Ivy seems to be their next Royal battle."
"Will their little daughter be the center of the tug of war?"
"To learn more about Beyonce and Jay, please download the latest Hollywood Life podcast for free from iTunes!"
"Although everyone is in jayonce's Prayer circle, she hopes that the September 21 issue of into touch weekly reports that their marriage is over is just a cruel joke. It seems that things are getting more and more serious."
"The latest report shows that Beyonce not only wants, but desperately strives for, full custody of her daughter, Ivy LAN."
"Even though she was going to visit Jay." Ouch
"Comment below with your thoughts."



Number  161
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
““Setting down roots is something she’s thought long and hard about.”
“Gossip Cop reports that an insider close to Swift confirmed she is not house-searching in England at all—especially as she's about to set off on her Reputation world tour this spring.”
“Original, 4/5, 5:35 p.m.: Taylor Swift, the pop star and very secretive girlfriend of British actor Joe Alwyn, is ready to commit!”
“To England full-time, that is.”
“The Sun's Dan Wootton—the guy who broke the news the two were secretly dating last May—reports that Swift is looking for a North London house to make her home base.”
“Alwyn and his family live in North London's Crouch End; Swift would like to be near that and the countryside near Soho Farmhouse in Oxfordshire, outside of the city.”
“(Soho Farmhouse, by the way, is where Meghan Markle had her swanky bridal shower.)”
““Taylor loves the UK and how she can live a relatively normal life without being disturbed," the source said.”
“The Sun previously reported that Swift went undetected in disguises around the city.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"Taking root is something she has been thinking about for a long time."
"Gossip police reported that an insider close to swift confirmed that she was not looking for a house in the UK at all, especially when she was about to start her world tour this spring."
"Original, 4:5 p.m., 5:35 p.m.: Taylor Swift, pop star, secret girlfriend of British actor Joe Alvin, ready!"
"It was a full-time trip to England."
Dan Wootton of the Sun reported last May that Swift was looking for a house in North London as her base
"Alvin and his family live in crouch, north of London; swift wants to be close to the countryside there and near SOHO farmhouse in Oxfordshire, outside the city."
(by the way, SOHO farmhouse is the place for Megan markel's luxurious wedding.)
"Taylor loves Britain and how she can lead a relatively normal life without being disturbed," the source said
The sun had previously reported that swift had absconded in disguise in the city without being found



Number  162
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“No wonder she can’t wait to slip on a sexy mini-dress to celebrate Tristan’s Father’s Day and tempt him with how hot she’s looking post baby.”
“Khloe recently revealed that she’s already back down to a size 4 jeans and has her washboard abs again thanks to working out during her pregnancy and grueling post baby gym sessions.”
“But she’s going to go all out for Father’s Day and plans to be looking super fine for her man,” our source adds.”
“She hasn’t been doing a lot of glam lately because she’s so busy being a mom.”
“She knows exactly what he likes and she’s finally feeling really sexy again.”
““The biggest reward will come after True is sleeping though because Khloe’s planning to blow his mind in the bedroom.”
“Khloe, 33, is a wiz in the kitchen so no doubt he’ll be well taken care of.”
“Khloe is dieting pretty hard herself but that isn’t going to stop her from cooking up all of Tristan’s favorite things and feeding him like a King,” our insider continues.”
““She has never wanted anything more than to be a mom and Tristan helped make that possible, so although they do still have certain issues to work out, she won’t let his mistakes ruin this special day.”
“Whatever has happened between them has nothing to do with her love and gratitude to him for giving her True,” a Kardashian insider tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”


"No wonder she can't wait to wear a sexy miniskirt to celebrate Tristan's father's day and tempt him with how sexy she looks."
"Khloe recently revealed that she has returned to the size 4 jeans and has her washboard ABS again, thanks to her work during pregnancy and hard post baby gym sessions."
"But she will go all out for father's day and plan to find super good men for her," our source added
"She's not very popular recently because she's busy being a mother."
"She knows what he likes, and she finally feels sexy again."
"But the biggest reward is sleep, because Chloe is going to go crazy in the bedroom."
"Khloe, 33, is a good cook, so there's no doubt he'll be taken good care of."
"Chloe is trying to diet herself, but that doesn't stop her from cooking all Tristan's favorite things and feeding him like a king," our insider continued
"What she wanted most was to be a mother, and Tristan helped her to do it, so although they still have some problems to solve, she won't let his mistakes ruin this special day."
"Whatever happens between them has nothing to do with her love and gratitude for the truth he has given her," an insider of Kardashian told reporters Exclusive to Hollywood life



Number  163
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Unfortunately, this agreement appears to have wreaked havoc on Suri’s relationship with her father, as the two are rarely seen together.”
“...the Church of Scientology...”
“In Going Clear Scientology and the Prison of Belief Alex Gibney s 2015 documentary Marty Rathbun a former high ranking Scientologist confesses that he was assigned to sabotage Cruise s second marriage I was to facilitate the breakup with Nicole Kidman According to the film Scientology head David Miscavige a...”
“One of the main celebrity faces of Scientology, Cruise appeared to have, at some point, handed over the reins of his personal life to the church.”
“Long before Holmes and Cruise started dating, the leading man had a reputation for strange behavior—the alleged result of his close relationship with the Church of Scientology.”
“That’s because Foxx and Holmes’ intense secrecy is rumored to be a condition of Holmes’ 2012 divorce from Tom Cruise, which was itself the ending of one of the most widely discussed and analyzed marriages in celebrity history.”
“While any secret celebrity dating scenario is fodder for a People cover or a clickbait headline, JamKat is a particularly elusive and fascinating pairing.”
“Anonymous sources insisted on Jamie and Katie’s relationship status and tabloids, sensing a story even bigger and more factually accurate than Jennifer Aniston’s phantom pregnancy, never gave up.”
“He’s never told me he’s dating her.”Still, as months and years passed, rumors of this celebrity coupling persisted.”
“...telling ET that I have no knowledge of Jamie with Katie at all adding I ve never seen them together...”


"Unfortunately, this agreement seems to have seriously damaged Suri's relationship with her father, because they are rarely together."
Church of Scientology
"In innocent Scientology and the prison of faith, in Alex Gibney's 2015 documentary Marty Rathbun, a former high Scientology official admitted that he was assigned to destroy Cruise's second marriage in order to facilitate my marriage with Nicole Kidman Kidman, according to David Miscavige a, director of the film Scientology
"As one of Scientology's leading celebrities, cruise seems to have given his private life to the church to some extent."
Long before Holmes and cruise started dating, the hero was known for his strange behavior, which is said to be the result of his close relationship with the Church of Scientology
"This is because it is said that the high confidentiality of Fox and Holmes is a condition for Holmes' divorce from Tom Cruise in 2012, and the divorce itself is the end of one of the most discussed and analyzed marriages in celebrity history."
"While any secret celebrity dating scene is the material for a person's cover or a click on a bait headline, jamkat is a particularly elusive and fascinating combination."
"Anonymous sources insist on Jamie and Katie's relationship and tabloids, feel a bigger and more real story than Jennifer Aniston's ghost pregnancy, and never give up."
"He never told me he was dating her." However, months and years later, rumors about the celebrity couple still exist
“… Tell et that I didn't know Jamie and Katie were together, and that I've never seen them together... "



Number  164
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Meanwhile, Clooney also has been dealing with invasive paparazzi trying to get photos of the babies.”
“You have to have some sort of empathy."”
“Alexander was born one minute and 49 seconds before Ella; Clooney reveals to THR (the first media outlet to see the babies up close) that Alexander weighed five and a half pounds, while Ella was four and a half pounds.”
“The couple welcomed a boy and a girl, named Alexander and Ella, on June 6, a month premature, at St. Mary's Hospital, the same hospital where Prince William and Kate Middleton's children were born.”
“We just sat there, staring at that piece of paper they give you, and I kept thinking there was a mistake."”
“And I was like, 'What?'”
“And then he goes, 'And there's the second one.'”
“And I said, 'Great.'”
“"He goes, 'Well, there's one.'”
“Amal became pregnant in 2016, and Clooney was with her in London when they went to the doctor for an ultrasound.”


"Meanwhile, Clooney has been dealing with the invading paparazzi, trying to take pictures of the babies."
"You have to be compassionate."
"Alexander was born one minute and 49 seconds earlier than Ella; Clooney told thr that Alexander weighed 5.5 pounds and Ella 4.5 pounds."
On June 6, the couple welcomed a boy and a girl named Alexander and Ella at St. Mary's Hospital, where Prince William and Kate Middleton's children were born
"We just sit there and stare at the paper they gave you. I've been thinking there's a mistake."
"I just thought," what? "
"And then he said," there's a second one. "
"I said," great. "
"He said," well, there's one. "
"Amar got pregnant in 2016, and when they went to the doctor for an ultrasound, Clooney and her were in London."



Number  165
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“If you recall, Younes was invited to the Kardashian/Jenner holiday party in December, and that was a huge deal!”
“After all, her family certainly has.”
“We’ve got EXCLUSIVE details on why he thinks it’s a bad look as a ‘mother.’Kourtney Kardashian, 38, and Younes Bendjima, 24, are too hot to handle.”
“The couple stirred social media into a frenzy on March 30 when Kourt posted a pic of herself straddling Younes in front of a mirror.”
“She captioned the photo, “#mycalvins,” and we are so here for it!”
“However, her baby daddy Scott Disick, 34, feels the exact opposite.”
““Scott is furious over Kourtney’s pic with Younes.”
“He thinks it is classless for the mother of his kids (Mason, Penelope, and Reign Disick) to be hanging on a guy as young as Younes.”
“Scott can’t stand that Kourt is flaunting PDA online, so he is going to do something about it,” a source close to Scott tells HollywoodLife EXCLUSIVELY.”
“Uh-oh!”


"If you remember, yones was invited to Kardashian / Jenner's holiday party last December. It was a huge deal!"
"After all, her family must have."
"We gave an exclusive account of why he thought it was a bad image of a mother. Courtney Kardashian, 38, and Eunice bengima, 24, are too sexy to cope with
"On March 30, when Kurt posted a picture of himself riding on younes in front of the mirror, the couple set off an upsurge on social media."
"She added a title to the photo," mycalvins. "We're here for it!"
"However, her 34 year old father, Scott Disick, felt the opposite."
"Scott was angry with Courtney and yones for their photo."
"He thinks there's no class for his child's mother (Mason, Penelope and RAF Disick) with a young man like you."
"Scott can't stand Kurt flaunting his PDA online, so he's going to do something," a source close to Scott told the Hollywood exclusive
"Oh



Number  166
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She can’t make decisions for him.””
“He enjoyed her company but was not looking for anything permanent now.”Of course, Garner, 46, isn’t happy Affleck is dating a woman who is young enough to be their daughter, another source said.”
“What she ultimately cares about is his sobriety and whether she can rely on him to co parent Similarly Us Weekly reported that Garner realized long ago that she can t change Affleck even though she has tried to be a pillar of support as he struggles to recover from...”
““But her concern right now is not who he is dating.”
“Certainly not,” another source says in the new issue.”
““Is she happy about him hanging out with a very young Playboy model?”
“Sign up for our Coffee Break newsletter here.”
“Get more celebrity news and photos delivered to your inbox for free on weekdays.”
““Lindsay was more serious about him.”
“She’s not going to get involved.”


"She can't make a decision for him."
Another source said Ghana, 46, was certainly unhappy that Affleck was dating a woman young enough to be a daughter
"What she ultimately cares about is Alfred's lucidity and whether she can rely on him to become a co parent. Similar US weekly reports that Ghana realized a long time ago that she couldn't change Alfred, despite Alfred's efforts from She has been trying to be a pillar of support for him throughout her recovery
"But she's not concerned about who he's dating right now."
"Of course not," another source said in the new issue
"He's with a very young Playboy model. Is she happy?"
"Register for our coffee break newsletters here."
"Let more celebrity news and photos be sent to your inboxes for free on weekdays."
"Lindsay took him more seriously."
"She won't step in."



Number  167
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It sounds like they’re both on the same page and want to spend their future together, so Tristan should just bite the bullet already and pop the question!”
“No one wants to be just another random baby mama!”
“So, you can see why she wants to lock him down officially before the baby comes.”
““He is a father, and I know for a fact that he would be an impeccable father.” Tristan’s ex-girlfriend Jordan Craig gave birth to his child in December 2016, after he and Khloé started dating.”
“We’ve talked about it,” she admitted.”
““I would love to have a family.”
“...to get pregnant or was already...”
“...she enthusiastically said Yes I would She also gushed about him saying she had never been in this kind of love before Furthermore she hinted about having kids which in hindsight should have tipped us off that she was about...”
“Khloé hasn t been shy about wanting to marry Tristan even as far back as April which is when she is reported to have conceived the baby When asked if she would accept a proposal from Tristan in ES magazine...”
“Tristan better hurry up!”


"It sounds like the two of them are on the same page and want to spend their future together, so Tristan should grit his teeth and ask questions!"
"No one wants to be a casual mom!"
"So you can see why she's officially locking up the baby before it's born."
"He's a father, and I know he'll be an impeccable father." Tristan's ex girlfriend, Jordan Craig, gave birth to his baby in December 2016 when he and heroy started dating
"We've talked about that already," she admitted
"I really want to have a family."
“… Pregnant or already... "
“…… She said enthusiastically, "yes, I will. She also kept on saying that he said that she had never had such love before, and that she hinted that she had children. In hindsight, this should let us know that she is..."
"Khlo é began to want to marry Tristan shyly as early as April. At that time, it was reported that she was pregnant with a child. At that time, someone asked her if she would accept Tristan's proposal in ES magazine..."
"Tristan better hurry up!"



Number  168
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...depending on the circumstances surrounding this condition it may result in a reduction of the time they spend with Jolie and may result in the Court ordering primary physical custody to Pitt Mirror Online has contacted reps of the pair for comment...”
“Video Loading Video Unavailable Click to play Tap to play The video will auto play soon 8 Cancel Play now Warning Angelina that she was risking her position as the primary caregiver the judge is said to have warned If the minor children remain closed down to their father and...”
“A schedule has been put in place, claims People, to allow Brad sufficient access over the summer.”
“(Image: Getty Images North America)(Image: FameFlynet UK Tel : +44 (0)20 3551 5049 Email : info@fameflynet.uk.com)Angelina must reportedly also give Brad the mobile phone number of each child and allow him to call whenever he wants without snooping in on their calls or texts.”
“...say according to the website...”
“Furthermore she has apparently been told to help repair the relationship and speak with the children and their doctors to assure them they are safe with their father It is critical that each of the six children have a healthy and strong relationship with their father and mother the documents...”
“In court documents obtained by People, a judge reportedly tells Angelina that limiting the time Brad gets to spend with Maddox, 16, Pax, 14, Zahara, 13, Shiloh, 12, and nine-year-old twins Knox and Vivienne is 'harmful' to the kids.”
“...doesn t allow ex husband Brad Pitt access according to reports...”
“Get a daily dose of showbiz gossip straight to your inbox with our free email newsletter Sign up Thank you for subscribing We have more newsletters Show me See our privacy notice Invalid Email A court has warned Angelina Jolie that she could lose custody of the kids if she...”


“… Depending on the circumstances, this may reduce their time with Julie and may lead to a court order to give primary custody to Pitt mirror online, whose representatives have been contacted for advice... "
"Video loading video not available Click to play Click to play video will play automatically soon 8 cancel now warning Angelina that she is risking being the primary caregiver it is said that the judge has warned if minor children are still closed to their father and
"People claim that there is a schedule in place for Brad to have enough time to get in during the summer."
"(picture: Getty Images North America) (picture: fameflynet UK Tel. + 44 (0) 20 3551 5049 email: info@fameflynet.uk.com ）According to reports, Angelina also has to give Brad each child's mobile phone number so that he can call at any time without having to spy on their phone calls or text messages. "
“… According to the website
"In addition, she was clearly told to help repair the relationship and talk to the children and their doctors to make sure they were safe with their father. It is essential that each of the six children maintain a healthy and strong relationship with their father and mother... "
"According to reports, in court documents available to people, a judge told Angelina that restricting Brad's time with 16-year-old Maddox, 14-year-old parks, 13-year-old Zahara, 12-year-old Shiloh and 9-year-old twins Knox and Vivian is' harmful 'to the children."
“… It is reported that Brad Pitt, the ex husband, is not allowed to enter... "
"Through our free e-mail newsletter, we get gossip from the entertainment industry every day. Thank you for signing up. We have more newsletters that let me see our invalid privacy statement. The court warned Angelina Jolie if she She may lose custody of her children. "



Number  169
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Photo credit: Getty Images...”
“But according to sources, her recent spree is less about the money and more about having separate residences as she and Portia inch closer toward officially separating.”
“Photo credit: Getty Images/InStarThe National ENQUIRER has learned Ellen left In a bombshell world exclusive,has learned Ellen left the couple’s love nest and has agreed to an off-listing sale of the marital estate they bought together just eight months ago!”
“Photo credit: Mega“It’s all very shady and ominous.”
“Ellen went to great lengths to keep the news from their close friends to avoid being asked questions,” an insider claimed.”
““She and Portia were fighting more and more.”
“Eventually, what normally would have been a routine back-and-forth turned nasty .” Photo credit: MegaEllen has publicly insisted the couple’s marriage is on solid ground.”
“But sources have exclusively told The ENQUIRER the pair have been spending nights alone, and now they appear to be living completely apart.”
“Photo credit: MegaProperty records show Ellen and Portia — who will be married for ten years on Aug. 16 — maintained two separate residences on the six-acre equestrian estate in exclusive Montecito, Calif., which recently sold for $11 million.”
“Photo credit: FilesIn yet another clue to their marital woes , just weeks after they paid $7.2 million for the sprawling property last September, Ellen quietly snapped up a place of her own nine miles away in Carpinteria!”


"Photo source: Getty pictures..."
"But according to the source, as she and Portia are getting closer to their formal separation, her recent revelry is no longer about money, but about having an independent home."
Photo source: Getty Images / instar the national inquirer learns that Ellen has left a sensational exclusive news, learns that Ellen has left the couple's love nest, and agrees to sell the married property they bought together eight months ago! "
"Photo source: Mega" it's all very dark and ominous
"Allen spared no effort to hide the information from their close friends to avoid being asked questions," a person familiar with the matter said
"She's playing more and more with Portia."
"In the end, things that used to be routine became very bad." Photo source: megalon said publicly that the couple's marriage was based on a solid foundation
"But a source told the inquirer exclusively that the two had spent the night alone, and now they seem to live completely separate."
Photo source: megaproperty records show that Ellen and Portia, who will be married for 10 years on August 16, own two homes at the six acre Equestrian Estate in Montecito, California, recently sold for $11 million
Photo source: film is another clue to their unhappy marriage. Just a few weeks after they spent $7.2 million on this chaotic property in September last year, Allen quietly snapped up a house of his own in cabentia, nine miles away



**Something goes wrong**
“Scroll down to see the complete timeline of Jenner and Scott’s relationship.”
“Even during their time apart, the Kylie Cosmetics founder and Grammy nominee remained close and were committed to working together to raise their daughter.”
“Kylie Jenner and Travis Scott have had their fair share of ups and downs throughout their relationship, but they always seem to find their way back to each other.”
“The Keeping Up With the Kardashians star and the rapper went public with their romance at Coachella in April 2017, just weeks after she split from her boyfriend of four years, Tyga.”
“The pair welcomed their daughter, Stormi, in February 2018.”
“After more than two years together, Us Weekly confirmed that the couple was taking a break from their romance.”
““Kylie and Travis have been on and off at various times throughout their relationship,” a source explained in October 2019, shortly after news broke of their split.”
““Kylie still loves Travis and this isn’t considered a full breakup to either of them.”A second insider told Us at the time that the pair had never had a “traditional relationship” but were “very much in love” before deciding to take a break.”
“The couple made such a great team that even their close friends were rallying for them to reconcile and could see them getting back together at some point in the future Jenner gushed over the strong coparenting relationship she had with the Butterfly Effect rapper during an interview with Harper...”
“Entertainment Tonight reported that the reality TV personality and her former flame had been seeing each other for about a month, while a source told In Touch that they were taking things slow due to Jenner’s trust issues.”


"Scroll down to see the full timeline of Jenner Scott relationship."
Even during their separation, the founder of Kelly cosmetics and the Grammy nominees remained close and committed to raising their daughter together
"Kelly Jenner and Travis Scott have gone through quite a lot of ups and downs in their relationship, but they always seem to find each other's home."
"Kardashian and rapper follow Kardashian disclosed their love affair in cochella in April 2017, just a few weeks after she broke up with her boyfriend TEGA of four years."
"The two met their daughter, Tommy, in February 2018."
"After more than two years together, US weekly confirmed that the couple are coming out of romance."
In October 2019, a source explained shortly after the news that Kelly and Travis broke up: "Kelly and Travis are on and off in their relationship."
"Kelly is still in love with Travis, which is not a complete break-up for both of them." A second person familiar with the matter told us at the time that they had never had a "traditional relationship", but they were "very in love" before they decided to break up
"The couple have formed such a great team that even their close friends are uniting for their reconciliation and can see them reunite at some time in the future. Jenna talks endlessly about her strong co parenting relationship with the butterfly effect singer in an interview with Harper."
Entertainment Tonight reported that the reality star and her ex lover had known each other for about a month, while a source in contact magazine said they were slow to make progress because of Jenna's trust



Number  171
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Pitt and Jolie are parents to Maddox, 16, Pax, 14, Zahara, 13, Shiloh, 11, and Vivienne and Knox, 9.”
“It hasn’t been easy but they are both committed to resolving it privately,” the source said.”
“A tabloid claimed that the “Ocean’s Eleven” actor was spotted hovering near the actress because he wanted to have a conversation with her.”
“When Robbie was finally free to talk, Pitt grabbed the chance and made sure that they could be together for hours.”
“The tabloid even claimed that Pitt is smitten over the actress.”
“However, rumor debunking site Gossip Cop recently clarified that Pitt did not hover around Robbie until they could talk at the party.”
“The actor did not also actively pursue the “I, Tonya” star.”
“The link between Pitt and Robbie started after it was revealed that the latter is in talks to star in Quentin Tarantino’s upcoming movie, “Once Upon A Time in Hollywood.” The film also stars Pitt and Leonardo DiCaprio.”
“Meanwhile, the same tabloid also falsely claimed that Pitt and Jennifer Aniston have gotten back together recently.”
“Aniston announced her split from Justin Theroux on Feb. 15, but the estranged couple have not been together since the end of last year.”


Peter and Julie are the parents of 16-year-old Maddox, 14-year-old parks, 13-year-old Zahara, 11 year old Shiloh, 9-year-old Vivian and Knox
"It's not easy, but they are all committed to solving it privately," the source said
According to a tabloid, the "ocean 11" actor was found wandering around the actress because he wanted to talk to her
"When Robbie finally had time to talk, Pete seized the opportunity to make sure they were together for a few hours."
"The tabloid even claimed that Pete was fascinated by the actress."
"However, gossip police recently clarified that Pete didn't linger around Robbie until they could talk at the party."
"The actors did not actively pursue the star of" I, Tongya. "
"The connection between Pete and Robbie began when it was revealed that Robbie was negotiating with the leading actor in Quentin Tarantino's upcoming film" once at a time in Hollywood. ". The film also stars Peter and Leonardo DiCaprio. "
Meanwhile, the same tabloid lied that Pete and Jennifer Aniston had recently reunited
Aniston broke up with Justin Cyrus on February 15, but the estranged couple haven't been together since the end of last year



Number  172
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“At first Timberlake was flippant about Nipplegate telling Access Hollywood that We love giving you all something to talk about But he changed his tune shortly after that saying I m sorry if anyone was offended Jackson meanwhile issued both written and taped statements absolving MTV CBS and the NFL”
“Advertiser McDonald’s called the incident “inappropriate” — but did not drop Timberlake as its “I’m lovin’ it” spokesman.”
“You could practically feel the heat as the two gyrated against each other onstage.”
“Jackson was in the early throes of a romance with producer Jermaine Dupri, but “everyone — including [her mother] Katherine knew the chemistry was there,” a Jackson insider said.”
“Jackson took the stage with a marching band for her 1989 hit “Rhythm Nation,” then was joined by Timberlake for his “Rock Your Body.”The two had a sexy, playful chemistry and had previously been rumored to have been hooking up.”
“Produced by MTV — who had previously organized the 2001 halftime event — the show first featured performances by Jessica Simpson, Diddy, Nelly and Kid Rock.”
“It’s easy to forget that Jackson and Timberlake were not the only acts that night.”
““We had heard that they were experimenting on some sort of elaborate production,” the relative added.”
““People from the NFL and MTV were there so [we] thought we would get a preview of the performance.”Instead, security advised that final rehearsals were closed to everyone.”
““When some of us went to Houston, we were told they were doing rehearsals,” said a relative.”


"At the beginning, Timberlake told Access Hollywood to nipplegate that we enjoyed giving people something to talk about, which was rash, but soon after that, he changed his attitude, saying that if someone offended Jackson, I'm sorry, and issued written and recorded statements, pardoning MTV CBS and NFL."
McDonald's, the advertiser, called the incident "inappropriate", but did not abandon Timberlake as its "I love it" spokesman
"You can almost feel the heat when two people are spinning around on the stage."
"Jackson's love affair with producer Jermaine Dupree was painful at the beginning, but," said one of Jackson's insiders, "everyone - including (her mother) Catherine - knows the chemistry."
Jackson performed with a band in 1989's hit "the land of rhythm" and then sang "rock your body" with Timberlake. There is a sexy and funny chemical reaction between the two, and it has been rumored that they have been dating
"Produced by MTV - who has organized the 2001 half-time event - the show first featured by Jessica Simpson, DIDY, Nelly and children's rock performances."
"It's easy to forget that Jackson and Timberlake were not the only actors that night."
"We heard they were experimenting with some elaborate product," the relative added
"People from NFL and MTV are all there, so [we] think we'll get a preview of the show." On the contrary, the security staff suggested that the final rehearsal should not be open to everyone. "
"When some of us went to Houston, we were told they were rehearsing," a relative said



Number  173
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““She’s happy that Scott’s priorities have shifted from nightmare party animal to reliable baby daddy.””
“In fact, it all started over the holidays in 2017, after Sofia traded in her golden locks for a dark brunette ‘do.”
“Though Sofia is half Kourtney’s age, fans can’t help but notice that the 19-year-old has practically become Kourt’s twin.”
“Take Sofia’s most recent Instagram post as a prime example.”
“Casually posing next to Scott with her sun-kissed glow, Sofia is rocking a thin pair of black sunglasses, high-waisted jean shorts, a billowy white top, and chic white sandals.”
“If that outfit doesn’t scream Kourtney Kardashian, we don’t know what does!”
“Even her pose is Kardashian-esque.”
“Naturally, fans spoke up about it.”
““Uh, for a moment I thought that was Kourtney Kardashian,” one fan wrote.”
““[Sofia Richie] looks as if she’s Kourtney Kardashian’s little girl,” wrote another.”


"She's glad Scott's focus has shifted from nightmare party animals to reliable little dads."
"In fact, it all started in the holiday of 2017 when Sophia changed her golden hair for a dark" do. "
"Although Sophia is only half the size of Coulter, fans can't help noticing that the 19-year-old girl has actually become Coulter's twin."
"Take Sofia's recent instagram post as an example."
"Sophia casually put out a pair of thin black sunglasses, high waist jeans and shorts, wavy white coat and chic white sandals, basking in the sun beside Scott."
"If that suit doesn't make Courtney Kardashian scream, we don't know what it is!"
"Even her posture is Kardashian."
"Naturally, fans are outspoken about it."
"Well, for a moment I thought it was Courtney Kardashian," one fan wrote
Another wrote: "Sophia Ritchie looks like Courtney Kardashian's little daughter."



Number  174
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Or was Rihanna is true soul mate and he complete blew it?”
“HollywoodLifers, when do you think Drake will finally find the right woman and settle down?”
“Drake’s really focused on his music right now and doesn’t want the drama that always seems to come with the women he dates — he prefers an easy and chill life,” our insider adds.”
““Drake has a bunch of booty calls he can dial up when he feels the need, and he has a lot of female friends, so he’s not lacking in the woman department.”
“...it is in fact Drake s child which he completely doesn t believe he would do the right thing by the child and support it financially Until the right woman comes along Drizzy s not lonely when it comes to bedroom activities...”
“The 27 year old is expecting a baby girl and just posted a sonogram of the growing fetus on July 19 with the caption second trimester While the Portland rapper has slammed Sophie s allegations that he s her baby s daddy his rep told us in May that If...”
“The fatherhood part might be happening sooner than Drizzy planned for, as artist and former porn star Sophie Brussaux claims she’s pregnant with Drake’s child.”
“Click here for pics of Drake and JLo’s romance.”
“He’s tried his best at settling down with incredible ladies such as Rihanna, 29, and Jennifer Lopez, 48, and if those stunners can’t get him to be a one woman man, it’s going to be awhile before he puts a ring on anyone’s finger.”
“Until then, Drake’s not forcing anything, and he’s making the most of the lifestyle that comes along with being Drake,” a source close to the singer tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”


"Or is Rihanna A's real soul mate and he totally screwed up?"
"Hollywood stars, when do you think Drake will find the right woman and settle down?"
"Drake is really focused on his music right now, and he doesn't want the women he dates to always look dramatic - he prefers a relaxed and cold life," our insider added
"Drake has a lot of booty phones, he can dial them when he needs them, and he has a lot of female friends, so he doesn't lack the female department."
“…… In fact, Drake's child, he doesn't believe that he will do the right thing to the child and support it financially until the right woman appears beside Tracy. When it comes to bedroom activities, Tracy is not alone... "
"The 27 year old rapper is pregnant with a baby girl. On July 19, she just posted an ultrasound picture of her fetus, with the title of" second trimester ", while the Portland rapper attacked Sophie's accusation that he was the father of her baby. His agent told us in May that if..."
"The fatherhood part may be faster than Tracy planned, because Sophie brusoe, the artist and former porn star, claims that she is pregnant with Drake's baby."
"Click here to see the romantic photos of Drake and Jerome."
"He's doing his best to get along with incredible women like Rihanna, 29, and Jennifer Lopez, 48, and it's going to take a while for him to put the ring on anyone's finger if those stuntmen can't make him a single man."
"Before that, Drake won't force anything, he made full use of the lifestyle he brought as Drake," a source close to the singer told reporters



Number  175
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Thus it is quite clear that the story about Cyrus wanting to "get pregnant ASAP" and "have babies with Hemsworth" is entirely made up.”
“Talking to 104.3 Myfm, Cyrus said, "No, I love pigs more than kids, to be honest."”
“Recently her Thanksgiving tweet sparked speculation about the songstress being pregnant which apparently drove her so crazy that she took to Twitter to retweet the picture and addressed all the rumours.”
“Also read: Miley Cyrus pregnant?”
“Malibu singer has a hilarious response to the baby bump rumoursShe wrote: "RUDE!!!”
“Not pregnant just eating a s— ton of tufurkey."”
“Even after that, Hollywood Life reported that the Wrecking Ball singer wanted to get 'pregnant ASAP' with fiance Liam Hemsworth.”
“An insider reportedly told the website, "Miley's totally ready to start a family with Liam."”
“Although she did not appreciate the speculations that she was pregnant "because it is something she has thought about for a while that hasn't happened yet."”
“RUDE!!!”


So it's clear that the stories of Cyrus wanting to "get pregnant as soon as possible" and "have a baby with hensworth" are completely fictional
"No, to be honest, I love pigs more than children," Cyrus told 104.3myfm
"Recently, her Thanksgiving microblog triggered speculation about the singer's pregnancy, which obviously made her so crazy that she forwarded the photo on Twitter and eliminated all rumors."
Read again: is Miley Cyrus pregnant
Malibu's pop star had a funny response to the rumor of a baby car crash. She wrote: "rude!!"
"It's not pregnancy, it's just a ton of tuxedo."
"Even after that, Hollywood life reported that the wrecking ball singer wanted to get 'pregnant as soon as possible' with fiance Liam hensworth."
According to reports, an insider told the website, "Miley is completely ready to marry Liam."
"Although she doesn't like to be guessed that she's pregnant," because it's something she's been thinking about for a while that hasn't happened. "
"Rude!"



Number  176
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Were you surprised to learn Kim didn’t invite her surrogate to the baby shower?”
““…She’s unhappy that things aren’t going her way.”Tell us, HollywoodLifers — do you think there’s really birthing drama between Kim and her surrogate?”
“And now the drama seems worse than ever, as she’s reportedly not wanted inside her baby’s delivery room!”
“As Kim Kardashian, 37, has previously admitted, not carrying her third child has been super stressful for her –mainly because the star can’t stand not being “in control,” which we totally get.”
“But apparently, things are only getting MORE challenging for her, as InTouch magazine reports the selfie queen’s surrogate doesn’t want her inside the delivery room at all when she gives birth!”
““There will be major tension between them in the delivery room,” an insider told the media outlet.”
““The surrogate doesn’t even want Kim to be there at this point, but she has no other choice.”
“Everyone is fearful a fight could break out between them!” Click here to see gorgeous pics of celeb baby bumps.”
“Why all the hostility?”
“Apparently the surrogate is angry Kim didn’t invite her to the baby shower she threw last month.”


"Were you surprised to learn that Kim didn't invite her surrogate mother to the baby shower?"
“…… She's not happy things don't go her way Tell us, Hollywood actresses - do you think there's a real childbirth drama between Kim and her surrogate mother? "
"It seems to be worse now than ever, because it's reported that she doesn't want to enter the baby's delivery room!"
"As Kim Kardashian, 37, has previously admitted, not having a third child is a huge pressure on her - mainly because the star can't stand being out of control, which we fully understand."
"But obviously, it's only going to be more challenging for her, because touch magazine reported that the surrogate mother of the self portrait queen didn't want her in the delivery room at all when she gave birth!"
"There will be a lot of tension between them in the delivery room," an insider told the media
"The surrogate doesn't even want Kim here, but she has no choice."
"Everyone is afraid of a fight between them! "Click here to see a gorgeous picture of baby star bulge."
"Why all the hostility?"
"Obviously, the surrogate mother was angry that Kim didn't invite her to the baby shower last month."



Number  177
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Despite all the bogus reports, the only factual accuracy is that Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie are still working on their divorce settlement, which includes the future of their six children.”
“There has not actually been any confirmation on a Brad-Jen reunion as a couple.”
“Angelina Jolie demanding her estranged husband Brad Pitt dump Jennifer Aniston in order to continue seeing his six children is nothing but a bogus claim by a news outlet.”
“The absurd claim made by NW was recently debunked by Gossip Cop.”
“Brad Pitt, Jennifer Aniston, And Angelina Jolie’s Private LivesIn September 2016, the entertainment world woke with the news of Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie parting ways for good.”
“Prior to the release of their official statement, there were rumors that due to Brad’s closeness with Marion Cotillard, Angelina Jolie decided to end her two-year marriage with Pitt.”
“However, that was not the case and Marion herself debunked the false claims.”
“Over the next few months, there were several reports suggesting Brad was moving on with Sienna Miller and other known Hollywood actresses.”
“Not only this, there were absurd claims by many known media publications that even Angelina Jolie was getting married for the fourth time.”
“Despite all the speculation, Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie remained single.”


"Although all the reports are false, the only accurate fact is that Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie are still trying to solve the divorce problem, including the future of their six children."
"There's actually no news of Brad Jens reuniting."
"Angelina Jolie's request that her separated husband Brad Pitt abandon Jennifer Aniston in order to continue to visit his six children is just a false statement of a news agency."
"The absurdity of NW has recently been exposed by the gossip police."
"The private lives of Brad Pitt, Jennifer Aniston and Angelina Jolie in September 2016, the news that Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie broke up awakened the entertainment industry."
"Before their official announcement, there were rumors that Angelina Jolie had decided to end her two-year marriage to Pete because of Brad's close relationship with Marion godia."
"However, this is not the case. Marion himself has exposed these false statements."
Over the next few months, there were several reports that Brad continued to date Sienna Miller and other famous Hollywood actresses
"Not only that, many well-known media publications also absurdly claim that even Angelina Jolie is getting married for the fourth time."
"Despite all the speculation, Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie are still single."



Number  178
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Do you think they’ll ever go public?”
“What do you think is going on in Katie and Jamie’s relationship, HollywoodLifers?”
“The pair is expecting a child together, but have decided not to go through with a wedding, according to a new report.”
“Find out why here!”
“Will Katie Holmes, 37, be raising another child all on her own?!”
“She’s reportedly pregnant with Jamie Foxx’s baby, but while they originally wanted to take their relationship to the next level and get married, a new report claims the plans have drastically changed.”
“Get the scoop right here!”
“It was actually Jamie, 48, who originally got “panicked” about the pace at which things were moving, and asked the actress if they could postpone the wedding, according to OK!”
“...magazine.”
“But it was Katie who decided to pull the plug entirely — and she told him they should just “cancel altogether!” UPDATE: A rep for Jamie has denied these reports, and says the singer was “never engaged.”“Everything was going so well,” the mag’s insider claims.”


"Do you think they will go public?"
"What do you think of Katie's relationship with Jamie, Hollywood star?"
"According to the latest report, the two are pregnant with a child together, but have decided not to have a wedding."
"Find out why!"
"Will Katie Holmes, 37, raise another child on her own?"
"It is reported that she is pregnant with Jamie Fox's child, but although they originally wanted to raise their relationship to a new level and get married, a new report says that the plans of both sides have changed dramatically."
"Bring me the spoon!"
According to OK, it was actually Jamie, 48, who was initially "panicked" by the speed of events and asked the actress if she could postpone the wedding
“… Magazine. "
But it was Katie who decided to stop completely - she told him they should "cancel it completely!"! "Update: a representative of Jamie denied the reports and said the singer" was never engaged. " "Everything is going well," said a magazine insider



Number  179
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You know, if we ever get out of here, I’d like to take you out for some latkes.””
“They treating you OK?”
“...with plenty of Twitterers who started slamming the bit before the show s cast made its goodnights...”
““He managed to be offensive, insensitive & unfunny all at the same time Quite a feat,” wrote Greenblatt.”
“Watched #LarryDavid #SNL monologue this AM.”
“He managed to be offensive, insensitive & unfunny all at same time.”
“Quite a feat.”
“— Jonathan Greenblatt (@JGreenblattADL) November 5, 2017David’s monologue – watch it above – started out with the comic’s standard self-deprecation, joking about being a total loser during his single New York days.”
“Then he pivoted to riskier territory – Hollywood’s recent flood of sexual harassment allegations.”
““I couldn’t help but notice a very disturbing pattern emerging, which is that many of the predators are Jews,” said David, whose Curb Your Enthusiasm once included a plot about mistaking Survivor cast members with camp survivors, said.”


"You know, if we can get out of here, I want to take you out for a latte."
"Are they all right with you?"
“… Before the crew said goodbye, a lot of Twitter users began to lash out at... "
"His attempt to be aggressive, insensitive and without a sense of humor was also a remarkable achievement," Greenblatt wrote
"I saw David's monologue this morning."
"He tried to be aggressive, insensitive and uninteresting at the same time."
"Quite remarkable."
"Jonathan Greenblatt (@ jggreenblatt ADL) David's monologue on November 5, 2017 - see above - started as a standard caricature of self mockery, joking that he was a complete failure in his single days in New York."
"Then he turned to a more risky area - Hollywood's recent spate of sexual harassment charges."
"I can't help noticing that a very disturbing pattern is emerging that many predators are Jewish," says David, who once had a plot in "contain your passion" that mistook survivor actors for camp survivors



Number  180
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“10+ pictures inside of Robert Pattinson and James Franco at the event…”
“Both of them are rocking some sexy scruff!”
“James is wearing a Dolce&Gabbana suit.”
“FYI: Rob is wearing Dior Homme.”
“The are up against The Florida Project‘s Willem Dafoe, Get Out‘s Daniel Kaluuya, The Meyerowitz Stories‘ Adam Sandler, and Lucky‘s Harry Dean Stanton.”
“This is just the start of a long awards season for these two!”
“The guys are both nominated tonight in the Best Actor category – Robert for his work in Good Time and James for The Disaster Artist.”
“Robert Pattinson and James Franco walk the red carpet at IFP’s 2017 Gotham Independent Film Awards on Monday (November 27) in New York City.”


"More than 10 photos of Robert Pattinson and James Franco at the event..."
"They're both sexy!"
"James is wearing a Duga banner suit."
"For reference only: Rob is wearing Dior Homme."
"Their opponents are William Dufour of the Florida project, Daniel carua of the going out, Adam Sandler of the meyerowitz story, and the lucky Harry Dean Stanton."
"For both of you, this is just the beginning of a long award season!"
"Both of these guys were nominated for best actor tonight - Robert for" good time "and James for" disaster artist. "
"Robert Pattinson and James Franco walked the red carpet at the IFP 2017 Gotham Independent Film Awards in New York on Monday (November 27)



Number  181
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Please visit the source responsible for the item in question to report any concerns you may have regarding content or accuracy.”
“The news articles, Tweets, and blog posts do not represent IMDb's opinions nor can we guarantee that the reporting therein is completely factual.”
“This content is published for the entertainment of our users only.”
“On Tuesday, MediaTakeOut is blaring, “Mto Shock Exclusive: New Video Proves Beyond A Doubt… That There […]IMDb.com, Inc. takes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, Tweets, or blog posts.”
“This is reprehensible.”
“After a gunman murdered 58 people and wounded hundreds more, the webloids decided to regurgitate disproven conspiracy theories rather than deliver straight facts.”
“HollywoodLife and MediaTakeOut are shamefully spreading false claims about the Las Vegas shooting.”


"Please visit the person in charge of the relevant project and report any concerns about content or accuracy."
"News articles, tweets and blog posts don't represent IMDB's opinions, and we can't guarantee that the reports in them are completely true."
"This content is published just to entertain our users."
"On Tuesday, the sound of mediatakeout was deafening," exclusive to MTO: the new video proves beyond doubt that There ] IMDb.com , Inc. assumes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, tweets or blog posts. "
"This is reprehensible."
"After a gunman killed 58 people and wounded hundreds, cyber spies decided to go back on the outdated conspiracy theories instead of providing direct facts."
"Hollywood Life and mediatakeout are shamelessly spreading false stories about the Las Vegas shooting."



Number  182
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The fact is Celine doesn't have a crush on David and is not "too deep in the friend zone to have shot" with the 67-year-old music mogul.”
“While both Celine and David have yet to give any comment regarding the report, a friend of the "My Heart Will Go On" hitmaker has shot it down, telling Gossip Cop that the above claim is "ridiculous."”
“"When we bring it up, she blushes and says, 'I love David, but he only dates supermodels,' " the insider adds.”
“"He's been in constant contact with Celine since Rene passed away, but he sees her as a friend, not a lover," the alleged source reveals to the news outlet.”
“But it goes on claiming, "Celine may be too deep in the friend zone to have a shot with the music mogul," noting that David recently divorced Yolanda Hadid and is currently with Christie Brinkley.”
“The magazine quotes a so-called source close to Celine as saying, "David and Celine have been close for 25 years; He's like family."”
“Because You Love Me...”
“According to a latest report from Star the 48 year old singer s heart is ready to go on with her late husband s Rene Angelil friend David Foster who was also her collaborator on The Power of Love and...”
“Jan 27, 2017AceShowbiz - Celine Dion reportedly has a "titanic crush" on David Foster.”
“CelebrityA source reveals that the 67-year-old Canadian musician has 'been in constant contact with Celine since [Rene Angelil] passed away, but he sees her as a friend, not a lover.'”


"In fact, Celine is not infatuated with David, nor is she" too deep in the friend zone, not filmed "with the 67 year old music tycoon."
"Neither Celine nor David has commented on the report, but a killer friend of" my heart will go on "has shot it down and told gossip police that the above statement is" ridiculous "
"When we mentioned it, she blushed and said," I love David, but he only dates supermodels, "the source added
"He has been in touch with Celine since Rene's death, but he regards her as a friend rather than a lover," the source said to the news media
"But it continues to claim that" Celine may be too deep in the friend zone to have a shot with a music tycoon, "noting David's recent divorce from Yolanda Hadid, currently with Christie Brinkley
"David and Celine have been close for 25 years; he's like a family," the magazine quoted a so-called source close to Celine as saying
"Because you love me..."
"According to the latest report in Star Magazine, the 48 year old singer's heart is ready to continue to work with her late husband's friend, David Foster, who is also her strength in love and..."
On January 27, 2017, aceshowbiz reported that Celine Dion had a "Titanic infatuation" with David Foster
"Celebritya's sources revealed that the 67 year old Canadian musician" has been in touch with Celine since her death, but he regards her as a friend rather than a lover. "



Number  183
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And she regularly posted sweet snaps hanging out with her friends’ kids during her downtime.”
“Harry was particularly interested in the bath.”
“With just weeks to go before Kate Middleton gives birth to her third child, her future sister-in-law, Meghan Markle, is already thinking about her own royal baby!”
“While touring the campus of Northern Ireland’s next-generation science park on Friday with fiancé Prince Harry, the couple met a husband and wife team who make innovative and hypoallergenic baby products.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Pointing to the products from Shnuggle Meghan said I m sure at some point we ll need the whole thing Image zoom Credit PA Images Sipa USA Image zoom Credit Chris Jackson Pool Getty The products on display included a baby bath that allows the baby to sit up a...”
“...changing mat and a Moses basket...”
““It’s very sweet,” Meghan said.”
“Sinead Murphy, who founded the company with her husband Adam, told reporters, “They seemed very engaged with the products.”
“I wonder if he has witnessed bath time with his nephew or niece.”“As soon as he saw the bum bump [which stops the baby from slipping down] he understood immediately,” she continued.”


"And she often Posts sweet snapshots of hanging out with her friends' children during her break time."
"Harry is particularly interested in bathing."
"It's only a few weeks before Kate Middleton gives birth to her third child, and her future sister-in-law Megan markel is already thinking about her royal baby!"
"On Friday, while visiting the next generation Science Park Campus in Northern Ireland with their fiance Prince Harry, the couple met a couple who made innovative hypoallergenic baby products."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Pointing to shnuggle Meghan's products, I'm sure at some point, we need the whole product image scaling credit PA image SIPA American image scaling credit Chris Jackson Chi Getty's products on display include a baby bathtub, one for the baby to sit up..."
“… Change cushions and baskets... "
"It's sweet," Megan said
"They seem to be very committed to the product," Sinead Murphy, who founded the company with her husband Adam, told reporters
"I wonder if he's ever seen a bath with a nephew or niece." "As soon as he saw the lump on his ass (to prevent the baby from slipping), he understood," she continued



Number  184
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“While the family fame has given Caitlyn that opportunity to reach so many people, however, Kylie herself insisted she doesn't plan to be in the pubic eye her whole life — even though she's never lived any other way until now.”
“She admitted that she went to far when she first started injecting her lips (pictured in August 2014)Just like Kylie: These days, her lips are smaller and have become of the envy of fans everywhereBeauty!!!!”
“'It's so crazy.”
“I have to finagle some out of Mom just to keep people happy,' she told Kylie in the interview.”
“'I don't think I've ever gotten more requests for anything than the Lip Kits.”
“After toning it down, Kylie's lips have become practically iconic — and have helped her grow her hugely successful Lip Kit brand, which even Kim says she has to beg to get her hands on.”
“Of course, few people are laughing now.”
“Back then, people couldn't get enough of her suddenly-bigger pout, but it became a bit of a punchline as fans and critics alike criticized her for going to far.”
“@kyliejenner @allure #augustissue #proudmama #allure A photo posted by Kris Jenner (@krisjenner) on Jul 13, 2016 at 12:26pm PDTRumors first started to swirl that Kylie was surgically enhancing her lips in 2014.”
“Scroll down for videoSharing the details: Kylie Jenner covers the August issue of Allure magazine and sat down for two separate interviewsReel it in!”


"Although the family's reputation has given Caitlin access to so many people, Kelly herself insists that she doesn't intend to stay in the public eye all her life - even though she hasn't lived any other life until now."
"She admitted that when she first started injecting her lips (shot in August 2014), she went a long way, just like Kelly: now her lips have become smaller and become the envy of fans all over the world!!"
"It's crazy."
"In order to make people happy, I have to cheat my mother a little bit," she told Kelly in an interview
"I don't think I've ever received more requests than a mask."
"After adjusting colors, Kylie's lips have actually become iconic -- and helped her develop her very successful Lipstick Brand, and even Kim said she had to beg for this brand."
"Of course, few people laugh now."
"At that time, people didn't see enough of her sudden bigger pouts, but when fans and critics criticized her for going too far, it became a joke."
“@ kyliejenner@allure#augustissue #At 12:26 noon on July 13, 2016, in a photo released by Kris Jenner (@ krisjenner), trumors first began to worry about Kylie's lip enhancement surgery in 2014. "
"Scroll down to share the details: Kylie Jenner reported on the August issue of allure magazine and sat down for two separate interviews. Please keep watching!"



Number  185
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“Source says model has dumped 'KUWTK' star!”
“Scott Disick’s much younger girlfriend, Sofia Richie, has dumped him after “The Lord” cheated on her, Us Weekly has reported.”
“According to the Us source, “Sofia and Scott split up.”
“He cheated on her in Miami and she found out and told [her father] Lionel [Richie].”
“He said he is going to cut her off and write her out of his will if she continues her relationship with Scott as he thinks he s extremely toxic for her The source added that the two were still a couple when Disick was allegedly caught with another woman...”
“...at Kanye West s listening party for his new album in Wyoming earlier this week...”
“Another insider told Us that the Keeping Up with the Kardashians star and Kourtney baby daddy, 35, was acting “really sloppy throughout the night” and “could barely speak” when he was seen getting canoodling with the mystery blonde.”
“Richie, 19, found out about Disick seeing the woman in Miami “after their trip to St. Bart’s and it caused huge problems in their relationship.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"The source said that the model had dumped the 'kutek' star!"
According to us weekly, Scott disek's much younger girlfriend, Sophia Ritchie, dumped him after God's infidelity
According to us sources, "Sophia and Scott broke up."
"He cheated on her in Miami, and she found out and told (her father) Lionel."
"He said that if she continues her relationship with Scott, he will cut her off and remove her from the will because he thinks Scott is extremely harmful to her. The source added that when disik was accused of being with another woman, they were still a couple... "
“… Earlier this week, at Kanye West's new album concert in Wyoming
"Another insider told us that the 35 year old Kardashian star and Courtney baby dad had been" really sloppy "and" almost speechless "all night when he was seen with the mysterious blonde
"Richie, 19, after a trip to St. Bart, found that Disick met the woman in Miami, which caused a huge problem in their relationship."



Number  186
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““But she didn’t want to hear it, she loves him.”The story is developing.”
““The truth is that he has a bad reputation, they had warned Khloé about him, he’s done this before,” the source said.”
“...having contractions Wednesday TMZ is reporting...”
“Her family, including mom Kris Jenner and sister Kim Kardashian, were said to be jetting to Cleveland to be by her side Wednesday.”
“Sources have told TMZ that the contractions had just started, and it may just be a coincidence that they began the day after multiple outlets reported that Thompson had been photographed spending time in the company of multiple women over the past few months.”
“The 33 year old reality TV star is in her ninth month of pregnancy and various news reports have said the baby her first could come any day now The Keeping Up With the Kardashians star has been living in Cleveland the hometown of her 27 year old boyfriend a...”
“...player with the Cleveland Cavaliers...”
“Khloe was planning to give birth in Cleveland, not her hometown of Los Angeles, and had been enjoying a final “peaceful” stretch of her pregnancy.”
“But photos and videos surfaced Tuesday showing her pro athlete boyfriend engaged in PDA with a curvy brunette at a New York City club Saturday night.”
“Other images also surfaced, showing Thompson and the brunette, leaving and entering a Four Seasons hotel.”


"But she didn't want to hear it. She loved him." The story is developing
"The fact is that he has a bad reputation, they have warned him, and he has done so before," the source said
“… On Wednesday, there was a report of contractions in TMZ... "
Her family, including her mother Chris Jenner and sister Kim Kardashian, are said to be flying to Cleveland on Wednesday to accompany her
"A source told TMZ that the contractions had just begun, which may be just a coincidence. The contractions started on the second day when many media reported that Thompson had been photographed spending time with many women in the past few months."
"The 33 year old reality TV star has been pregnant for nine months, and various news reports say that her first child may be born at any time. Now the star who follows Kardashian has been living in Cleveland, the hometown of her 27 year old boyfriend, a..."
“… Cleveland Cavaliers players... "
Chloe plans to have a baby in Cleveland instead of her hometown of Los Angeles, and has been enjoying the last "quiet" moments of her pregnancy
"But photos and videos on Tuesday showed her professional athlete boyfriend engaged to a curvy, dark woman at a New York club on Saturday night."
Other photos also showed Thompson and the brunette in and out of a four seasons hotel



Number  187
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“'They're really cute,' she gushed.”
“So what does she think of Khloe and Tristan as a couple?”
“It looked like the Keeping Up With The Kardashians cameras were also there.”
“Bonelli had posted on Tuesday that the star was in NYC to promote her new denim line.”
“...star also had on a pair of short and very tight jeans that are most likely from her new denim collection.”
“The reality maven is still technically wed to former LA Lakers basketball player Lamar Odom, though they have reportedly not been intimate since 2013The E!”
“Check it out: The blonde daughter of Kris Jenner, 60, made sure the wide diamond band was front and center when she walked out of Harold's Meat + Three restaurant in ManhattanBut she's still Mrs Odom!”
“Khloe's mood was somber as she wore a black sheer blouse unbuttoned over a lace bustier.”
“On Tuesday Kardashian was with her longtime makeup artist Joyce Bonelli, who appears to be pregnant.”
“The status of the proceedings is not known.”


"They're so cute," she gushed
"So what does she think of Chloe and Tristan?"
"It looks like the camcorders at Kardashian's are there, too."
"Bonelli announced on Tuesday that the star is promoting her new denim line in New York."
“…… Starr also wore a pair of short, tight jeans, probably her new denim collection
"Technically, the Mavericks are still married to former Laker Lamar Odom, although it is reported that they have not had an intimate relationship since 2013!"
"Check it out: 60 year old Kris Jenner's blonde daughter made sure the big diamond band was in the front and middle when she came out of Harold's meat + three in Manhattan, but she was still Mrs. Odom!"
"Khloe's mood is gloomy because she is wearing a black transparent shirt and a lace bra without buttons."
On Tuesday, Kardashian was with her longtime makeup artist, Joyce Bonelli, who appeared to be pregnant
"The proceedings are not known."



Number  188
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Her 18-year-old sister, Elle Fanning, is also an actress.”
“Now: Fanning, who is now 22, is combining work as an actress with a modelling career, and pursuing a degree at New York University.”
“Unlike many youthful stars, however, she also successfully transitioned into being a teen actress, with a high profile role as villainous vampire Jane in the Twilight movies.”
“Dakota FanningThen: Fanning made her big screen debut at the tender age of just eight, in 2011, and went on to become one of America’s best known child actresses, acting alongside Tom Cruise in War of the Worlds (2005), and Julia Roberts in Charlotte’s Web (2006).”


"Her 18-year-old sister, Al fanning, is also an actor."
"Now: the 22-year-old combines acting with modeling and studies for a degree at New York University."
"However, unlike many young stars, she has also successfully transformed into a teenage actress, playing a high-profile evil vampire Jane in the Twilight film."
"Fanning, Dakota: in 2011, fanning made her debut on the big screen at the age of 8, then became one of the most famous children's actresses in the United States, performing alongside Tom Cruise in World War (2005) and Julia Roberts in Charlotte's network (2006)"



**Something goes wrong**
“Sound off in the comments!”
“Source: GettyDo you think Margot will give Rob the time of day?”
“So, unless there’s just some Angelina and Brad type of chemistry on set, it looks like Rob might have to settle for a mere friendship with the Australian movie star.”
“Margot just so happens to be married.”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: GettyThat’s not Rob’s only dilemma.”
“...set competition as it was recently announced that Leonardo DiCaprio has been cast to play Charles Manson in the film...”
“Article continues below advertisement Source Getty They ve had close calls before added the source but for Rob the ultimate thing would be to get to work with Margot under Quentin s direction Source Getty However Rob will have to be okay with a non leading role and some on...”
“Source: Getty“He's already met with Quentin about this role, and he's been dying to work with Margot for a while now,” the insider dished.”
“It might win him his grittiest film role yet, and his dream co-star Margot,” a source exclusively told OK!.”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: Getty“Now that he's moved back to LA full time, Rob is having a ball now that people are finally seeing him in Good Time his latest film.”


"Please leave a message in the comments!"
"Source: do you think Margot will give rob a day?"
"So, unless Angelina and Brad are the only ones on the set, rob seems to be content with a simple friendship with the Australian movie star."
"Margot just got married."
"The article continues with the following advertising source: Getty, this is not rob's only dilemma."
“… Set up the competition, because it's recently reported that Leonardo DiCaprio will play Charles Manson in the film... "
"The article continues with the following advertising source Getty they have close calls before adding the source, but Rob's final thing will be to get to work with Margot under the guidance of Quentin source Getty, but rob will have to work with a non leading role and some in..."
"Source: Getty" he has met with Quentin about the role and has been eager to work with Margot for some time
An exclusive told OK: "it's likely to win him the most tenacious film role yet and his dream partner Margot."! "
The article continues in the following advertising source: Getty "now that he's moving back to Los Angeles to work full-time, rob now has a ball and people finally see him in his latest movie at a good time."



Number  190
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Jennifer’s actions are solely taken in the best interest of their son.””
““Jennifer requested and received a protective order against her ex-fiancé.”
“...months Jennifer s rep said...”
“J Hud 36 had been engaged to the former pro wrestler since 2008 until recently when it was revealed that a protective order was granted against the father of her eight year old son David Jr They have been in the process of ending their relationship for a number of...”
“...issues from her co judges...”
“Jennifer looked Miley right in the eye and told her to never mention her private life again or even say David s name At the time the source said that Jennifer just isn t the type to joke around but now it seems she was trying to hide her relationship...”
““The room immediately got tense,” the insider revealed.”
““Miley said that they should be asking Jennifer about her long engagement.”Unfortunately for Miley, Jennifer was standing right behind her when she made the “long engagement” comment.”
“So she tried to shift the focus.”
““Miley wasn’t in a good mood and is just over them teasing her about Liam,” an insider told_ Life & Style exclusively_.”


"Jennifer's behavior is entirely in the best interests of their son."
"Jennifer requested and received a protection order against her ex fiance."
“… The representative of Jennifer said
"J HUD 36 has been engaged to the former professional wrestler since 2008, until recently it was revealed that the father of her 8-year-old son David Jr. was given a protection order, and they have ended their relationship for several years..."
“… Questions from her co judges... "
"Jennifer looked Miley in the eye and told her not to mention her private life or even David's name. At that time, the source said that Jennifer was not the kind of person to joke about, but now it seems that she is trying to hide her relationship... "
"The room immediately became tense," the source said
"Miley said they should ask Jennifer about her long engagement." Unfortunately, when Jennifer said "long engagement," she was standing behind her
"So she tried to distract."
"Miley was in a bad mood at the time, and they just finished teasing Liam," an insider told life and fashion exclusive



Number  191
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“'”Read the full interview in USA Today here.”
““‘Oh my God, I’m being treated this way because I have a vagina.”
“'” she said.”
“Why do I feel so (expletive)?”
““‘What is this feeling?”
“She said it had a lasting effect on her.”
“...the sexism she experienced...”
“I literally went out into the world thinking there was no disparity that everyone was equal and I can do whatever a man can do However Bullock said that later in her career is when she had a wake up moment though she wouldn t get into any specifics about...”
““My career has been a domino effect of people who said, ‘I would like this person to fill this role,'” she continued.”
“...this industry...”


"Please read the full interview of USA today here."
"Oh, my God, I'm treated like this because I have a vagina."
"She said
"Why do I feel this way?"
"How does it feel?"
"She said it had a lasting effect on her."
“… The sexism she experienced... "
"I really went out to the world and thought that there was no disparity, that everyone was equal, and that I could do anything any man could do, but Bullock said that at the end of her career, she had a sober moment, although she would not go into any details about..."
"My career has been a domino effect, and the person who said, 'I want this person to fill this role,'" she continued
“… This industry... "



Number  192
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I’m not gonna let them get to me.””
“...but I’m not gonna give a f – – k what people say.”
“Then, a scantily clad onetime Hannah Montana, Miley Cyrus, twerked up a storm at the MTV VMAs two years ago.”
“Now, it’s former Disney star Selena Gomez, 23, who’s shed most of her clothing as part of an attempt to establish herself as a grown-up artist.”
“All eyes are on her new album, “Revival” (her first for Interscope), out Friday — or, more accurately, all eyes are on her album cover.”
“It’s got Gomez practically in her birthday suit, topless and wearing only barely there shorts.”
“Like Disney alumni who have gone before, she’s looking to shake things up with a new look and sound that are a world away from her previous, wholesome persona.”
“The lyrics from the opening title track explain it plainly, as Gomez sings, “No more hiding .”
“.”


"I won't let them get close to me."
“…… But I don't give f – – K what people say. "
"Then, a ragged Hannah Montana, Millie Cyrus, set off a storm on MTV Vmas two years ago."
"Now, 23-year-old former Disney star Serena Gomez has taken off most of her clothes and tried to make herself a mature artist."
All eyes are on her new album Renaissance (her first album for Interscope), which will be released on Friday - or, more accurately, on the cover of her album
"It made Gomez almost wear a birthday suit, naked, just a few shorts."
"Like Disney's former alumni, she wants to change everything with a new look and voice, which is quite different from her previous healthy image."
"The lyrics of the song are clearly explained, as Gomez sang," no longer hidden“
“.”



Number  193
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know in the comments section.”
“It is worth the bill?”
“With her sexy weight gain though (which has everyone in a frenzy!”
“), she’s had to purchase new clothes, and her wardrobe bill is reportedly eye-popping!”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: BACKGRIDA source tells OK!”
“...exclusively, “She’s spending hundreds of thousands of dollars on new dresses, lingerie, jeans, T-shirts.”
“Pretty much everything s got to go because she s up at least two to three dress sizes from where she was a couple years ago Source BACKGRID As the Navy knows the Barbadian beauty has gained weight in the past couple of months and quite honestly she hasn t...”
“...looked better...”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: BACKGRIDShe’s even commented on the extra curves, and posted a meme on Instagram, slamming body-shamers in an epic way.”
“The photo was of Gucci Mane‘s fluctuating weight from 2007 until now.”


"Please let us know in the comments section."
"Is it worth the bill?"
"But her sexy weight gain (which makes everyone crazy!"
She had to buy new clothes, and her wardrobe bill was reported to be eye popping
The following continues the article advertisement source: backgrida source tells can
“… Exclusive, "she spent hundreds of thousands of dollars on new clothes, underwear, jeans, T-shirts
"Almost everything has to be done because she's at least two or three sizes bigger than a few years ago. As far as the Navy knows, this Barbados beauty has gained weight in the past few months. To be honest, she hasn't... "
“… It looks much better... "
She even commented on the extra curve, and posted a meme on instagram, an epic attack on human humiliation
"This picture shows the weight fluctuation of Gucci's mane from 2007 to now."



Number  194
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“To see the incredible mother-daughter resemblance and get the illustrious details on Carys Zeta Douglas and Catherine Zeta Jones, pick up a copy of Town & Country on newsstands this week and basque in the glory that is Hollywood royalty.”
“Clearly, as a family, they’ve got a lot going on — and a ton of talent between them.”
“In fact, Zeta-Jones is currently filming a dark comedy series about a beauty pageant coach called Queen America.”
“...her family causing a stir her mom has still got it...”
“In the cover feature Carys and her Oscar winning mother discuss a number of topics from their move from Bermuda to Manhattan to her unique sense of style which mom Zeta Jones describes as modern but age appropriate But the up and coming teenager isn t the only member of...”
“Since then, Douglas has developed quite the following, now touting 54,000 Instagram followers — sealing the deal for her as the next It Girl.”
“She first caused a buzz when she made not one, but two, fashion week appearances, one at Michael Kors and the other at Dolce & Gabbana alongside her superstar mother.”
“Carys, though young, is in the midst of her show business debut as the third generation of an iconic acting family.”
“Proof: they’re on the cover of Town & Country’s September issue, which at first glance, looks as though you are seeing double — in the best way possible.”
“Like famous mother-daughter duo Reese Witherspoon and Ava Phillippe before them, Catherine Zeta-Jones and her 15-year-old daughter Carys Zeta Douglas (her father is Michael Douglas) are carbon copies of one another.”


"To learn about the incredible similarities between Carys zeta Douglas and Catherine Zeta Jones, and their wonderful details, buy a copy of town & country at the newsstand this week and a copy of Basque at the glory of the Hollywood royal family."
"Obviously, as a family, they have a lot to do - there's a lot of talent between them."
"In fact, Zeta Jones is currently working on a black comedy series about beauty coach" the queen of America. "
“… Her family caused a stir - her mother still has... "
"In the cover feature, carlis and her Oscar winning mother discuss a lot of topics, from their moving from Bermuda to Manhattan to her unique sense of style. Her mother, Zeta Jones, calls her modern but age appropriate, but this budding young man is not the only member..."
"Since then, Douglas has developed quite a number of followers and is now touting 54000 instagram followers - reaching an agreement for her as the next it girl."
"The first time she caused a sensation, she made not one, but two fashion week appearances, one at Michael Coles and the other at Dolce & Gabbana with her superstar mother."
"Although young, carlis, as the third generation of the iconic performing family, is in the stage of her debut."
"Evidence: they're on the cover of the September issue of town and country, and at first glance you seem to see the best possible way."
"Like previous famous mother daughter groups, Reese Witherspoon and EVA Phillips, Catherine Zeta Jones and her 15-year-old daughter, carlis zeta Douglas (her father is Michael Douglas), are carbon copies of each other."



Number  195
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Sometimes this community can be really tough.””
“I can get more things done if I don t stick my nose into everything publicly Image zoom Caitlyn Jenner and Donald Trump Credit Jon Kopaloff WireImage Evan Vucci AP REX Shutterstock A long outspoken Republican Jenner voted for Trump in the 2016 election on what she thought was a...”
“...public school bathrooms and locker rooms matching their chosen gender identity...”
“It s their biggest problem But since Trump s election there s been an attempt to roll back rights including Trump s failed attempt to stop transgender people from enrolling in the military and his move to lift federal protections for transgender students that would guarantee their freedom to use...”
“We have to get them to be more progressive with social issues.”
““But socially, I’m much more progressive.”
“I believe in limited government, I believe in lower taxes, I believe in less regulations, I want a thriving economy, I want Americans to be able to succeed,” Jenner said.”
““On the economics side, I’m very conservative.”
“...promise of continued progress for LGBTQ rights...”
“I do it very quietly because I have been so criticized by the liberal side of the media.”


"Sometimes the community is really tough."
"I can do more if I don't put my nose in everything public image zooming Caitlin Jenner and Donald Trump credit Jon kopalov WireImage Evan wuch Associated Press Rex shutterstock a long outspoken Republican Jenner voted for trump in the 2016 election, she thinks is a..."
“… Bathrooms and changing rooms in public schools fit the gender characteristics of their choice... "
"This is their biggest problem, but since trump was elected, some people have tried to roll back their rights, including the failure of Trump's attempt to prevent transgender people from joining the army, and his cancellation of federal measures to protect transgender students, so as to ensure their freedom of use..."
"We have to make them more progressive on social issues."
"But socially, I'm much better."
"I believe in limited government, I believe in lower taxes, I believe in less regulation, I want prosperity, I want Americans to succeed," Jenner said
"Economically, I'm very conservative."
“…… LGBTQ's commitment to continue to improve its rights.... "
"I do it very quietly because I have been criticized by the media liberals all the time."



Number  196
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Even after the robbery and everything, it’s just I’ve been staying home and I’ve been looking to him to just take care of everything while I stay home.””
“I feel a sense of responsibility just with the pressure of taking care of everything.”
“Want to keep up with the latest from PEOPLE?”
“He has a great love for Kim, but in his mind he doesn’t think Kim is a genius, and he’s telling her he knows what he’s doing,” adds the source.”
““She’s trying her best to support him on social media and show a different side of things, but it’s just not working.”“He genuinely believes he’s God and a genius and that he can do everything on his own.”
““Kim is trying to control him and the situation, but he can’t be controlled,” says the source about the couple, who are parents to 3-month-old Chicago, Saint, 2, and North, 4½.”
“He stirs the pot.”RELATED VIDEO: Kim Kardashian Has Fun with Kanye’s Advice That ‘Sometimes You Need to Get Rid of Everything’Kardashian West playfully responded to her husband on social media, but the source close to the situation says it was an attempt to take charge.”
“He’s always been like that.”
“Says the source: “A lot of this is just Kanye.”
“In one recent tweet, West suggested the need to “get rid of everything.”A source close to the rapper contends that while West can be “eccentric and erratic,” not everyone sees his latest actions as cause for concern.”


"Even after the robbery and other things, it's just that I stay at home all the time, and I always hope that he can take care of everything when I stay at home."
"With the pressure to take care of everything, I feel a sense of responsibility."
"Want to keep up with the latest news from people?"
The source added: "he likes Kim very much, but in his opinion, Kim is not a genius and he tells her he knows what he's doing."
"She did her best to support him on social media and show the other side of the story, but it didn't work at all." "He sincerely believes that he is God and genius and that he can do anything."
"King tried to control him and the situation, but he couldn't," the source said, adding that the couple were the parents of three month old Chicago saints 2 and 4 / 2 North
Related video: Kim Kardashian's advice to Kanye is interesting. Kardashian West mischievously responds to her husband on social media, but people familiar with the matter say it's to take control
"He's always been like this."
"A lot of this is just Kanye," the source said
"In a recent tweet, West hinted at the need to" get rid of everything. ". A source close to the rapper believes that while West may be "eccentric," not everyone thinks his recent behavior deserves attention. "



Number  197
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“‘He addressed all the hurt he caused her.’MORE : People just can’t get over Brad Pitt and Jennifer Aniston as the rumour mill goes into overdrive againMORE : Jennifer Aniston is ditching film to head back to TV: ‘That’s where the work is’”
“‘He doesn’t usually open up like that, but through therapy and recovery, he’s learned to express his feelings.”
“Brad Pitt and Jennifer Aniston back in 2001 (Picture: Getty Images)A source told the site: ‘Brad apologised for all the heartbreak.”
“In June, reports emerged that Brad Pitt is making amends with his ex-wife, according to Life & Style mag, despite Chelsea saying the actress ‘doesn’t care’ about what is going on with Brad at the time.”
“He’s no longer representing Chelsea.’Meanwhile it seems that despite her split from Brad Pitt in 2005 – over ten years ago – we just can’t get over their relationship.”
“‘[Stephen Huvane] dumped Chelsea after she had a huge blowup with Jennifer — one of his very top-priority clients.”
“AdvertisementAdvertisementRadar previously reported that, according to a source, the Along Came Polly star ordered her publicist, Stephen Huvane, to drop Chelsea from his roster, because she was so angry with the star of Chelsea Lately.”
“‘And the worst part is that now Jennifer has turned everyone against her,’ a source revealed.”
“Jennifer’s former bezzie Chelsea Handler has admitted that she was at fault (Picture: Getty Images)‘Chelsea knows that she really messed things up with her.”
“According to Radar Online, comedienne Chelsea has now admitted to friends that she was at fault for the pair’s fall out.”


"He solved all the harm he caused her." More: people can't forget Brad Pitt and Jennifer Aniston, because the rumor factory has reached a climax again. " More: Jennifer Aniston is giving up movies and going back to TV: "that's where the job is."
"He didn't usually open up like that, but through treatment and rehabilitation, he learned to express his feelings."
"Brad Pitt and Jennifer Aniston had a source on the website as early as 2001 (photo source: Getty Images)," Brad apologized for all the heartbreak. "
In June, it was reported that Brad Pitt was apologizing to his ex-wife, although Chelsea said the actress "didn't care" about Brad's condition, lifestyle magazine reported
"He no longer represents Chelsea At the same time, even though she broke up with Brad Pitt in 2005 - more than 10 years ago - we still seem unable to get rid of their relationship
"(Stephen hooven) dumped her after a big fight between Chelsea and Jennifer, one of his most important clients."
"Ad radar has previously reported that the arrival of Polly's star has prompted her publicist Stephen Huvane to remove Chelsea from his list because she has recently been very angry with the Chelsea star," sources said
"The worst thing is that now, Jennifer has everyone against her," a source said
"Jennifer's former Chelsea coach, Betsy, admits she was at fault (photo source: Getty Images)" "Chelsea know she really screwed up."
"According to radar online, comedian Chelsea has now admitted to her friends that she was the culprit for their falling out."



Number  198
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But when she emerges from the dressing room minus all the Gaga trappings we re shocked to see a young woman with softly falling straight brown hair and the sweetest of chiclet tooth grins and this is the movie s...”
“How Gaga-netic!” Backstage after the show, Jackson gently pulls off one of Ally’s eyebrows and asks her out for a drink.”
“...feels right verisimilitude sets the stage for everything that follows...”
“Hollywood almost never succeeds in nailing the rock world but A Star Is Born though a love story through and through is the most lived in rock n roll movie since Almost Famous And that absolute looks right sounds right...”
“That’s no minor accomplishment.”
“...that sounds like Victim of Love era Eagles as done by the Allman Brothers the movie is thrillingly authentic...”
“But from the electrifying opening moments of the new version in which Jackson boozy and raw with his sunburned squint and hard bitten shit kicker sexiness takes the stage of a gigantic stadium and launches into a grinding slow rocker...”
“It seemed stranded, with a kind of campy sincere ineptitude, between three worlds: Old Hollywood, New Hollywood, and Barbra Streisand rock-princess fantasy.”
“...borderline ludicrous...”
“The 1976 version starring Barbra Streisand and Kris Kristofferson had some terrific cornball love songs but they didn t belong anywhere near the stadium rock stage and neither did Streisand which is part of why the movie came off as...”


"But when she came out of the dressing room, we were surprised to see a young woman with straight brown hair gently down and the sweetest smile on her teeth. This is the movie s..."
"How to Gaga net! "After the show, Jackson gently pulled one of Ellie's eyebrows backstage and asked her out for a drink."
“… Feel right and realistic, set up a stage for everything that's going on... "
"Hollywood has almost never succeeded in pinning the rock world, but a star was born. Although a love story, through and through is the most vivid rock movie, because it is almost famous, it absolutely looks right and sounds right..."
"It's not a small achievement."
“… It sounds like a victim of the love age Eagles made by the olmans. This movie is exciting and real... "
"But from the exciting moment of the new version of the opening ceremony, Jackson got drunk and raw with his sunburn, squint and hard bite shit kicking sexy on the stage of a huge stadium, and launched a grinding rock..."
"Between the three worlds of old Hollywood, new Hollywood and Barbara Streisand's Rock Princess fantasy, the film seems to be in a dilemma, with a kind of naive incompetence."
“… Almost ridiculous... "
"The 1976 version, starring Barbara Streisand Chris christophson, has some great Cornwall love songs, but they don't belong anywhere near the stadium rock stage, and Streisand doesn't either. That's why the movie is based on..."



Number  199
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Or is she better off with Drake?”
“HollywoodLifers, do you think Jennifer and Derek would make a cute couple?”
“Watch out Drake, you’ve been warned.”
“Derek has shown us in all of his seasons on DWTS that he can bring the heat with every lady he comes in contact with, so we can’t wait to see him turn on his flirty ways with Jennifer!”
“All ages and all styles of dance will be featured, as both individuals are groups will be vying for a $1 million prize.”
“The show is JLo’s baby as not only is she a judge, she’s the executive producer of the talent contest.”
“We totally can’t wait to see Derek and Jennifer’s chemistry when World of Dance premieres in spring of 2017.”
“The Dancing with the Stars pro is such a ladies man that we’re sure he can totally charm JLo, and his completely ripped body and insane dance skills should be such a turn-on for Jennifer!”
““That’s why she picked him for her show, she clicked with him,” our insider adds.”
““Jennifer has a history of falling in love with guys she’s working with and people have already started putting her and Derek together because they do have chemistry,” a source tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”


"Or is she better with Drake?"
"Hollywood stars, do you think Jennifer and Derek will be a lovely couple?"
"Be careful, Drake. You're warned."
"All of Derek's seasons at DWT have shown us that he can bring passion to every woman he comes into contact with, so we can't wait to see him flirt with Jennifer!"
"Dance of all ages and styles will be featured as both groups will compete for a $1 million prize."
"The show is JLO's baby, because she is not only a judge, but also the executive producer of the talent contest."
"We can't wait to see Derek and Jennifer's chemistry at the dance world premiere in the spring of 2017."
"Dancing with stars is such a woman's man, we believe he can charm JLO completely, his completely torn body and crazy dance skills should be such an opening for Jennifer!"
"That's why she chose him as her show and she clicked with him," our insider added
A source told reporters: "Jennifer has a history of falling in love with the man she works with. People have begun to put her and Derek together because there are chemical reactions between them." Exclusive to Hollywood life



Number  200
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
The total pass rate is  0.26285714285714284
Correct number is  46
Total number is  175
(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ 
